ENERGY  MARKET  MANIPULATION  AND 

FEDERAL  ENFORCEMENT  REGIMES 

S.  HRG.  110–1224 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

JUNE  3,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

80–428 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 3, 2008  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Cantwell 
..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Carper  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Cooper, Dr. Mark, Director of Research, Consumer Federation of America  .......
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Greenberger,  Michael,  Professor,  University  of  Maryland  School  of  Law;  and 
former  Director,  Division  of  Trading  and  Markets,  Commodity  Futures 
..............................................................................
Trading Commission (CFTC) 
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Ramm,  Gerry,  President,  Inland  Oil  Company,  Ephrata,  Washington  on  be-
half of the Petroleum Marketers Association of America  .................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
..................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Watson,  Lee  Ann,  Deputy  Director,  Division  of  Investigations,  Office  of  En-
forcement, Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC)  ...........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Soros, George, Chairman, Soros Fund Management, LLC 

APPENDIX 

Boxer, Hon. Barbara, U.S. Senator from California, prepared statement  ..........
IntercontinentalExchange,  Inc.  (ICE)  and  ICE  Futures  Europe,  prepared 
statement  ..............................................................................................................
Joint Analysis prepared by Majority and Minority Staffs of the Senate Perma-
nent  Subcommittee  on  Investigations,  Committee  on  Homeland  Security 
and  Governmental  Affairs  of  Michael  Greenberger’s  Testimony  before  Sen-
ate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation on June 3, 2008  .

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Thomas R. Carper to: 

Dr. Mark Cooper  ...............................................................................................
Michael Greenberger  ........................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Olympia J. Snowe to: 

Michael Greenberger  ........................................................................................
.....................................................................................................
Gerry Ramm 
Lee Ann Watson 
...............................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 
66 
67 
3 
7 
71 
63 
62 
6 
69 
8 

44 
46 

13 
15 

35 
36 
8 
11 

39 
41 

81 

81 

83 

93 
89 

90 
91 
92 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

ENERGY  MARKET  MANIPULATION  AND 

FEDERAL  ENFORCEMENT  REGIMES 

TUESDAY,  JUNE  3,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room  SR– 
253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Maria  Cantwell,  pre-
siding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Good  morning.  I  would  like  to  welcome  ev-
eryone  to  today’s  hearing  on  energy  market  manipulation  and 
thank  our  distinguished  witnesses  for  being  here  today:  George 
Soros,  Chairman  of  Soros  Fund  Management;  Professor  Michael 
Greenberger,  University  of  Maryland  School  of  Law;  Gerry  Ramm, 
President of Inland Oil, on behalf of the Petroleum Marketers Asso-
ciation  of  America;  Lee  Ann  Watson,  Deputy  Director  of  the  Divi-
sion  of  Investigation  Enforcement  for  the  Federal  Energy  Regu-
latory  Commission;  and  Mark  Cooper,  Director  of  Research  for  the 
Consumer Federation of America. 

We  are  here  today  to  examine  whether  today’s  record  high  oil 
and petroleum prices can be explained or predicted by normal mar-
ket  dynamics  of  supply-and-demand  fundamentals,  what  connec-
tion exists between financial markets, particularly the futures mar-
ket,  the  price  at  the  pump  that  consumers  are  paying  today,  how 
the  Federal  Trade  Commission’s  Advance  Notice  of  Proposed  Rule-
making can lead to more meaningful consumer protection, what the 
Federal Trade Commission’s consideration should be in the area of 
manipulation, and what lessons the FTC can learn from other Fed-
eral  agencies  whose  oversight  of  electricity  and  natural  gas  mar-
kets have encumbered manipulation in those markets. In short, we 
are  here  today  to  make  sure  that  Federal  agencies  are  doing  their 
job in protecting consumers and policing the oil markets. 

Why  is  this  such  a  concern?  Well,  one  reason  is  that  we’ve  seen 
more  than  a  doubling  of  oil  prices,  from  $60  to  $135  a  barrel,  in 
just  over  2  years.  And  that  is  without  a  major  supply  disruption. 
We also have seen manipulation of energy prices in other markets. 
Enron  and  others  manipulated  the  western  electricity  markets  in 
2000  and  2001,  and  it  cost  consumers  $40  billion.  In  light  of  that, 
Congress gave the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission new au-
thority  in  the  Energy  Act  of  2005.  Specifically,  Congress  made  it 
unlawful  for  any  person  to  use  or  employ  any  manipulative  or  de-

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

2 

ceptive  devices  or  contrivances  in  connection  with  wholesale  elec-
tricity and natural gas markets. 

We  are  here  today  to  hear  from  the  FERC’s  deputy  director  of 
investigation  enforcement  on  how  FERC  used  its  new  authority  to 
root  out  manipulation  in  the  physical  electricity  and  natural  gas 
markets.  To  date,  FERC  has  used  its  new  authority  to  conduct  64 
investigations, resulting in 14 settlements, totaling over 48 million 
in  civil  penalties.  And  we  have  seen  the  very  same  traders  move 
from  Enron  to  Amaranth,  and  American  families  and  businesses 
have  the  same  concerns  that  the  potential  of  those  same  types  of 
practices actually occurring in the oil markets. 

In  December  of  2007,  Congress  granted  the  Federal  Trade  Com-
mission anti-manipulation authority in that year’s energy bill. Spe-
cifically, it said that it is unlawful for any person to use or employ 
any  manipulative  or  deceptive  device  or  contrivance  in  conjunction 
with  the  purchase  or  sale  of  crude  oil,  gasoline,  or  petroleum  dis-
tillates at wholesale. 

These are two laws that have been based on the Security and Ex-
change  Act  of  1935.  Congress  did  this  to  provide  the  Federal  En-
ergy  Regulatory  Commission  and  the  Federal  Trade  Commission 
with the ability to provide a clear standard by which manipulation 
could  be  based  on.  In  fact,  the  Supreme  Court  has  compared  this 
body  of  law  to,  quote,  ‘‘a  judicial  oak  which  has  grown  from  little 
more than a legislative acorn.’’ 

The  FTC  needs  to  take  its  new  anti-manipulation  responsibility 
seriously and write a strong rule, like FERC has done, so that con-
sumers will be protected from price manipulation. In both the nat-
ural  gas  and  oil  markets,  people  have  seen  how  the  futures  price 
affects the physical prices. 

Recent  investigations  by  the  Congress  and  the  Government  Ac-
countability  Office,  corroborated  by  substantial  congressional  testi-
mony  from  marketers  and  experts,  make  clear  that  tight  correla-
tion  between  futures  and  spot  price,  and  that  this  is  what  con-
sumers may actually be paying for energy. That is why it is so crit-
ical for the Commodities Futures Trading Commission to be an ag-
gressive cop on the beat to fulfill its congressional mandate to pro-
tect American energy consumers from fraud, manipulation, and ex-
cessive speculation in all futures markets that trade U.S. products. 
We  saw  Enron  game  the  futures  market  to  drive  future  energy 
prices higher so electricity customers would be forced to sign high-
er-priced  long-term  contracts  in  the  physical  market.  We  saw  the 
same thing with Amaranth and natural gas, as a large hedge fund 
drove  up  the  price,  the  futures  price,  and  natural  gas  customers 
were forced to pay for even higher physical deliveries. 

It  is  abundantly  clear  to  me  that  the  CFTC  is  not  doing  every-
thing  it  can  to  protect  American  families  and  businesses  from  the 
possible  oil  price  manipulation.  Americans  may  be  surprised  to 
learn that the oil futures market were substantially deregulated by 
the  CFT  staff  decisions  that  were  made  behind  closed  doors.  Now, 
this  London  and  Dubai  loophole  is  keeping  important  U.S.  energy 
trading in the dark, and, without proper light, it’s this kind of ma-
nipulation  that  can  happen  and  give  manipulators  free  rein  in  en-
ergy markets. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

3 

Two weeks ago, I sent a letter to the CFTC, along with 21 of my 
colleagues,  insisting  that  they  reverse  their  ‘‘no  action’’  policy  and 
start policing all U.S. oil markets. I know several of my colleagues 
on  this  Committee  joined  me  in  sending  this  letter,  including  Sen-
ators  Snowe,  Dorgan,  Kerry,  Boxer,  Klobuchar,  and  Claire 
McCaskill. 

The  CFTC’s  May  29  apparent  response  to  this  letter,  I  believe, 
does  not  go  far  enough.  The  CFTC’s  response  is  a  toothless  tiger. 
There are four things wrong with the CFTC approach: 

First,  there  is  no  large  speculation  limits,  which  are  critical  to 

preventing fraud, manipulation, and excessive speculation. 

Second,  the  CFTC  will  not  collect  the  same  information  that  it 
collects  from  other  regulated  exchanges,  and  the  information  will 
be unaudited and unverifiable. 

Third, unlike any of the fully regulated exchanges, like NYMEX, 

there will be no enforcement mechanism. 

And, fourth, the CFTC’s announcement is an agreement to agree: 
there are actually no firm commitments, and all of these measures 
may not even eventually be put in place. 

So,  the  CFTC  announcement  appears  to  be  nothing  more  than  a 
ruse to deflect criticism of what is a serious abdication of oversight 
responsibility. 

We look forward to hearing a formal response to our letter insist-
ing on the CFTC to fully regulate all energy trading of U.S. energy 
commodities  and  close  the  London-Dubai  oil  loophole.  If  the  CFTC 
does  not  act,  I  am  planning  on  introducing  legislation  that  will 
force them to do so. For those of us who suffered the manipulations 
of  Enron,  we  have  plenty  of  perspective  to  share  with  the  CFTC. 
We want you to do your job. 

We expect them to police the oil markets on issues of fraud, ma-
nipulation  and  excessive  speculation,  and  I  hope  that,  today,  our 
witnesses  can  illuminate  these  issues  for  the  American  public  and 
for  the  consumers  that  are  impacted  by  these  record  gasoline 
prices. 

Now  I’d  like  to  turn  to  my  colleagues  to  make  their  opening 

statements. 

Senator Dorgan? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN. Senator Cantwell, thank you very much. 
You mentioned the Enron scandal. I chaired the hearings in this 
Committee when Ken Lay came to that very table and took an oath 
and then took the Fifth Amendment. I recall those of us who were 
concerned about what was happening on the West Coast, raising it, 
time and time again, and everyone said, ‘‘Well, that’s just the mar-
ket.  It’s  just  the  market.  Don’t  intervene,  the  market’s  at  work.’’ 
Turns out to have been a criminal enterprise, at least in part, and 
people were fleeced out of billions of dollars. 

It’s  time,  it  seems  to  me  now  to—I’m  not  suggesting  a  criminal 
enterprise  with  respect  to  the  pricing  of  energy,  but  I  am  saying 
there’s  a  lot  of  what  I  call  ‘‘dark  money’’  moving  around  here,  the 
same  origin,  it  seems  to  me,  with  respect  to  the  subprime  loan 
scandal,  dark  money  that  you  couldn’t  see  where  it  was  and  how 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

4 

it  was  being  used,  and  securitizing  everything,  putting  bad  loans 
in with good loans; it’s like packing sausage with sawdust, as they 
used  to  do,  and  then  slicing  them  up  moving  them  around.  The 
same dark money exists, in my judgment, with respect to this orgy 
of speculation with respect to energy markets. 

Now,  they  say  there’s  a  free  market.  People  talk  about  market 
forces. There’s no free market here at all. You have a cartel, called 
OPEC, that’s at the front end. You’ve got oil companies, bigger and 
stronger  through  mergers,  that  have  more  muscle  in  the  market-
place. And then you have an orgy of speculation in the futures mar-
kets. There’s no free market at all. We have what I think is a spec-
ulative  bubble,  and  the  laws  of  bubbles  is  that  all  bubbles  burst. 
The  problem  is,  this  bubble  is  causing  a  dramatic  amount  of  dam-
age to our economy and to individuals. Those of us that have stud-
ied  speculations  and  bubbles  understand  that,  when  there  was 
speculation  and  a  bubble  with  respect  to  tulips,  tulip  bulbs  didn’t 
mean very much, because tulip bulbs aren’t essential; with respect 
to  oil,  oil  is  essential  to  our  economy,  and  what’s  happening  today 
is hurting this economy and the American people. 

Now,  what’s  happened,  in  my  judgment,  and  I’m  really  anxious 
to  hear  the  testimony  at  this  hearing—what’s  happened,  in  my 
judgment,  is,  a  lot  of  new  entrants  into  the  futures  markets.  We 
have hedge funds that are up to their neck in futures markets, we 
have  investment  banks  up  to  their  necks  in  futures  markets,  in-
vestment banks even buying oil storage capability in order to store 
oil,  for  the  first  time,  and  keep  it  off  the  market.  We’ve  got  a  lot 
of  actions  being  undertaken  that  undermine  what  would  normally 
be the forces of the free market in which supply and demand would 
determine what the price of oil might be. 

I have a chart that shows the price of oil and a chart that shows 
the  entrance  of  speculators.  The  chart  showing  the  price  of  oil, 
which  we  all  know,  we  see—we’ve  seen  what’s  happened  to  the 
price  of  oil,  and  there’s  nothing  with  respect  to  the  fundamentals 
that  justifies  where  that  line  has  moved.  And,  second,  the  amount 
of  speculation—that  is,  percentage  of  oil  owned  by  speculators—is 
a  line  that  looks  pretty  much  the  same.  This  dark  money  with  re-
spect to this speculation has moved. It migrates from regulated ex-
changes to unregulated exchanges overseas. No one quite knows all 
of the facts here, except that people that drive to the gas pump un-
derstand  the  pain,  the  personal  pain  for  them  and  their  families, 
and  this  country  understands  the  pain  through  truckers  that  are 
trying  to  figure  out  how  to  keep  going,  how  to  make  a  living,  air-
lines  who  are  determining  whether  they  have  to  go  bankrupt  or 
not. All of these have significant impact on our economy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

5 

Chart 1.—Price of oil over one year. 

Chart  2.—Percentage  of  oil  owned  by  Speculators,  1995–2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
G
R
O
D
3
0
6

s
p
e
.

1
G
R
O
D
3
0
6

6 

Senator  DORGAN.  And,  Senator  Cantwell,  I  would  just  make  the 
point  that  I  have  long  felt  and  have  spoken  at  length  about  this, 
there  is  nothing  in  the  fundamentals  that  justify  what  has  cur-
rently  happened,  and  we  should,  and  must,  through  the  CFTC, 
through  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  and  other  devices,  find  a 
way  to  wring  this  speculation  out  of  these  markets  and  get  back 
to  something  that  reflects  a  price  relating  to  the  fundamentals  of 
supply and demand. 

I appreciate the opportunity to make a comment. 
Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Senator Sununu—— 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator SUNUNU. Well, thank you—— 
Senator CANTWELL.—opening statement? 
Senator SUNUNU. Pardon me? 
Senator CANTWELL. Opening statement? Thank you. 
Senator SUNUNU. Thank you, Madam Chairman. 
Madam  Chairman,  you  talked  about  the  record  increase  in  en-
ergy  prices.  We’ve  also  seen  record  increases  in  other  commodity 
and  future  prices  in  area  of  food,  for  example,  and  it’s  absolutely 
essential  that  the  regulatory  bodies  that  we  have  understand 
what’s driving this run-up in prices and work to identify any cases 
of  market  manipulation,  any  illegal  activity  that  might  be  an  un-
derlying  cause,  and  to  fully  prosecute  that  market  manipulation 
and illegal activity. The FTC has a role, that Senator Dorgan men-
tioned—the  CFTC,  the  SEC.  We  want  to  make  sure  that  each  of 
these  regulatory  agencies  has  the  right  jurisdiction,  has  the  right 
tools  and  the  right  powers  of  enforcement  to  address  any  case  of 
illegal activity. 

And  it’s  important,  maybe  first  and  foremost,  because  this  kind 
of  market  manipulation  can  drive—in  driving  price  increases,  can 
drive  inflation,  and  that  has  an  impact  on  the  inflation  price  indi-
ces.  But,  let’s  face  it,  it  has  an  impact  at  the  pump,  it  has  an  im-
pact at the grocery checkout counter, as well, that people have been 
feeling directly over the past several months. 

There’s  also  an  impact,  though,  on  our  markets,  the  exchanges 
themselves,  and  I  want  to  make  sure  that  our  U.S.-based  ex-
changes  are  the  world  leaders  for  trading  financial  products,  be-
cause it’s important. It’s important to our economy. And if we want 
our exchanges to be world leaders, they need to have transparency 
and  speed  and  integrity.  And  if  there’s  market  manipulation,  if 
there’s illegal activity, our exchanges, whether they’re for commod-
ities or futures or equities or other financial instruments, they lose 
their  integrity.  That’s  one  of  the  reasons  I  think  this  is  an  impor-
tant hearing, an important topic to discuss. 

I’m  pleased  to  see  that  we  have  a  very  distinguished  panel.  I 
have to admit I’m especially interested to hear what Mr. Soros has 
to  say,  because,  like  so  many  Americans,  I’m  curious  to  hear  what 
someone  who’s  made  billions  of  dollars  on  speculation  has  to  say 
about speculation. So, I welcome you all. I look forward to the testi-
mony. 

And I thank you, Madam Chairman. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

7 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Senator Sununu. 
Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you  very  much,  Madam  Chairman, 

for holding this hearing. 

To  our  witnesses,  I  just  spent  the  last  week  in  my  home  state 
of Minnesota, where I heard many tales of woe, with regard to gas 
prices,  of  people  who  are  deciding  not  to  go  up  to  their  lake  cabin 
as many weekends as they would. Normally, little mom-and-pop re-
sorts  that  I  can  tell  you  are  not  luxurious,  are  having  trouble  be-
cause  people—middle-class  people  simply  can’t  afford  to  go  up  and 
spend  a  week  vacation  up  in  northern  Minnesota.  The  high  price 
of  energy  has  inflated  everything  for  people,  from  their  food  and 
their  transportation,  and  is  affecting  our  economy,  as  well,  our 
business sector in Minnesota. 

I’ve talked to people who just fill up half their tank with gas. I’m 
not  sure  what  purpose  that  serves,  except  that  they  simply  don’t 
have the cash to be able to fill up their full tank with gas. 

I  believe,  in  the  long  term,  we  have  to  make  significant  changes 
in  this  country  with  a  bold  energy  policy,  and  this  means  much 
more research that should have been done 10 years ago into hybrid 
cars,  electric  cars,  it  also  means  the  work  that  needs  to  be  done 
with  alternative  fuels  as  we  move  to  the  next  generation  of  cel-
lulosic  ethanol,  to  look  at  different  types  of  biomass  that  we  can 
use,  from  switchgrass  to  prairie  grass  to  other  forms  of  biomass, 
because  we  simply  can’t  continue  the  way  we  are,  spending 
$600,000 a minute on foreign oil. 

In the short term, however, I’m very intrigued by the topic today. 
The  basis  for  my  interest  in  this  was,  first  of  all,  when  the  oil  ex-
ecutives  testified  before  Congress.  I  was  struck  by  some  of  their 
statements on April 1. It is April Fool’s Day. But, on April 1 a sen-
ior  vice  president  for  Exxon  said  the  price  of  oil  should  be  about 
$50  to  $55  per  barrel.  We  also  have  a  major  merger  going  on  in 
Minnesota  with  Delta  and  Northwest  Airlines,  who  are  very  con-
cerned  about  that.  That’s  our—corporate  headquarters  of  North-
west  is  in  Minnesota.  But,  when  those  two  CEOs  testified  in  two 
different committees, they both pointed to the price of oil. They also 
pointed to speculation as one of their concerns. I thought that was 
interesting, as well. So, you’re hearing it on all levels. 

As you know, the farm bill closed the Enron loophole. I’m hoping 
that  that  will  be  helpful.  But,  I  think  the  bottom  line  is,  as  a 
former prosecutor—I know you can write all the laws you want, we 
can come up with fancy laws, but if we don’t have the enforcement 
of these laws, we’re not going to get to where we want to go. 

In my old job we used to say ‘‘follow the money and you find the 
bad  guys,’’  and  so,  I  want  to  follow  the  money  here  and  figure  out 
how American consumers are getting ripped off. 

I  appreciate  the  work  of  Senator  Cantwell  and  Senator  Dorgan 
on  this.  The  idea  that  increasing  the  margin  requirement  for  oil 
trades,  I  think,  is  a  good  one,  and  also  looking  at  some  of  this  off-
shore trading. So, I hope you’re going to comment on those, because 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

8 

those are two things that we’re seriously looking at as ways to get 
at this speculation issue. 

But, the bottom line, as Senator Cantwell said, is, we need a cop 
on the beat, we also need some prosecutors on the beat. But, I want 
to  know,  from  all  of  you,  how  you  think  we  best  and  quickly  get 
at this speculation issue, because the long-term solutions are much 
bigger  than  what  we’re  going  to  talk  about  today,  but  I  know 
there’s more we can do in the short term with speculation. 

Thank you, and I look forward to hearing your testimony. 
Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Senator Klobuchar. 
Senator Vitter? 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

Senator VITTER. Thank you, Madam Chair, and I look forward to 

the testimony, as well. 

The  specific  title  of  this  hearing  seems  to  be  ‘‘Market  Manipula-
tion,’’  and  certainly  I  agree  we  need  to  ensure  that  that  doesn’t  go 
on,  and  have  proper  enforcement  and  rulemaking  to  ensure  that. 
I  tend  to  think  active  illegality  or  active  manipulation  is  probably 
a small part of the picture, so I hope we also talk in a much broad-
er  sense  about  the  role  of  speculation  and  what  that  has  done  to 
the market, particularly in the last year, and look at that, as well. 
I  think  there  is  significant  evidence  that  that  does  play  a  major 
role  in  at  least  the  pace  of  the  increases  we’ve  seen  recently.  I 
guess  I  disagree  a  little  bit  with  Senator  Dorgan,  that  the  fun-
damentals  don’t  suggest  a  significant  increase  over  time.  I  think  a 
lot  of  fundamentals  do  suggest  that,  but  not,  perhaps,  at  the  pace 
we’ve seen. 

So,  I  hope  we  look  this—at  this  as  an  important  piece  of  the 
equation, and also not forget about the fundamentals, the increased 
demand  from  growing  powers,  like  China  and  India,  and  the  need 
to address those fundamentals on the supply side, as well. 

So, I look forward to the testimony. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Senator  Cantwell,  let  me  just  say,  I  didn’t  say 
‘‘over time.’’ I talked about the fundamentals that exist today. A big 
difference. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Well, let’s turn to our witnesses. 
Again,  we  thank  you  for  being  here  and  making  time  in  your 

schedule to give testimony on this important hearing. 

First,  we  will  hear  from  George  Soros,  Chairman  of  Soros  Fund 
Management.  He  is  a  world-renowned  expert  in  financial  markets 
and  recently  published  a  book  I  found  helpful,  The  New  Paradigm 
for  Financial  Markets:  The  Credit  Crisis  of  2008  and  What  It 
Means. 

Mr.  Soros,  thank  you  for  being  here  today,  and  we  look  forward 

to your testimony. 

STATEMENT OF GEORGE SOROS, CHAIRMAN, 

SOROS FUND MANAGEMENT, LLC 

Mr. SOROS. Thank you very much—— 
Senator CANTWELL. And, if you could, just turn your microphone 

on and maybe pull it closer to you so we can capture your—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

Mr.  SOROS.  I’m  very  honored  to  be  invited  to  testify  before  your 

9 

Committee. 

As I understand it, you are seeking an explanation for the recent 
sharp  rise  in  the  oil  futures  and  in  gasoline  prices.  In  particular, 
you want to know whether this rise constitutes a bubble, and, if it 
is  a  bubble,  whether  better  regulation  could  mitigate  the  harmful 
consequences. 

In  trying  to  answer  these  questions,  I  must  stress  that  I’m  not 
an  expert  in  oil  markets;  I  have,  however,  made  a  lifelong  study 
of  bubbles,  so  I  will  briefly  outline  my  theory  of  bubbles,  which  is 
at odds with the conventional wisdom, and then discuss the current 
situation in the oil market. 

I  shall  focus  on  financial  institutions  investing  in  commodity  in-
dexes  as  an  asset  class,  because  this  is  a  relatively  recent  phe-
nomenon and it has become the elephant in the room in the futures 
market. 

According  to  my  theory,  every  bubble  has  two  components:  a 
trend  based  on  reality  and  a  misconception  or  misinterpretation  of 
that reality, of that trend. Financial markets are usually very good 
at  correcting  misconceptions,  but  occasionally  misconceptions  can 
lead  to  bubbles,  because  they  can  reinforce  the  prevailing  trend; 
and,  by  doing  so,  they  also  reinforce  the  misconception,  until  the 
gap  between  reality  and  the  market’s  interpretation  of  reality  be-
comes  unsustainable.  The  misconception  is  recognized  as  a  mis-
conception, disillusionment sets in, the trend is reversed. A decline 
in the value of collaterals provokes margin calls and distressed sell-
ing,  causes  an  overshoot  in  the  opposite  direction.  And  the  bust 
tends to be shorter and sharper than the boom that preceded it. 

Now,  this  sequence  contradicts  the  prevailing  theory  of  financial 
markets which is based on the belief that markets are always right 
and  deviations  from  equilibrium  occur  in  a  random  manner.  The 
various  synthetic  financial  instruments,  like  CDOs  and  CLOs, 
which have played such an important role in turning the subprime 
crisis  into  a  much  larger  financial  crisis,  have  been  built  on  that 
belief.  But,  the  prevailing  theory  is  wrong.  Deviations  can  be  self- 
reinforcing. 

We  are  currently  experiencing  the  bursting  of  a  housing  bubble 
and,  at  the  same  time,  a  rise  in  oil  and  other  commodities,  which 
has some of the earmarks of a bubble. I believe the two phenomena 
are connected in what I call a ‘‘super bubble’’ that has evolved over 
the last quarter of a century. The misconception in that super bub-
ble  is  that  markets  tend  toward  equilibrium  and  deviations  are 
random. 

So much for bubbles, in general. 
With respect to the oil market, I believe there are four major fac-

tors at play which mutually reinforce each other: 

First,  the  increasing  costs  of  discovering  and  developing  new  re-
serves  and  the  accelerating  depletion  of  existing  oil  fields  as  they 
age. This goes under the rather misleading name of ‘‘peak oil.’’ 

Second,  there  is  what  may  be  described  as  a  backward-sloping 
supply curve. As the price of oil rises, oil-producing countries have 
less  incentive  to  convert  their  oil  reserves  underground,  which  are 
expected  to  appreciate  in  value,  into  dollar  reserves  above  ground, 
which  are  losing  their  value.  In  addition,  the  high  price  of  oil  has 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

10 

allowed  political  regimes  which  are  inefficient  and  hostile  to  the 
West to maintain themselves in power; notably in Iran, Venezuela, 
and Russia. Oil production in these countries is declining. 

Third,  the  countries  with  the  fastest  growing  demand—notably, 
the major oil producers, China and the other Asian exporters—keep 
domestic  energy  prices  artificially  low  by  providing  subsidies; 
therefore,  rising  prices  don’t  reduce  demand,  as  they  would  under 
normal conditions. 

Fourth, both the trend for lowering speculation and institutional 
commodity  index  buying  reinforce  the  upward  pressure  on  prices. 
Commodities have become an asset class for institutional investors, 
and  they  are  increasing  allocations  to  that  asset  class  by  following 
an index buying strategy. Recently, spot prices have risen far above 
the marginal costs of production and far-out forward contracts have 
risen  much  faster  than  spot  prices.  Price  charts  have  taken  on  a 
parabolic  shape  which  are  characteristic  of  bubbles  in  the  making. 
So,  is  this  a  bubble?  The  answer  is  that  the  bubble  is  super-
imposed on an upward trend in oil prices that has a strong founda-
tion  in  reality.  The  first  three  factors  I  mentioned  are  real  and 
would persist even if speculation and commodity index buying were 
eliminated. In discussing the bubble element, I shall focus on insti-
tutional  buying  of  commodity  indexes  as  an  asset  class,  because  it 
fits so perfectly my theory about bubbles. 

Index  buying  is  based  on  a  misconception.  Commodity  indexes 
are  not  a  productive  use  of  capital.  When  the  idea  was  first  pro-
moted, there was a rationale for it. Commodity futures were selling 
at discounts from cash, and institutions could pick up additional re-
turns  from  this  so-called  ‘‘backwardation.’’  Financial  institutions 
were  indirectly  providing  capital  to  producers  who  sold  their  prod-
ucts  forward  in  order  to  finance  production.  That  was  a  legitimate 
investment opportunity. But, the field got crowded, and that profit 
opportunity disappeared. Nevertheless, the asset class continues to 
attract  additional  investment,  just  because  it  has  turned  out  to  be 
more profitable than other asset classes. It’s a classic case of a mis-
conception that is liable to be self-reinforcing in both directions. 

I  find  commodity  index  buying  eerily  reminiscent  of  a  similar 
craze  for  portfolio  insurance  which  led  to  the  stock  market  crash 
of  1987.  In  both  cases,  the  institutions  are  piling  in  on  one  side  of 
the market, and they have sufficient weight to unbalance it. If the 
trend were reversed and the institutions as a group headed for the 
exit as they did in 1987, there would be a crash. 

To  be  sure,  a  crash  in  the  oil  market  is  not  imminent.  The  dan-
ger  currently  is  in  the  opposite  direction.  The  rise  in  oil  prices  ag-
gravates  the  prospects  for  a  recession.  Only  when  a  recession  is 
well and truly in place is a declining consumption in the developed 
world likely to outweigh the other factors I have listed. 

That  makes  it  desirable  to  discourage  commodity  index  buying 
while  it  is  still  inflating  the  bubble.  There’s  a  strong  prima  facie 
case  against  institutional  investors  pursuing  a  commodity  index 
buying  strategy.  It  is  intellectually  unsound,  potentially  desta-
bilizing, and distinctly harmful in its economic consequences. 

When  it  comes  to  taking  any  regulatory  measures,  however,  the 
case  is  less  clear  cut.  Regulations  may  have  unintended  adverse 
consequences.  For  instance,  they  may  push  investors  further  into 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

11 

unregulated markets which are less transparent and offer less pro-
tection. But, it may be possible to persuade the institutional inves-
tors  that  they  are  violating  the  prudent  man’s  rule  by  acting  as  a 
herd,  just  as  they  did  in  1987.  If  not,  buying  commodities,  as  dis-
tinct from investing in commodity-producing enterprises, should be 
disqualified  as  an  asset  class  for  ERISA  institutions.  The  various 
techniques  for  circumventing  speculative  position  limits  should  be 
banned,  provided  the  ban  can  be  made  to  apply  to  unregulated,  as 
well as regulated, markets. 

Now,  raising  margin  requirements  would  have  no  effect  on  com-
modity index buying strategy of financial institutions, because they 
use  cash.  Nevertheless,  it  would  be  justified  in  current  cir-
cumstances,  because  it  would  discourage  speculation  and  specula-
tion can distort prices. Varying margin requirements and minimum 
reserve requirements are tools that ought to be used more actively 
to prevent asset bubbles from inflating. This is one of the main les-
sons to be learned from the recent financial crisis. 

Finally,  dealing  with  the  bubble  element  should  not  divert  our 
attention from the interrelated problems of global warming, energy 
security,  and  so-called  ‘‘peak  oil.’’  Although  they  are  beyond  the 
scope  of  these  hearings,  these  are  pressing  issues  that  require  ur-
gent attention. 

I hope my remarks are helpful to your deliberations. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Soros follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GEORGE SOROS, CHAIRMAN, 

SOROS FUND MANAGEMENT, LLC 

Madame  Chairperson,  distinguished  Members,  I  am  honored  to  be  invited  to  tes-
tify  before  your  Committee.  As  I  understand  it,  you  are  seeking  an  explanation  for 
the recent sharp rise in the oil futures market and in gasoline prices. In particular, 
you  want  to  know  whether  this  rise  constitutes  a  bubble  and,  if  it  is  a  bubble, 
whether better regulation could mitigate the harmful consequences. 

In  trying  to  answer  these  questions,  I  must  stress  that  I  am  not  an  expert  in  oil 
markets. I have, however, made a life-long study of bubbles. So I will briefly outline 
my  theory  of  bubbles—which  is  at  odds  with  the  conventional  wisdom—and  then 
discuss the current situation in the oil market. I shall focus on financial institutions 
investing in commodity indexes as an asset class because this is a relatively recent 
phenomenon  and  it  has  become  the  ‘‘elephant  in  the  room’’  in  the  futures  market. 
According  to  my  theory,  every  bubble  has  two  components:  a  trend  based  on  re-
ality and a misconception or misinterpretation of that trend. Financial markets are 
usually very good at correcting misconceptions. But occasionally misconceptions can 
lead to bubbles because they can reinforce the prevailing trend and by doing so they 
also  reinforce  the  misconception  until  the  gap  between  reality  and  the  market’s  in-
terpretation of reality becomes unsustainable. The misconception is recognized as a 
misconception,  disillusionment  sets  in,  and  the  trend  is  reversed.  A  decline  in  the 
value  of  collaterals  provokes  margin  calls  and  distress  selling  causes  an  overshoot 
in  the  opposite  direction.  The  bust  tends  to  be  shorter  and  sharper  than  the  boom 
that preceded it. 

This  sequence  contradicts  the  prevailing  theory  of  financial  markets,  which  is 
based  on  the  belief  that  markets  are  always  right  and  deviations  from  equilibrium 
occur  in  a  random  manner.  The  various  synthetic  financial  instruments  like  CDOs 
and CLOs which have played such an important role in turning the subprime crisis 
into a much larger financial crisis have been built on that belief. But the prevailing 
theory  is  wrong.  Deviations  can  be  self-reinforcing.  We  are  currently  experiencing 
the bursting of a housing bubble and, at the same time, a rise in oil and other com-
modities which has some of the earmarks of a bubble. I believe the two phenomena 
are  connected  in  what  I  call  a  super-bubble  that  has  evolved  over  the  last  quarter 
of  a  century.  The  misconception  in  that  super-bubble  is  that  markets  tend  toward 
equilibrium and deviations are random. 

So  much  for  bubbles  in  general.  With  respect  to  the  oil  market  in  particular,  I 

believe there are four major factors at play which mutually reinforce each other. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

12 

First,  the  increasing  cost  of  discovering  and  developing  new  reserves  and  the  ac-
celerating  depletion  of  existing  oil  fields  as  they  age.  This  goes  under  the  rather 
misleading name of ‘‘peak oil’’. 

Second,  there  is  what  may  be  described  as  a  backward-sloping  supply  curve.  As 
the  price  of  oil  rises,  oil-producing  countries  have  less  incentive  to  convert  their  oil 
reserves  underground,  which  are  expected  to  appreciate  in  value,  into  dollar  re-
serves  above  ground,  which  are  losing  their  value.  In  addition,  the  high  price  of  oil 
has allowed political regimes, which are inefficient and hostile to the West, to main-
tain  themselves  in  power,  notably  Iran,  Venezuela  and  Russia.  Oil  production  in 
these countries is declining. 

Third,  the  countries  with  the  fastest  growing  demand,  notably  the  major  oil  pro-
ducers,  and  China  and  other  Asian  exporters,  keep  domestic  energy  prices  artifi-
cially  low  by  providing  subsidies.  Therefore  rising  prices  do  not  reduce  demand  as 
they would under normal conditions. 

Fourth,  both  trend-following  speculation  and  institutional  commodity  index  buy-
ing  reinforce  the  upward  pressure  on  prices.  Commodities  have  become  an  asset 
class  for  institutional  investors  and  they  are  increasing  allocations  to  that  asset 
class  by  following  an  index  buying  strategy.  Recently,  spot  prices  have  risen  far 
above  the  marginal  cost  of  production  and  far-out,  forward  contracts  have  risen 
much  faster  than  spot  prices.  Price  charts  have  taken  on  a  parabolic  shape  which 
is characteristic of bubbles in the making. 

So,  is  this  a  bubble?  The  answer  is  that  the  bubble  is  super-imposed  on  an  up-
ward trend in oil prices that has a strong foundation in reality. The first three fac-
tors I mentioned are real and would persist even if speculation and commodity index 
buying  were  eliminated.  In  discussing  the  bubble  element  I  shall  focus  on  institu-
tional buying of commodity indexes as an asset class because it fits so perfectly my 
theory about bubbles. 

Index  buying  is  based  on  a  misconception.  Commodity  indexes  are  not  a  produc-
tive  use  of  capital.  When  the  idea  was  first  promoted,  there  was  a  rationale  for  it. 
Commodity  futures  were  selling  at  discounts  from  cash  and  institutions  could  pick 
up  additional  returns  from  this  so-called  ‘‘backwardation.’’  Financial  institutions 
were  indirectly  providing  capital  to  producers  who  sold  their  products  forward  in 
order to finance production. That was a legitimate investment opportunity. But the 
field  got  crowded  and  that  profit  opportunity  disappeared.  Nevertheless,  the  asset 
class  continues  to  attract  additional  investment  just  because  it  has  turned  out  to 
be  more  profitable  than  other  asset  classes.  It  is  a  classic  case  of  a  misconception 
that is liable to be self-reinforcing in both directions. 

I  find  commodity  index  buying  eerily  reminiscent  of  a  similar  craze  for  portfolio 
insurance  which  led  to  the  stock  market  crash  of  1987.  In  both  cases,  the  institu-
tions are piling in on one side of the market and they have sufficient weight to un-
balance  it.  If  the  trend  were  reversed  and  the  institutions  as  a  group  headed  for 
the exit as they did in 1987 there would be a crash. 

To be sure a crash in the oil market is not imminent. The danger currently comes 
from the other direction. The rise in oil prices aggravates the prospects for a reces-
sion.  Only  when  a  recession  is  well  and  truly  in  place  is  a  decline  in  consumption 
in the developed world likely to outweigh the other factors I have listed. That makes 
it desirable to discourage commodity index trading while it is still inflating the bub-
ble. 

There is a strong prima facie case against institutional investors pursuing a com-
modity  index  buying  strategy.  It  is  intellectually  unsound,  potentially  destabilizing 
and distinctly harmful in its economic consequences. 

When it comes to taking any regulatory measures, however, the case is less clear 
cut.  Regulations  may  have  unintended,  adverse  consequences.  For  instance,  they 
may  push  investors  further  into  unregulated  markets  which  are  less  transparent 
and offer less protection. It may be possible to persuade institutional investors that 
they  are  violating  the  ‘‘prudent  man’s  rule’’  by  acting  as  a  herd  just  as  they  did  in 
1987.  If  not,  buying  commodities—as  distinct  from  investing  in  commodity  pro-
ducing enterprises—should be disqualified as an asset class for ERISA institutions. 
The  various  techniques  for  circumventive  speculative  position  limits  should  be 
banned, provided the ban can be made to apply to unregulated as well as regulated 
markets. 

Raising margin requirements would have no effect on the commodity index buying 
strategy  of  financial  institutions  because  they  use  cash.  Nevertheless,  it  would  be 
justified because it would discourage speculation, and speculation can distort prices. 
Varying  margin  requirements  and  minimum  reserve  requirements  are  tools  that 
ought  to  be  used  more  actively  to  prevent  asset  bubbles  from  inflating.  This  is  one 
of the main lessons to be learned from the recent financial crisis. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

13 

Finally, dealing with the bubble element should not divert our attention from the 
inter-related  problems  of  global  warming,  energy  security  and  so-called  ‘‘peak  oil’’. 
Although they are beyond the scope of these hearings, these are pressing issues that 
require urgent action. 

I hope my remarks are helpful to your deliberations. Thank you. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Mr. Soros. 
Now  we  turn  to  Professor  Greenberger,  University  of  Maryland 
Law School, former Director of Trading and Markets at the CFTC, 
and who has worked with the President’s Working Group on Finan-
cial Markets. 

Mr. Greenberger, welcome. 

STATEMENT OF MICHAEL GREENBERGER, PROFESSOR, 

UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND SCHOOL OF LAW; AND FORMER 

DIRECTOR, DIVISION OF TRADING AND MARKETS, 

COMMODITY FUTURES TRADING COMMISSION (CFTC) 

Mr. GREENBERGER. Thank you. 
I’ve  submitted  a  lengthy  statement,  attempting  to  anticipate  in 
detail  many  of  the  issues  that  have  arisen  over  this—over  these 
concerns. 

Today,  let  me  just  say  this.  Senator  Klobuchar  said,  ‘‘We  passed 
the  ‘End  the  Enron  Loophole.’  I  hope  it’s  enforced.’’  The  ‘‘End  the 
Enron  Loophole,’’  because  it  was  written  by  the  Intercontinental 
Exchange, handed to the CFTC, and then handed to Congress, does 
not  deal  with  crude  oil.  By  its  language,  it  appears  to  deal  with 
crude oil, but the CFTC has announced it will not use that to bring 
unregulated crude oil markets under United States regulatory con-
trol. 

Why  is  that?  Senator  Cantwell  talked  about  the  London-Dubai 
loophole.  The  CFTC  takes  the  position  that  West  Texas  Inter-
mediate contracts sold in the United States by U.S.-owned or U.S.- 
affiliated  exchanges,  because  they  have  some  tangential  relation-
ship to either London or Dubai, should be regulated, in the case of 
Dubai,  by  the  Dubai  Financial  Services  Authority.  The  CFTC,  on 
May 20, 2007, reached a decision that it would not regulate Dubai’s 
entrance  into  the  United  States  markets,  because  Dubai  has  com-
parable  futures  regulation  to  the  United  States.  What  that  sug-
gests is, when your constituents come to you and ask you, ‘‘Is spec-
ulation under control?’’ if you want to leave the status quo as it is, 
you  must  tell  them,  ‘‘I  believe  so,  because  I  have  every  confidence 
that  Dubai  will  protect  those  Minnesota  citizens  who  can’t  go  to 
their summer homes.’’ The CFTC has abdicated its responsibility to 
the Financial Services Authority in the United Kingdom and to the 
Dubai  Financial  Services  Authority  for  30  percent  of  the  West 
Texas  Intermediate  U.S.-delivered  contracts  sold  in  the  United 
States of America. 

That  is  an  outrage,  and  no  one  ever  bothered  to  tell  Congress, 
when  it  was  working  on  the  ‘‘End  the  Enron  Loophole,’’  which,  by 
the way, in my testimony, I show, even if it did apply, it is the big-
gest joke in the world, because it was written by the exchange that 
needs to be regulated. It puts 1,000 burdens on the CFTC and the 
public to prove that there needs to be regulation. Prior to the—Sen-
ator  Phil  Gramm’s  introduction  in  the  middle  of  the  night,  of  the 
‘‘End  the’’—of  the  ‘‘Enron  Loophole,’’  every  futures  contract  sold  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

14 

the  United  States  of  America—every 
futures  contract—oil, 
collateralized  debt  obligations,  credit  default  swaps—had  to  be 
traded,  pursuant  to  regulation  that  had  age-old  and  time-tested 
controls on speculators. In one fell swoop, 262 pages of deregulation 
was  added  to  an  11,000-page  omnibus  fiscal  appropriation  bill  as 
Congress was leaving for its recess in December 2000, and that did 
not  call  for  ‘‘better  regulation,’’  it  called  for  ‘‘no  regulation.’’  That 
led  to  the  Enron  West  Coast  electricity  crisis.  There’s  no  doubt 
about that. The day before the documents were released evidencing 
that  crisis,  on  May  15,  2002,  Chairman  Newsome,  of  the  CFTC, 
made a speech that electricity crisis is a supply demand crisis. Doc-
uments  were  released  showing  how  the  unregulated—unregu-
lated—speculative Enron online trading engine drove prices up 300 
percent in the West Coast. 

Senator  Cantwell  has  testified  about  the  Bonneville  Power  Ad-
ministration. In the middle of that bubble, they locked in long-term 
contracts, thinking the price would go up forever. When the bubble 
burst,  they  had  contracts  that  were  three—long-term  contracts, 
commitments  to  pay  300  percent  of  the  then-market  price  of  nat-
ural gas. 

The ‘‘End the Enron Loophole’’ is a joke. Turning this regulation 
over  to  Dubai  and  the  English  is  a  joke.  The  English  regulators 
oversaw  the  collapse  of  the  Northern  Rock  Bank  in  London.  That 
bank  first  got  $100  billion  in  loans  from  the  British  government 
and  was  then  nationalized.  The  FSA,  to  whom  we  are  delegating 
regulation  of  crude  oil,  has  said,  of  its  own  regulation  of  Northern 
Rock,  ‘‘We  dropped  the  ball.’’  Two  weeks  ago,  the  European  Union 
opened  an  investigation  over  the  failure  of  the  Financial  Services 
Authority in London to properly regulate that bank. The only indi-
vidual  in  the  world  who  will  now  say,  as  he  has  recently  said  in 
a  letter  to  the  Financial  Times,  that  the  FSA  is  ‘‘a  model  regu-
lator,’’  is  the  Acting  Chair  of  the  CFTC,  Mr.  Walter  Lukken.  Even 
the  other  Commissioners—Bart  Chilton  went  to  London  and  said, 
‘‘The FSA is not regulating.’’ 

But, you bear the burden, unless you change things, of saying to 
your  constituents,  ‘‘Hey,  I  can’t  regulate  this.  We’ve  got  an  ex-
change  in  Atlanta,  the  Intercontinental  Exchange,  with  U.S.  trad-
ing  engines  trading  United  States  West  Texas  Intermediate  oil, 
and,  don’t  worry,  the  United  Kingdom  is  on  the  case.’’  And  now 
Dubai  has  entered  the  market,  so  you  will  have  to  say,  ‘‘Dubai  is 
on the case.’’ 

We  must  bring  these  matters  under  our  regulatory  regime.  We 
must  toughen  that  regime.  The  CFTC  has  dragged  its  heels.  Its 
May  29  release  is  evidence  that  it’s  dragged  its  heels.  The  FTC 
must be encouraged to quickly move into this area and do the prop-
er investigation, as FERC did in the natural gas markets. If we do 
not  do  anything,  we  may  be  in  a  bubble,  but  it’s  an  iron  bubble, 
and  it’s  an  iron  bubble  because  these  investment  banks  and  these 
hedge  funds,  knowing  they  control  the  price  of  these  products 
through the futures markets, because they manipulate it upwards, 
are buying the underlying commodity. 

The  largest  holder  of  heating  oil  in  New  England  is  Morgan 
Stanley.  The  bubble  will  be  hard  to  burst  as  long  as  Mr.  Soros’s 
theory  that  they’re  not  going  to  exchange  that  heating  oil  for  U.S. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

15 

dollars because they’re driving the price of heating oil up, and that 
forces  the  U.S.  dollar  down—it’s  a  very  bad  trade.  There  is  mini- 
hoarding going on in New England and all over this country by in-
vestment  banks  and  hedge  funds  that  are  holding  energy  products 
that  can  be  stored,  will  not  release  them,  because  it’s  a  bad  trade. 
They can drive those commodity prices up and downgrade the U.S. 
dollar. They don’t want to take dollars for those products. 
I’d be happy to answer any other questions. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Greenberger follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL GREENBERGER,  PROFESSOR,  UNIVERSITY OF 
MARYLAND SCHOOL OF LAW;  AND FORMER DIRECTOR,  DIVISION OF TRADING AND 
MARKETS, COMMODITY FUTURES TRADING COMMISSION (CFTC) 

Introduction 

My name is Michael Greenberger. I want to thank the Committee for inviting me 

to testify on the important issue that is the subject of today’s hearings. 

After  25  years  in  private  legal  practice,  I  served  as  the  Director  of  the  Division 
of  Trading  and  Markets  (T&M)  at  the  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission 
(CFTC) from September 1997 to September 1999. In that capacity, I supervised ap-
proximately  135  CFTC  personnel  in  CFTC  offices  in  DC,  New  York,  Chicago,  and 
Minneapolis,  including  lawyers  and  accountants  who  were  engaged  in  overseeing 
the  Nation’s  futures  exchanges.  During  my  tenure  at  the  CFTC,  I  worked  exten-
sively  on,  inter  alia,  regulatory  issues  concerning  exchange  traded  energy  deriva-
tives,  the  legal  status  of  over-the-counter  (OTC)  energy  derivatives,  and  the  CFTC 
authorization of trading of foreign exchange derivative products on computer termi-
nals in the United States. 

While  at  the  CFTC,  I  also  served  on  the  Steering  Committee  of  the  President’s 
Working Group on Financial Markets (PWG). In that capacity, I drafted, or oversaw 
the  drafting  of,  portions  of  the  April  1999  PWG  Report  entitled  ‘‘Hedge  Funds,  Le-
verage,  and  the  Lessons  of  Long-Term  Capital  Management,’’  which  recommended 
to  Congress  regulatory  actions  to  be  taken  in  the  wake  of  the  near  collapse  of  the 
Long Term Capital Management (LTCM) hedge fund, including Appendix C to that 
report  which  outlined  the  CFTC’s  role  in  responding  to  that  near  collapse.  As  a 
member  of  the  International  Organization  of  Securities  Commissions’  (IOSCO) 
Hedge  Fund  Task  Force,  I  also  participated  in  the  drafting  of  the  November  1999 
IOSCO  Report  of  its  Technical  Committee  relating  to  the  LTCM  episode:  ‘‘Hedge 
Funds and Other Highly Leveraged Institutions.’’ 

After  a  two-year  stint  between  1999  and  2001  as  the  Principal  Deputy  Associate 
Attorney  General  in  the  U.S.  Department  of  Justice,  I  began  service  as  a  Professor 
at  the  University  of  Maryland  School  of  Law.  At  the  law  school,  I  have,  inter  alia, 
focused  my  attention  on  futures  and  OTC  derivatives  trading,  including  academic 
writing and speaking on these subjects. I have designed and teach a course entitled 
‘‘Futures, Options, and Derivatives,’’ in which the United States energy futures trad-
ing markets are featured as a case study of the way in which unregulated or poorly 
regulated  futures  and  derivatives  trading  cause  dysfunctions  within  those  markets 
and  within  the  U.S.  economy  as  a  whole,  including  causing  the  needlessly  high 
prices which energy consumers now pay because of the high probability of excessive 
speculation and illegal manipulation and fraud within those markets. 

The  question  whether  there  has  been  manipulation  of  U.S.  energy  futures  mar-
kets in general, and U.S. delivered crude oil contracts specifically, has been the sub-
ject  of  many  hearings.  I  have  previously  testified  at  three  of  those  hearings,  the 
most  recent  held  on  December  12,  2007  hearing  before  the  Subcommittee  on  Over-
sight  and  Investigations  of  the  U.S.  House  Committee  on  Energy  and  Commerce. 
To  put  the  issue  of  today’s  hearing  in  context,  I  summarize  the  points  I  made  at 
that hearing immediately below. 
Summary of Prior Testimony 

One of the fundamental purposes of futures contracts is to provide price discovery 
in  the  ‘‘cash’’  or  ‘‘spot’’  markets.  Those  selling  or  buying  commodities  in  the  ‘‘spot’’ 
markets  rely  on  futures  prices  to  judge  amounts  to  charge  or  pay  for  the  delivery 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

16 

of a commodity.1 Since their creation in the agricultural context decades ago, it has 
been  widely  understood  that,  unless  properly  regulated,  futures  markets  are  easily 
subject  to  distorting  the  economic  fundamentals  of  price  discovery  (i.e.,  cause  the 
paying of unnecessarily higher or lower prices) through excessive speculation, fraud, 
or manipulation. 

The  Commodity  Exchange  Act  (CEA)  has  long  been  judged  to  prevent  those 
abuses.  Accordingly,  prior  to  the  hasty  and  last  minute  passage  of  the  Commodity 
Futures  Modernization  Act  of  2000  (CFMA),  ‘‘all  futures  activity  [was]  confined  by 
law (and eventually to criminal activity) to [CFTC regulated] exchanges alone.’’ 2 At 
the  behest  of  Enron,  the  CFMA  authorized  the  ‘‘stunning’’  change  to  the  CEA  to 
allow  the  option  of  trading  energy  commodities  on  deregulated  ‘‘exempt  commercial 
markets,’’ i.e., exchanges exempt from CFTC, or any other federal or state, oversight, 
thereby  rejecting  the  contrary  1999  advice  of  the  President’s  Working  Group  on  Fi-
nancial Markets. Id. This is called ‘‘the Enron Loophole.’’ 

Two  prominent  and  detailed  bipartisan  studies  of  the  Permanent  Subcommittee 
on  Investigations  (SPI)  staff  represent  what  is  now  conventional  wisdom:  hedge 
funds,  large  banks  and  energy  companies,  and  wealthy  individuals  have  used  ‘‘ex-
empt commercial energy futures markets’’ to drive up needlessly the price of energy 
commodities  over  what  economic  fundamentals  dictate,  adding,  for  example,  what 
the  SPI  estimated  to  be  at  $20–$30  per  barrel  to  the  price  of  a  barrel  of  crude  oil 
at a time when that commodity had reached a then record high of $77. The conclu-
sion  that  speculation  has  added  a  large  premium  to  energy  products  has  been  cor-
roborated  by  many  experts,  including  most  recently  and  most  prominently,  George 
Soros.3 

The  SPI  staff  and  others  have  identified  the  Intercontinental  Exchange  (ICE)  of 
Atlanta, Georgia as an unregulated facility upon which considerable exempt energy 
futures trading is done. For purposes of facilitating exempt natural gas futures, ICE 
is  deemed  a  U.S.  ‘‘exempt  commercial  market’’  under  the  Enron  Loophole.  For  pur-
poses  of  its  facilitating  U.S.  WTI  crude  oil  futures,  the  CFTC,  by  informal  staff  ac-
tion,  deems  ICE  to  be  a  U.K.  entity  not  subject  to  direct  CFTC  regulation  even 
though  ICE  maintains  U.S.  headquarters  and  trading  infrastructure,  facilitating, 

1 See  Written  Testimony  of  Professor  Michael  Greenberger,  Energy  Speculation:  Is  Greater 
Regulation  Necessary  to  Stop  Price  Manipulation?:  Hearing  Before  the  H.  Subcomm.  on  Over-
sight  and  Investigations,  3–5  (2007)  available  at  http://digitalcommons.law.umaryland. 
edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=1011&context=congltest (last visited June 1, 2008). 

2 PHILIP MCBRIDE JOHNSON &  THOMAS LEE HAZEN,  COMMODITIES REGULATION 28  (Cumm. 

Supp. 2008). 

3 See,  e.g.,  Edmund  Conway,  George  Soros:  rocketing  oil  price  is  a  bubble,  DAILY TELEGRAPH 
(May 27, 2008) available at http://www.telegraph.co.uk/money/main.jhtml?xml=/money/2008/ 
05/26/cnsoros126.xml  (last  visited  June  1,  2008)  (quoting  Mr.  George  Soros  as  stating  ‘‘Specu-
lators  are  largely  responsible  for  driving  crude  prices  to  their  peaks  in  recent  weeks  and  the 
record oil price now looks like a bubble’’); Written Testimony of Michael Masters, Hearing Before 
the  Committee  on  Homeland  Security  and  Governmental  Affairs,  U.S.  Senate  2  (May  20,  2008) 
available  at  http://hsgac.senate.gov/public/lfiles/052008Masters.pdf  (last  visited  June  1, 
2008)  (quoting  Michael  W.  Masters  as  stating  ‘‘Are  Institutional  Investors  contributing  to  food 
and energy price inflation? And my unequivocal answer is YES’’); Alejandro Lazo, Energy Stocks 
Haven’t  Caught  Up  With  Oil  Prices,  WASH.  POST (Mar.  23,  2008)  available  at  http:// 
(last 
www.washingtonpost.com/wpdyn/content/article/2008/03/21/AR2008032103825.html 
visited June 1, 2008) (quoting Mr. Fadel Gheit as stating ‘‘The largest speculators are the larg-
est financial companies’’); Michelle Foss, United States Natural Gas Prices to 2015, Oxford Insti-
tute  for  Energy  Studies  34  (2007)  available  at  http://www.oxfordenergy.org/pdfs/NG18.pdf 
(last  visited  June  1,  2008)  (asserting  ‘‘The  role  of  speculation  in  oil  markets  has  been  widely 
debated but could add upwards of $20 to the price per barrel’’); Economist Blames Subsidies for 
Oil  Price  Hike,  ADVANTAGE BUS.  MEDIA (2008),  available  at  http://www.chem.info/ShowPR. 
aspx?PUBCODE=075&ACCT=0000100&ISSUE=0609&ORIGRELTYPE=DM&RELTYPE=PR& 
PRODCODE=00000&PRODLETT=M&CommonCount=0  (last  visited  June  1,  2008)  (quoting  Dr. 
Michelle  Foss  as  stating  ‘‘We  have  an  overpriced  commodity,  and  this  is  going  to  be  around  for 
a  while’’);  Kenneth  N.  Gilpin,  OPEC  Agrees  to  Increase  Output  in  July  to  Ease  Oil  Prices,  N.Y. 
TIMES (June  3,  2004)  available  at  http://www.nytimes.com/2004/06/03/business/03CND 
OIL.html?ei=5007&en=5dbd50c5b369795b&ex=1401681600&partner=USERLAND&pagewanted 
=all&position  (last  visited  June  1,  2008)  (quoting  Mr.  Kyle  Cooper  as  stating  ‘‘There  is  not  a 
crude  shortage,  which  is  why  OPEC  was  so  reluctant  to  raise  production.’’);  Speculators  ‘not  to 
blame’  for  oil  prices,  UPSTREAM,  (April  4,  2008)  available  at  http://www.upstreamonline.com/ 
live/article151805.ece  (last  visited  June  1,  2008)  (quoting  Mr.  Sean  Cota  as  stating  ‘‘It  has  be-
come  apparent  that  excessive  speculation  on  energy  trading  facilities  is  the  fuel  that  is  driving 
this  runaway  train  in  crude  prices’’);  Mike  Norman,  The  Danger  of  Speculation,  FOXNEWS.COM 
(Aug.  19,  2005)  available  at  http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,166038,00.html  (last  visited 
June 1, 2008) (Mr. Norman stating ‘‘Oil prices are high because of speculation, pure and simple. 
That’s  not  an  assertion,  that’s  a  fact.  Yet  rather  than  attack  the  speculation  and  rid  ourselves 
of the problem, we flail away at the symptoms.’’). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

17 

inter  alia,  at  30  percent  of  trades  in  U.S.  WTI  futures.  That  staff  informal  action 
may be terminated instantly by the CFTC under existing law.4 

Virtually  all  parties  now  agree  the  Enron  Loophole  must  be  repealed.  The  sim-
plest  way  to  repeal  would  be  to  add  two  words  to  the  Act’s  definition  of  ‘‘exempt 
commodity’’  so  it  reads:  an  exempt  commodity  does  ‘‘not  include  an  agriculture  or 
energy commodity;’’ and two words to 7 U.S.C. § 7(e) to make clear that ‘‘agricultural 
and  energy  commodities’’  must  trade  on  regulated  markets.  An  ‘‘energy  commodity’’ 
definition must be then be added to include crude oil, natural gas, heating oil, gaso-
line, heating oil, metals, etc.5 In the absence of quick CFTC action permitted by law, 
the  statute  should  also  be  amended  to  forbid  an  exchange  from  being  deemed  an 
unregulated  foreign  entity  if  its  trading  affiliate  or  trading  infrastructure  is  in  the 
U.S.;  or  if  it  trades  a  U.S.  delivered  contract  within  the  U.S.  that  significantly  af-
fects price discovery. 
A Critique of the Farm Bill’s ‘‘End the Enron Loophole’’ Provision 

On  May  22,  2008,  the  Food  Conservation  and  Energy  Act  of  2008 6 (the  ‘‘Farm 
Bill’’)  was  enacted  into  law  by  a  Congressional  override  of  President  Bush’s  veto. 
Title XIII of the Farm Bill is the CFTC reauthorization act, which, in turn, includes 
a provision that was intended to ‘‘close’’ the Enron Loophole.7 Rather than returning 
to the status quo ante prior to the passage of the Enron Loophole by simply bringing 
all  energy  futures  contracts  within  the  full  U.S.  regulatory  format  with  exceptions 
to  regulation  granted  on  a  case-by-case  basis  under  section  4(c)  of  the  CEA,  the 
Farm Bill amendment requires the CFTC and the public to prove on a case-by-case 
basis through lengthy administrative proceedings that an individual energy contract 
should be regulated if the CFTC can prove that that contract ‘‘serve[s] a significant 
price  discovery  function  in  order  to  detect  and  prevent  ‘‘manipulation.’’ 8 This  con-
tract-by-contract process will take months, if not years, to complete and it will then 
only  apply  to  a  single  contract.  It  will  doubtless  be  followed  by  lengthy  and  costly 
judicial challenges during which the CFTC and the energy consuming public will be 
required to show that its difficult burden has been met. It has also been widely re-
ported that the CFTC intends to use the new legislation to show that only a single 
unregulated  natural  gas  futures  contract,  and  not  any  crude  oil  futures  contracts, 
should be removed from the Enron Loophole and be fully regulated. Thus, by CFTC 
pronouncement, crude oil, gasoline and heating oil futures contracts will not be cov-
ered by the new legislation. 

It bears repeating that regulatory approach within the Farm Bill amendment, es-
pecially as narrowly construed by the CFTC, differs completely from the regulatory 
concept  underlying  the  Commodity  Exchange  Act  prior  to  the  passage  of  the  Enron 
Loophole.  Before  that  highly  deregulatory  measure  was  enacted,  all  energy  futures 
contracts  were  automatically  covered  by  the  Act’s  protections  (i.e.,  recognizing  that 
the  very  nature  a  publishing  the  prices  of  futures  contract  is  to  provide  price  dis-
covery) unless the proponent of the contract carried the burden of demonstrating to 
the  CFTC  that  lesser  or  no  regulation  is  required  under  § 4(c)  of  the  Act,  i.e.,  that 
there will be no fraud or manipulation pursuant to less than the full regulatory pos-
ture. In other words, the burden had been on the traders to show on a case-by-case 
basis that a contract should be deregulated; the Farm Bill puts the burden, and an 
expensive  one  at  that,  to  prove  on  a  case-by-case  basis  that  an  energy  futures  con-
tract should be regulated. 

Moreover,  the  Farm  Bill’s  attempt  to  end  the  Enron  Loophole  will  doubtless  lead 
to  further  regulatory  arbitrage.  If  the  CFTC  should  be  able  to  prove  that  an  indi-
vidual  energy  futures  contract  has  contract  has  a  ‘‘significant  price  discovery  func-
tion,’’ and thus should be subject to regulation, traders will almost certainly simply 
move their trading to equivalent contracts that remain exempt from regulation. This 
was  the  exact  strategy  employed  by  Amaranth  when  NYMEX  imposed  speculation 
limits on it in the natural gas futures market. Amaranth simply moved those trades 
that  exceeded  NYMEX  limits  to  the  unregulated  ICE  exchange,  where  no  specula-
tion limits were in place.9 

Again,  the  easiest  course  to  end  the  Enron  Loophole  was  not  chosen  as  part  of 
the  Farm  Bill.  The  most  effective  closure  would  have  simply  returned  the  Com-
modity Exchange Act to the status quo ante prior to passage of the Enron Loophole. 

4 See Greenberger, supra note 1, at 11–12 (giving a complete discussion of the no action letter 

process including termination). 

5 See Greenberger, supra note 1, at 17 (providing a complete explanation of this solution). 
6 Food  Conservation  and  Energy  Act  of  2008,  Pub.  L.  No.  110–234,  § 13201;  122  Stat.  923 

(2008). 
7 Id. 
8 Id. 
9 Greenberger, supra note 1, at 7. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

18 

To  accomplish  this,  would  have  required  a  two  word  change  in  two  sections  of  the 
Act,  requiring  that  ‘‘energy’’  commodities  be  treated  as  ‘‘agricultural’’  commodities, 
thereby  requiring  that  all  energy  futures  trading  (as  is  now  true  of  all  agricultural 
futures trading) be done on regulated exchanges unless the regulated exchange dem-
onstrates the need for a legitimate regulatory exemption to CFTC under § 4(c) of the 
Act.10 
The Farm Bill Did Not Close the ‘‘Foreign’’ Board of Trade Exemption 

As  mentioned  above,  the  Intercontinental  Exchange  (ICE)  of  Atlanta,  Georgia  for 
purposes  of  its  facilitating  U.S.  delivered  WTI  crude  oil  futures,  is  deemed  by  the 
CFTC,  by  an  informal  staff  action,  to  be  a  U.K.  entity  not  subject  to  direct  CFTC 
regulation  even  though  ICE  maintains  U.S.  headquarters  and  trading  infrastruc-
ture,  facilitating,  inter  alia,  at  30  percent  of  trades  in  U.S.  WTI  futures.  Moreover, 
as  will  be  shown  below,11 the  Dubai  Mercantile  Exchange,  in  affiliation  with 
NYMEX, a U.S. exchange, has also commenced trading the U.S. delivered WTI con-
tract  on  U.S.  terminals,  but  is,  by  virtue  of  a  CFTC  no  action  letter,  regulated  by 
the  Dubai  Financial  Service  Authority.  The  CFTC  has  made  it  clear  that  the  Farm 
Bill  amendment  could  not  be  applied  to  cover  any  U.S.  delivered  crude  oil  futures 
contracts  on  the  ICE  or  DME.  Instead,  those  U.S.  trades  can  only  be  regulated  by 
the U.K. and Dubai, respectively. 

It has been a fundamental tenet, recognized by exchanges all over the world, that 
if the trading of futures contracts takes place within the United States, that trading, 
unless  otherwise  exempted  or  excluded  by  the  Act  itself  or  by  the  CFTC  through 
an  exemption  granted  pursuant  to  the  Futures  Trading  Practices  Act  of  1992,  (oth-
erwise  referred  to  as  section  4(c)),  is  subject  to  the  regulatory  jurisdiction  of  the 
Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission.12 Recognition  of  that  sweeping  reach  of 
U.S. jurisdiction is evidenced by the fact that most major foreign futures exchanges 
have asked the CFTC for an exemption from the full regulatory requirements of the 
Commodity  Exchange  Act  (CEA)  to  which  they  might  otherwise  be  subject  in  order 
to  allow  those  foreign  entities  to  conduct  trading  in  the  U.S.  on  U.S.-based  trading 
terminals of foreign delivered futures contracts.13 That exemption, premised on sec-
tion 4(c), has been issued to many foreign exchanges through staff no action letters, 
which permit trading on a foreign exchanges) U.S.-based terminals without that ex-
change being subject to U.S. statutory or regulatory requirements.14 

These  staff  no  action  letters  have  been  referred  to  as  Foreign  Board  of  Trade  ex-
emptions  (FBOTs)—a  term  which  as  of  today  is  nowhere  found  in  the  CEA.  This 
exemption  was  entirely  the  creation  of  CFTC  staff  and  it  has  never  been  formally 
approved by the Commission itself. 

The FBOT staff no action letters include many conditions controlling the scope of 
the exemption.15 For example, the foreign exchange must be regulated in its ‘‘home’’ 
country  by  a  regulatory  entity  that  ensures  that  there  will  be  no  fraud,  manipula-
tion,  or  excessive  speculation  on  those  exchanges  and  otherwise  offers  a  equivalent 
§regulatory  format  to  that  of  the  CFTC.16 These  staff  no  action  letters  also  require 
that  the  foreign  exchange  submit  trading  data  directly  to  the  CFTC  on  the  latter’s 
request for enforcement or investigative purposes and that the home regulator simi-
larly  make  its  own  trading  data  available  to  the  CFTC  upon  request.17 The  FBOT 
staff  no  action  letter  contemplates,  for  example,  if  fraud,  manipulation  or  excessive 
speculation  affecting  U.S.  commodity  markets  were  detected  by  the  CFTC,  the  no 
action  letter  would  be  terminated  immediately  and  enforcement  proceedings  would 

10 For  the  precise  description  of  this  two  word  legislative  fix,  see  Greenberger,  supra  note  1, 

at 13–14, 17. 

11 See infra notes 62–66 and accompanying text. 
12 Johnson  &  Hazen,  Derivatives  Reg.,  section  4.05[6]  at  p.  984  (2004  ed.)  (‘‘[E]ven  without 
substantial activity in the United States, jurisdiction will exist [even] when conduct abroad has 
a substantial effect on U.S. markets or U.S. investors.’’ (footnotes and citations omitted). 

13 See U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission, Foreign Boards of Trade Receiving Staff 
No  Action  Letters  Permitting  Direct  Access  from  the  U.S.,  http://services.cftc.gov/sirt/ 
sirt.aspx?Topic=ForeignTerminalRelief (last visited May 29, 2008). 

14 Id.  (showing  that  the  commission  has  issued  eighteen  no  action  letters  to  foreign  boards  of 

15 See 17 C.F.R. 140.99 (2008); CFTC Regulation 140.99 (2008); e.g., U.S. Commodity Futures 
Trading  Commission,  Access  to  Foreign  Markets  from  the  U.S.,  available  at  http:// 
www.cftc.gov/international/foreign  marketsandproducts/foreignmkts.html  (last  visited  May  29, 
2008). 

16 Greenberger, supra note 1, at 11–12; e.g., LIFFE Administration & Management, CFTC No- 

trade). 

Action Letter, 1999 CFTC Ltr. LEXIS 38, 64–66 (July 23, 1999). 

17 Greenberger, supra note 1, at 12; e.g., LIFFE, supra note16, at 68–71. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

19 

be  commenced  by  the  CFTC  against  the  foreign  exchange  for  its  adverse  impacts 
on U.S. markets and U.S. consumers.18 

The  staff  FBOT  no  action  letter  process  never  contemplated  that  an  exchange 
owned by or affiliated with a U.S. entity would escape the CFTC regulation imposed 
on  traditional  U.S.  exchanges.19 Nor  did  it  contemplate  that  foreign  exchanges 
would trade U.S. delivered contracts in direct competition with U.S. exchanges fully 
regulated by the CFTC.20 Finally, because the step of authorizing foreign exchanges 
to  trade  on  U.S.  soil  was  so  fraught  with  unforeseen  potential  problems,  the  staff 
FBOT  no  action  letters  by  their  terms  can  be  terminated  for  any  reason  or  for  no 
reason.21 

In response to this staff FBOT no action process, virtually every major foreign ex-
change in the world has placed its terminals within the U.S. pursuant to a no action 
letter.22 The latter factor evidences that fact that those many foreign exchanges rec-
ognize  that  they  cannot  obtain  desirable  liquidity  or  compete  effectively  worldwide 
without a U.S. terminal presence. It is therefore a further fundamental tenet of fu-
tures trading that foreign exchanges must have a U.S. presence to do trading. How-
ever, none of these FBOT exchanges, save the Intercontinental Exchange (ICE) and 
the  Dubai  Mercantile  Exchange  (DME)  mentioned  below,  is  owned  by  or  affiliated 
with a U.S. entity; nor do they trade U.S. delivered futures contracts. 

The  former  International  Petroleum  Exchange  (IPE),  a  British  exchange  then 
trading  foreign  delivered  petroleum  contracts  with  trading  matching  done  in  Lon-
don,  received  a  CFTC  staff  FBOT  no  action  letter  permitting  the  presence  of  U.S. 
IPE terminals to trade foreign contracts.23 In 2001(?), IPE was bought by the Inter-
continental  Exchange  an  Atlanta-based,  U.S.-owned  exchange  whose  prominent 
founders were, inter alia, Goldman Sachs, Morgan Stanley and British Petroleum.24 
Sometime  after  2001,  it  is  my  understanding  that  the  trade  matching  computer-
ized  systems  for  all  ICE  trades  were  brought  to  the  United  States.  ICE  has  a  U.K. 
subsidiary, ICE Futures Europe, but that that subsidiary is does not ultimately con-
trol the trading on ICE; nor, as I understand it, are the ICE trade matching engines 
within the U.K.25 In January, 2006, ICE announced that it would trade West Texas 
Intermediate (WTI) crude oil contracts, a contract which had theretofore been trad-
ed  exclusively  on  the  New  York  Mercantile  Exchange  (NYMEX),  an  exchange  fully 
regulated  by  the  CFTC.26 It  is  my  understanding  that  this  was  the  first  time  that 
a  ‘‘foreign’’  exchange  operating  under  an  FBOT  traded  on  its  U.S.  terminals  a  U.S. 
delivered futures contract. Despite the fact that ICE is now a U.S.-owned exchange 
with U.S. trading engines trading U.S. delivered crude oil contracts, the CFTC con-
tinues  to  treat  that  exchange  as  a  U.K.  entity  for  purposes  of  its  energy  contracts 
to be directly regulated exclusively by the Financial Services Authority (FSA) of the 
United Kingdom.27 

For  purposes  of  U.S.  delivered  natural  gas  futures  contracts,  ICE  has  also  been 
exempt from CFTC regulation by the so-called Enron Loophole passed as part of the 
Commodity Futures Modernization Act of 2000.28 As part of the CFTC Reauthoriza-
tion  Act  within  the  recently  passed  Farm  Bill,  provision  was  made  for  the  CFTC 
on  a  case-by-case  basis  to  demonstrate  that  an  energy  contract  deregulated  by  the 
Enron  Loophole  has  a  ‘‘significant  price  discovery  function,’’  thereby  bringing  that 
contract  under  CFTC  jurisdiction.29 Were  it  not  for  the  staff  FBOT  no  action  letter 

18 Greenberger, supra note 1, at 12; e.g., LIFFE, supra note 16, at 64. 
19 Greenberger, supra note 1, at 12. 
20 Id. 
21 Greenberger, supra note 1, at 12; e.g., LIFFE, supra note 16, at 73. 
22 U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission, Foreign Boards of Trade Receiving Staff No 
Action  Letters  Permitting  Direct  Access  from  the  U.S.,  http://services.cftc.gov/sirt/sirt.aspx? 
Topic=ForeignTerminalRelief (last visited May 29, 2008). 

23 IPE, CFTC No-Action Letter, 1999 CFTC Ltr. LEXIS 152, 53 (Nov. 12, 1999). 
24 See IPE, CFTC No-Action Letter, 2002 CFTC Ltr. LEXIS 90, 3 fn.3 (July 26, 2002). 
25 See  ICE  Futures  Europe,  available  at  https://www.theice.com/aboutlfutures.jhtml  (last 

visited May 29, 2008). 

26 Permanent  Subcommittee  on  Investigations  of  the  Committee  on  Homeland  Security  and 
Governmental  Affairs,  THE ROLE OF MARKET SPECULATION IN RISING OIL AND GAS PRICES:  A 
NEED TO PUT THE COP BACK ON THE BEAT 5 (June 27, 2006). 

27 U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission, Foreign Boards of Trade Receiving Staff No 
Action  Letters  Permitting  Direct  Access  from  the  U.S.,  http://services.cftc.gov/sirt/sirt.aspx? 
Topic=ForeignTerminalRelief (last visited May 29, 2008); see, e.g., ICE, CFTC No-Action Letter, 
2003 CFTC Ltr. LEXIS 3 (2003). 

28 See 7 U.S.C. § 2(h)(3) and (g) (2000). 
29 See Food Conservation and Energy Act of 2008, Pub. L. No. 110–234, § 13201; 122 Stat. 923 
(2008). As noted above, the Farm Bill amendment has inherent weaknesses standing on its own. 
See supra notes 6–10 and accompanying text. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

20 

given to the IPE to trade foreign crude oil contracts outside of CFTC regulation, the 
West  Texas  Intermediate  (WTI)  futures  contract  traded  on  ICE  would  doubtless  be 
deemed a contract that significantly affects price discovery under the new Farm Bill 
amendment. Accordingly, it would be subject to U.S. regulation. 

While the plain language of the Farm Bill amendment by its terms does not con-
template  exemptions  for  U.S.  delivered  contract  affecting  price  discovery,  even  if 
traded  by  a  foreign  exchange,  the  CFTC  and  ICE  have  maintained  that  the  ICE 
traded WTI contract will nevertheless continue to be outside the CFTC’s jurisdiction 
even  if  the  Farm  Bill  amendment  were  applied  to  it.  Again,  this  conclusion  relies, 
not  on  statutory  language,  but  on  the  1999  staff  no  action  letter  issued  to  the  old 
British based IPE.30 That is, even if the CFTC found (as it almost certainly would) 
that the WTI contract significantly affects the price of crude oil, gasoline, and heat-
ing oil to U.S. consumers, the CFTC and ICE have taken the position that that con-
tract  as  traded  on  ICE  will  continue  to  be  outside  the  CFTC’s  jurisdiction.31 In 
short,  ICE  will  continue  to  be  regulated  by  the  U.K.’s  Financial  Services  Authority 
for  purposes  of  the  WTI  contract  traded  on  its  U.S.  terminals  instead  of  the  CFTC. 
The  Senate  Permanent  Investigating  Subcommittee  has  now  issued  two  reports, 
one  in  June  2006 32 and  one  in  June  2007 33,  that  make  a  very  strong  (if  not  irref-
utable case) that trading on ICE has been used to manipulate or excessively specu-
late  in  U.S.  delivered  crude  oil  and  natural  gas  contracts.34 The  June  2006  report 
cited economists who then concluded that when a barrel of crude was at $77 in June 
2006, $20 to $30 dollars of that cost was due to excessive speculation and/or manip-
ulation on unregulated exchanges.35 If that assessment is correct, at one quarter of 
the  price  of  crude  oil,  and  crude  oil,  derivatives,  such  as  gasoline  and  heating  oil, 
are  the  direct  result  of  market  malpractices  by  traders.  Of  course,  we  also  know 
through  U.S.  enforcement  actions  and  criminal  prosecutions  that  Enron,  using  the 
Enron Loophole, for its Enron Online (an exchange that was deregulated in the way 
ICE is deregulated today), drove the price of electricity up almost 300 percent a year 
for California consumers in the 2000–2001 era.36 

The  CFTC  has  vigorously  maintained  that  the  U.K.’s  FSA  regulatory  model  is  at 
the ‘‘forefront internationally’’ 37 and that it has shared meaningful market informa-
tion  about  ICE  WTI  trades  with  the  CFTC.38 It  is  self  evident,  however,  when  a 
barrel  of  crude  is  approaching  $140  and  predicted  by  Goldman  Sachs  to  soon  pass 

30 See  Written  Testimony  of  Jeffrey  Harris,  Chief  Economist  Before  the  Committee  on  Energy 
and  Natural  Resources  U.S.  Senate,  5–7  (2008)  available  at  http://www.cftc.gov/stellent/ 
groups/public/  @newsroom/documents/speechandtestimony/opaharris040308.pdf  (last  visited 
May  29,  2008);  Written  Testimony  of  Jeffrey  C.  Sprecher,  Chairman  and  CEO  of  Interconti-
nental  Exchange,  Natural  Gas  Hearings 
(2007)  available  at  https://www.theice.com/ 
showpr.jhtml?id=6685;  Written  Testimony  of  Sir  Bob  Reid,  Chairman  ICE  Futures,  Before  the 
Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission  Public  Hearing  on  Foreign  Boards  of  Trade  (2006) 
available  at  https://www.theice.com/publicdocs/press/TESTIMONYlOFlSIRlBOBlREID 
lJUNl27.pdf (last visited May 29, 2008). 

31 See supra note 30 and accompanying text. 
32 Permanent  Subcommittee  on  Investigations  of  the  Committee  on  Homeland  Security  and 
Governmental  Affairs,  THE ROLE OF MARKET SPECULATION IN RISING OIL AND GAS PRICES:  A 
NEED TO PUT THE COP BACK ON THE BEAT (June 27, 2006) [hereinafter June 2006 Report]. 

33 Permanent  Subcommittee  on  Investigations  of  the  Committee  on  Homeland  Security  and 
Governmental  Affairs,  EXCESSIVE SPECULATION IN THE NATURAL GAS MARKET,  (June  25,  2007) 
[hereinafter June 2007 Report]. 

34 See June 2007 Report at 4, 6, 8, 51–53, 111, 119; June 2006 Report at 40–41, 49. 
35 June 2006 Report, supra note 32, at 2, 23. George Soros recently warned that ‘‘Speculation 
. . .  is  increasingly  affecting  the  price.  . . .  The  price  has  this  parabolic  shape  which  is  char-
acteristic  of  bubbles.’’  Edmund  Conway,  George  Soros:  rocketing  oil  price  is  a  bubble,  DAILY 
TELEGRAPH (May  27,  2008)  available  at  http://www.telegraph.co.uk/money/main.jhtml?  xml=/ 
money/2008/05/26/cnsoros126.xml (last visited May 29, 2008). 

36 Peter Navarro & Michael Shames, Aftershocks—And Essential Lessons—From the California 

Electricity Debacle, 16 ELECTRICITY J. 24, 24 (2003). 

37 Walter  Lukken,  Acting  Chairman  CFTC,  Letters  to  the  Editor:  CFTC  proud  of  its  strong 
partnership  with  the  Fsa,  FIN.  TIMES (April  25,  2008)  available  at:  http://search.ft.com/ 
ftArticle?queryText=%22US+regulator+takes+FSA+to+task+over+poor+derivatives+oversight&y= 
12&aje=true&x=9&id=080422000166&ct=0 (last visited May 29, 2008). 

38 Id.  See  also  Walter  Lukken,  CFTC  Commissioner,  Remarks  to  the  Federation  of  European 
Securities Commissions: Smart Regulation for the Global Marketplace (June 26, 2007) available 
at http://www.cftc.gov/newsroom/speechestestimony/opalukken–25.html; Walter Lukken, CFTC 
Commissioner, Address at the ISDA Energy, Commodities and Developing Products Conference: 
The  Derivatives  World  is  Flat  (June  14,  2006)  available  at  http://www.cftc.gov/newsroom/ 
speechestestimony/opalukken–20.html (last visited May 29, 2008). But see infra notes 71–74 and 
accompanying  textual  discussion  (where  on  May  29,  2008,  the  CFTC  had  suddenly  reversed  its 
stance in its regard). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

21 

$200 39 (with  attendant  high  prices  being  paid  by  U.S.  consumers  for  gasoline  and 
heating oil) that U.S. regulators would need and want real time, fully audited data 
pertaining to the critically important WTI contract; rather than data passed by ICE 
from  the  U.S.  to  the  FSA  and  then  from  the  FSA  to  the  CFTC  in  a  haphazard,  in-
complete,  and  unaudited  fashion.  In  fact,  confidence  in  the  legitimacy  of  the  infor-
mation  being  shared  between  the  CFTC  and  FSA  has  led  to  the  CFTC  to  insist  on 
May 29 that it receive better data from the FSA and ICE in order to probe whether 
there has been improper ‘‘market manipulation’’ in the crude oil markets.40 

Recognizing  that  the  CFTC  and  ICE  are  taking  the  position  that  the  new  ‘‘End 
the  Enron  Loophole’’  rider  on  the  Farm  Bill  will  not  reach  WTI  trading  on  ICE,  S. 
2995 was introduced on May 8, 2008, to address the FBOT exemption under which 
ICE is operating outside of CFTC jurisdiction for the purposes of crude oil.41 

The major tenet of that legislation is that any exchange operating under an FBOT 
exemption may only do so if the CFTC finds that the non-U.S. regulator has regula-
tion  that  is  equivalent  to  that  of  the  U.S.  in  several  respects.42 Acting  Chairman 
Lukken  has  already  repeatedly  stated  that  he  has  concluded  that  the  U.K.’s  FSA 
regulation is not only comparable, but a model for U.S. regulators.43 This statement 
is  reflected  in  the  no  action  letters  that  have  already  been  awarded  to  ICE  and, 
more  recently,  to  the  Dubai  Mercantile  Exchange,  where  the  CFTC  has  concluded 
that  the  Dubai  Financial  Service  Authority’s  regulation  of  oil  futures  markets  ‘‘is 
the equivalent of the’’ CFTC.44 

Thus, if S. 2995 is enacted, it will preserve the status quo of FBOTs being allowed 
to  trade  U.S.  delivered  energy  future  contracts  within  the  United  States,  but  not 
be  subject  to  U.S.  regulation.  For  example,  ICE-even  though  U.S.-owned  with  U.S. 
trading engines, trading critically important U.S. delivered energy futures contracts 
(contracts  that  would  almost  certainly  otherwise  by  regulated  under  the  End  the 
Enron  Loophole  amendment)—would  continue  to  be  regulated  by  the  United  King-
dom.  Similarly,  the  DME,  in  partnership  with  U.S.-owned  NYMEX  will  continue  to 
trade  the  U.S.  delivered  WTI  contract  within  the  U.S.,  but  be  regulated  by  the 
Dubai Mercantile Exchange. 

Allowing  ICE,  DME  and  other  FBOTs  to  be  regulated  by  foreign  regulators,  like 
the  U.K.’s  Financial  Services  Authority  and  the  Dubai  Financial  Service  Authority, 
undermines the stability of the U.S. crude oil futures markets. CFTC Commissioner 
Bart  Chilton  has  recently  stated,  ‘‘I  am  generally  concerned  about  a  lack  of  trans-
parency  and  the  need  for  greater  oversight  and  enforcement  of  the  derivatives  in-
dustry  by  the  FSA.’’ 45 Similar  concerns  have  been  already  been  voiced  by  experts 
who argue that the U.K. Financial Services Authority’s public disclosure, regulatory 

39 Neil  King  Jr.  and  Spencer  Swartz,  U.S.  News:  Some  See  Oil  at  $150  This  Year—Range  of 

Factors May Sustain Surge; $4.50-a-Gallon Gas, WALL ST. J., May 7, 2008, at A3. 

40 U.S.  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission,  CFTC  Announces  Multiple  Energy  Market 
Initiatives,  available  at  http://www.cftc.gov/newsroom/general  pressreleases/2008/pr5503– 
08.html  (last  visited  May  30,  2008)  (stating  that  the  CFTC  has  begun  increased  surveillance  of 
crude  oil  market  prices);  James  Quinn,  Oil  prices  to  be  probed  by  U.S.  regulator  CFTC,  DAILY 
TELEGRAPH (May  30,  2008)  available  at  http://www.telegraph.co.uk/money/main.  jhtml?xml=/ 
money/2008/05/30/cnoil130.xml  (last  visited  May  30,  2008)  (stating  that  the  CFTC  ‘‘has 
launched  an  unprecedented  investigation  into  possible  market  manipulation  in  the  U.S.  crude 
oil market amid record prices’’ that has caused critical damage to the global economy). 

41 Oil  Trading  Transparency  Act,  S.  2995,  110th  Cong.  (2008);  e.g.,  Press  Release,  Levin  and 
Feinstein  Introduce  Oil  Trading  Transparency  Act  (May  8,  2008)  available  at  http://fein-
stein.senate.gov/public/index.cfm? 
FuseAction=NewsRoom.PressReleases&ContentRecordlid= 
de99b838–011a–438e–02af–23a90bb2fca9&Regionlid=&Issuelid=  (last  visited  May  29,  2008); 
Press Release, Levin and Feinstein Introduce Oil Trading Transparency Act (May 8, 2008) avail-
able at http://levin.senate.gov/newsroom/release.cfm?id=297513 (last visited May 29, 2008). 

42 Oil Trading Transparency Act, S. 2995, 110th Cong. § 2(e)(1)(a) (2008). 
43 See supra notes 37–38 and accompanying text. 
44 See IPE, CFTC No-Action Letter, 1999 CFTC Ltr. Lexis 152, 53 (Nov. 12, 1999); Dubai Mer-

cantile Exchange, CFTC No-Action Letter, 2007 CFTC Ltr. Lexis 6 (May 24, 2007). 

45 Jeremy Grant, Companies & Markets: U.S. regulator takes FSA to task for poor derivatives 
oversight,  Fin.  Times  (April  22,  2008)  available  at:  http://search.ft.com/ftArticle?query 
Text=%22US+regulator+takes+FSA+to+task+over+poor+derivatives+oversight&y=12&aje=true&x 
=9&id=080422000166&ct=0  (last  visited  May  29,  2008);  see,  e.g.,  Testimony  of  Jane  Carlin, 
Chairwoman, Over-the-Counter Derivative Products Committee, Securities Industry Association, 
Hearing  on  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission  Reauthorization  before  the  House  Agri-
(May  20,  1999)  available  at  http://www.sifma.org/legislative/ 
culture  Committee 
testimony/archives/Carlin5–20–99.html  (last  visited  May  30,  2008);  June  2006  Report,  supra 
note  32,  at  49.  ‘‘To  continue  the  present  situation,  in  which  the  CFTC  does  not  police  two  of 
three major markets trading U.S. energy futures, is to turn a blind eye to an increasingly large 
segment  of  these  markets,  thereby  impairing  the  ability  to  detect,  prevent,  and  prosecute  mar-
ket manipulation and fraud.’’ Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

22 

oversight  and  enforcement  actions  are  much  more  lax  than  the  CFTC’s  regulation 
of exchanges and transactions.46 

For example, during last summer’s subprime mortgage crisis, Northern Rock PLC, 
one  of  the  U.K.’s  largest  banks,  had  difficulty  raising  funds  and  borrowed  billions 
of  dollars  from  the  U.K.’s  central  bank.47 After  news  of  the  bailout  was  released  to 
the  public,  thousands  of  customers  wary  of  losing  their  savings  stood  in  long  lines 
for  several  days  outside  of  Northern  Rock’s  branches  to  withdraw  deposits.48 With 
Northern  Rock  on  the  brink  of  collapse,  FSA  provided  over  $100  billion  in  loans  to 
the bank and in February 2008, the British government finally was required to na-
tionalize it.49 In March 2008, FSA published an internal report stating that its regu-
lation of Northern Rock ‘‘was not carried out to a standard that is acceptable,’’ and 
highlighted  FSA’s  failure  to  provide  adequate  supervision,  oversight,  and  re-
sources.50 In addition to FSA’s self-criticism, earlier this month the European Union 
opened a formal investigation into FSA’s restructuring of Northern Rock.51 

This  series  of  events  exemplifies  FSA’s  inability  to  provide  regulatory  oversight 
and  enforcement  that  is  equivalent  to  the  CFTC.52 Yet,  that  is  the  very  conclusion 
the  CFTC  adopts  today  as  it  continues  to  look  to  the  FSA  as  a  ‘‘model’’  regulator. 
To the extent that S. 2995 leaves it in the hands of the FSA and the Dubai Finan-
cial  Service  Authority  to  govern  the  trading  of  WTI  contracts  on  U.S.  terminals 
without  U.S.  supervision  on  a  finding  of  ‘‘comparability’’  or  ‘‘equivalency,’’  it  affords 
the  U.S.  consumer  virtually  no  meaningful  protection  from  fraud,  manipulation,  or 
excessive  speculation  in  these  markets.  For  almost  eight  decades  the  prevention  of 
fraud,  manipulation,  and  excessive  speculation  was  the  foremost  Congressional 
promise  to  those  who  need  to  trade  in  these  markets  to  protect  their  commercial 
well being. 

Indeed, the language of S. 2995 either expressly or implicitly concedes two critical 
points. First, there is no statute to date that provides any exemption for U.S. trad-
ing  on  Foreign  Boards  of  Trade.  The  Commodity  Exchange  Act  says  nothing  about 
Foreign  Boards  of  Trade.53 The  proposed  legislation  then  wholly  endorses  the  con-
cept of an FBOT exemption despite the fact that many have argued that any foreign 
exchange  which  wants  to  introduce  trading  of  its  contracts  in  the  U.S.  ought  to  be 
regulated  by  the  CFTC  just  as  U.S.  Designated  Contract  Markets  (DCMs)  are  so 
regulated.54 

Certainly the question whether a foreign exchange may trade U.S. delivered com-
modities  within  the  U.S.  free  of  U.S.  regulation  should  be  the  subject  of  extensive 
debate.  S.  2995,  which  has  not  had  the  benefit  of  a  full  hearing  in  either  House  of 
Congress, by its terms when read in light of long standing CFTC practices not only 
sanctions U.K. regulation of ICE’s WTI trading; it opens the door to any foreign ex-
change  operating  under  an  FBOT  exemption  escaping  U.S.  regulation  for  any  U.S. 
delivered  commodity,  e.g.,  the  Henry  Hub  natural  gas  contract,  based  solely  on  the 
‘‘comparability’’  finding  by  the  CFTC—a  finding  which  the  CFTC  has  been  quite 
generous  in  granting.  Under  that  rationale,  there  is  nothing  to  prevent  the  Dubai 
futures exchanges from trading Henry Hub natural gas futures contracts within the 
U.S. free of U.S. oversight on a finding by the CFTC of comparability of Dubai regu-
lators,  which  the  CFTC  has  already  done  in  the  Dubai  Mercantile  Exchange  no  ac-

46 See  Allistair  MacDonald,  Assessing  U.K.  Watchdog:  FSA’s  Regulatory  Model  Gets  Some 
Raves  in  U.S.;  A  Lapdog  at  Home?,  WALL STREET J.,  July  23,  2007,  available  at  http://on-
line.wsj.com/article/SB118515214144274556.html (last visited May 29, 2008); Steve Pearlstein, 
Auditing  Reform:  Mission  Accomplished!,  Wash.  Post,  Dec.  15,  2006,  available  at  http:// 
(last 
www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/  content/article/2006/12/14/AR2006121401796.html 
visited May 29, 2008). 

47 See  BBC  NEWS,  Rock  expects  £30bn  loan  this  year,  Nov.  7,  2007,  available  at  http:// 

news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/business/7073556.stm (last visited May 29, 2008). 

48 See  Crisis  deepens  for  Northern  Rock,  REUTERS Sep.  17,  2007,  available  at  http:// 

www.iht.com/articles/2007/09/17/asia/17northern.php (last visited May 29, 2008). 

49 See  Stephen  Castle,  EU  to  investigate  Northern  Rock  nationalization  in  Britain,  INTER-
NATIONAL HERALD TRIBUNE,  April  2,  2008,  available  at  http://www.iht.com/articles/2008/04/ 
02/business/rock.php (last visited May 29, 2008). 

50 See ASSOCIATED PRESS, British regulator admits failings in oversight of Northern Rock, an-
nounces new procedures, INTERNATIONAL HERALD TRIBUNE, March 26, 2008, available at http:// 
www1.wsvn.com/news/articles/world/MI81198/ (last visited May 29, 2008). 

51 See Castle, supra note 49. 
52 It  is  also  worth  noting  that  ‘‘the  FSA  places  an  emphasis  on  deterrence,  rather  than  the 

use of high-profile prosecutions and fines in the US.’’ Grant, supra note 45. 

53 See  generally  Oil  Trading  Transparency  Act,  S.  2995,  110th  Cong.  § 2  (2008);  Commodity 

Exchange Act, 7 U.S.C. § 1 (2008). 

54 See, e.g., Ian Talley, Congress Seeks to Curb Oil Speculation, SMARTMONEY (May 28 , 2008) 
available  at  http://www.smartmoney.com/breaking-news/ON/index.cfm?story=ON–20080528– 
000641–1015 (last visited May 29, 2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

23 

tion  letter.  If  that  were  to  happen,  the  only  salient  feature  of  the  End  the  Enron 
Loophole  amendment  (regulating  Henry  Hub  natural  gas  contracts  which  are  now 
traded  on  ICE  outside  of  an  FBOT  exemption)  would  be  undercut  by  foreign  ex-
changes  escaping  that  reform  by  trading  in  the  U.S.  under  their  foreign  flag  and 
being regulated by their ‘‘comparable’’ foreign regulator. 

I  understand  that  the  argument  has  been  advanced  by  certain  investment  banks 
and  their  representatives  that  if  Congress  does  not  accede  to  S.  2995,  they  have 
threatened  to  move  their  trading  ‘‘offshore’’  to  escape  U.S.  regulation  of  foreign  ex-
changes.55 However,  the  entire  history  of  these  markets  is  that  every  foreign  ex-
change badly needs to trade within the U.S. That is evidenced by the eighteen staff 
FBOT  no  action  letters  issued  to  foreign  exchanges  to  date.56 The  desire  to  be  in 
the  U.S.  is  so  prevalent  that  ICE  apparently  brought  its  IPE  trading  engines  and 
trading matching systems to the U.S.-not just its trading terminals.57 

The argument is also advanced that the investment banks will figure out a clever 
technological  way  to  ‘‘trade  abroad’’  with  U.S.-based  technology  that  will  fall  short 
of  traditional  terminals.  In  that  way,  these  traders  say  they  can  stay  within  the 
U.S. but appear to be trading offshore. However, if there is any trading in the U.S. 
of  any  kind  (whatever  the  technology)  of  a  futures  contract  within  the  U.S.  of  a  fu-
tures  contract  anywhere,  it  is  subject  to  U.S.  jurisdiction.58 Indeed,  if  U.S.  citizens 
manipulate  foreign  exchanges,  they  are  subject  to  criminal  sanctions  and,  in  most 
instances,  would  be  extradited  back  to  the  U.S.  to  face  criminal  charges  if  not  civil 
fines  if  that  impacted  domestic  markets  and  those  exchanges  had  any  meaningful 
contacts with the U.S.59 

Indeed,  if  one  were  to  be  swept  away  by  speculative  and  hypothetical  fever  prof-
fered  by  the  investment  banks  about  the  terrible  things  that  would  happen  if  S. 
2995  does  not  pass,  why  would  one  not  worry  that  a  U.S.  exchange,  such  as 
NYMEX,  might  flee  U.S.  restrictions  by  affiliating  with  a  ‘‘foreign’’  exchange  freed 
from  U.S.  supervision  under  the  proposed  legislation.  NYMEX  has  already  estab-
lished  joint  ventures  with  Dubai,  which  the  CFTC  finds  to  be  a  country  with  com-
parable regulation. 

Foremost  is  the  Dubai  Mercantile  Exchange,  which  is  a  joint  venture  between 
NYMEX,  Tatweer  (a  member  of  Dubai  Holding)  and  the  Oman  Investment  Fund.60 
This entity is regulated by the Dubai Financial Services Authority 61 and was grant-
ed  a  CFTC  no  action  letter  in  2007.62 As  of  May  16,  2008,  the  DME  with  NYMEX 
as  its  partner  received  CFTC  approval  to  begin  trading  WTI  contracts.63 In  this 
way,  NYMEX  now  effectively  participates  in  the  trading  of  the  DME  of  a  critically 
important U.S. delivered contract on U.S. terminals owned by the DME while escap-
ing U.S. oversight on the DME’s U.S. terminals. I worry that NYMEX’s escape from 
U.S. control of these U.S. DME trades is wholly consistent with S. 2995.64 

Finally,  S.  2995  does  not  incorporate  all  of  the  conditions  within  the  present 
FBOT no action letter typically issued by CFTC staff.65 Most importantly, the legis-

from 

55 See Carlin, supra note 45. 
56 U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission, Foreign Boards of Trade Receiving Staff No 
the  U.S.,  http://services.cftc.gov/sirt/ 

Action  Letters  Permitting  Direct  Access 
sirt.aspx?Topic=ForeignTerminalRelief (last visited May 29, 2008). 

57 See IPE, CFTC No-Action Letter, 1999 CFTC Ltr. Lexis 152 (Nov. 12, 1999). The letter ex-
plained  the  ‘‘request,  on  behalf  of  The  International  Petroleum  Exchange  of  London  Limited, 
(‘‘IPE’’  or  ‘‘Exchange’’)  and  its  members,  that  the  Division  grant  no-action  relief  to  permit  IPE 
to  make  its  electronic  trading  and  order  matching  system,  known  as  Energy  Trading  System 
II (ETS), available to IPE members in the United States.’’ Id. 

58 See Johnson & Hazen, supra note 12. 
59 See Press Release, Department of Justice, U.S. Charges 47 After Long-Term Undercover In-
vestigation  Involving  Foreign  Exchange  Markets,  and  (Nov.  19,  2003),  available  at  http:// 
www.fbi.gov/dojpressrel/pressrel03/wooden111903.htm. 

2007). 

60 Dubai  Mercantile  Exchange  (DME),  http://www.dubaimerc.com/  (last  visited  May  29, 

2008). 
61 Id. 
62 Dubai  Mercantile  Exchange,  CFTC  No-Action  § Letter,  2007  CFTC  Ltr.  Lexis  6  (May  24, 

63 Babu Das Augustine, Dubai ‘could emerge as derivatives trading hub’, GULFNEWS.COM (May 
16,  2008)  available  at  http://www.gulfnews.com/business/General/10213595.html  (last  visited 
June 1, 2008). 

64 See generally Oil Trading Transparency Act, S. 2995, 110th Cong. § 2 (e)(1)(a) (2008). 
65 See  id.;  17  C.F.R.  140.99  (2008);  CFTC  Regulation  140.99  (2008).  Some  officials  are  also 
skeptical  of  the  assertion  that  the  CFTC  and  FSA  have  comparable  regulatory  structures  be-
cause, ‘‘exchanges in London are not required to monitor daily trading to prevent manipulation, 
publish  daily  trading  information,  or  impose  and  enforce  position  limits  that  prevent  excessive 
speculation.’’ Senator Dianne Feinstein & Senator Olympia J. Snowe, Letter to Walter Lukken, 
Acting  Chair  of  the  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission  (2008)  available  at  http://fein-
Continued 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

24 

lation  does  not  provide  (as  to  the  staff  FBOT  no  action  letters)  that  upon  detecting 
fraud, manipulation, or excessive speculation by the FBOT, the CFTC can terminate 
the  no  action  letter  and/or  can  charge  traders  on  FBOT  for  those  malpractices.  S. 
2995  leaves  that  issue  untouched  and,  by  implication,  I  fear  that  it  will  allow  the 
CFTC to follow its well worn path of least resistance: i.e., place enforcement respon-
sibilities  on  the  Dubai  Financial  Services  Authority,  for  example,  to  remedy  exces-
sive  gasoline  prices  paid  by  American  consumers.  In  sum,  voters,  I  am  sure,  will 
not  accept  lightly  a  pronouncement  of  Congressional  futility  evidenced  by  a  failure 
to  insist  on  full  U.S.  regulation  of  U.S.  trading  in  U.S.  delivered  commodities  by 
U.S.-owned  entities  merely  because  certain  U.S.  resident  managers  of,  inter  alia, 
U.S. investment banks and hedge funds have threatened to take their business (but 
not themselves) to foreign countries—especially when those threats defy every basic 
premise  of  futures  trading,  i.e.,  the  need  of  each  of  each  the  world’s  futures  ex-
changes  wherever  they  are  located  to  have  a  vibrant  U.S.-based  market.  Once  fu-
tures  trading  of  any  kind  is  initiated  within,  or  has  substantial  impacts  upon,  the 
U.S., the trader is fully subject to U.S. civil and criminal jurisdiction. If those trad-
ers  wish  to  leave  the  U.S.  permanently  to  conduct  their  business  and  otherwise 
enjoy  their  leisure  time  abroad,  it  seems  self  evident  that  that  is  a  circumstance 
that the overwhelming majority of your constituents now unnecessarily paying $4.00 
and up for a gallon of gasoline will gladly accept. 
The CFTC’s Newly Announced ‘‘Multiple Energy Market Initiatives’’ 

For  at  least  the  last  2  years,  two  Acting  Chairmen  of  the  CFTC  (Sharon  Brown- 
Hruska  and  then  Walter  Lukken),  and  the  CFTC  Chief  Economist,  Jeffrey  Harris, 
have repeatedly assured Congress, market participants, and anyone else who would 
listen, that the dramatic rise in crude oil, natural gas, gasoline, heating oil, and ag-
ricultural  products  is  caused  exclusively  by  supply/demand  market  fundamentals.66 
These  regulators  have  based  their  conclusions  on  the  CFTC’s  ‘‘exhaustive’’  research 
of all relevant market data.67 

Indeed, as recently as May 20, 2008 before the full Senate Homeland Security and 
Government Affairs Committee, the CFTC’s Mr. Harris, testified that ‘‘ ‘all the data 
we  have  analyzed  indicates  that  that  little  economic  evidence  exists  that  dem-
onstrates  that  futures  prices  are  being  systematically  driven  by  the  speculators  in 
the  [agriculture]  and  energy  markets.’  . . .  [O]ur  comprehensive  analysis  of  the  ac-
tual  position  data  of  these  traders  fails  to  support  the  contention’’  that  there  is  ex-
cessive  speculation  or  manipulation.  Rather,  he  said  prices  are  being  driven  ‘‘by 
powerful economic fundamental forces and the laws of supply demand.’’ 68 

I have already cited the abundance of informed academic and trader opinion that 
reaches  conclusions  quite  the  opposite  of  those  of  Ms.  Brown-Hruska  and  Messrs. 

stein.senate.gov/public/index.cfm?FuseAction=NewsRoom.PressReleases&ContentRecordlid= 
c9784c93–0be4–0e7d-e6b2–05bce9339894&IsPrint=true (last visited May 29, 2008). 

66 Walt  Lukken,  CFTC,  Acting  Chairman,  Prepared  Remarks:  Compliance  and  Enforcement 
in  Energy  Mkts.—The  CFTC  Perspective  (Jan.  18,  2008)  available  at  http://www.cftc.gov/ 
stellent/groups/public/@newsroom/documents/speechandtestimony/opalukken–34.pdf  (last  vis-
ited  June  1,  2008)  (quoting  Mr.  Walter  Lukken  ‘‘While  speculators  play  a  integral  role  in  the 
futures  markets,  the  report  concludes  that  speculative  buying,  as  a  whole  does  not  appear  to 
drive  up  price.’’);  Tina  Seeley,  Energy  Mkts.  Not  Manipulated,  U.S.  Regulator  Says  (Update  1), 
BLOOMBERG.COM (May  7,  2008),  available  at  http://www.bloomberg.com/apps/news?pid 
=20601072&sid=aX0iaEd9bOMU&refer=energy  (last  visited  June  1,  2008)  (quoting  Mr.  Walter 
Lukken  ‘‘We  have  not  seen  that  speculators  are  a  major  factor  in  driving  these  prices.’’);  Ian 
Talley and Stephen Power, Regulator Faults Energy-Futures Proposal, Wall St. J. (May 9, 2008), 
(stating  that  Mr.  Walter  Lukken  commented  that  his  agency  hadn’t  seen  evidence  indicating 
that  speculators  are  ‘‘a  major  factor’’  in  driving  up  oil  prices);  Oral  Testimony  of  Walter  L. 
Lukken,  Commissioner,  CFTC,  Before  the  Committee  on  Agriculture,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives,  (April  27,  2006)  (quoting  Mr.  Walter  Lukken  ‘‘[B]ased  on  our  surveillance  efforts  to  date, 
we  believe  that  crude  oil  and  gasoline  futures  markets  have  been  accurately  reflecting  the  un-
derlying  fundamentals  of  these  markets.’’);  Sharon  Brown-Hruska,  CFTC,  Chairman,  Address 
before  the  International  Monetary  Fund:  Futures  Mkts.  in  the  Energy  Sector  (Jun.  15,  2006) 
available  at  http://www.cftc.gov/newsroom/speechestestimony/opabrownhruska–46.html  (last 
visited  Jun.  1,  2008)  (stating  ‘‘To  date,  the  staff’s  findings  have  shown  that  these  large  specu-
lators  as  a  group  tend  to  inject  liquidity  into  the  markets  rather  than  having  an  undue  impact 
on price movements.’’) (last visited June 1, 2008); Sharon Brown-Hruska, CFTC, Chairman, Key-
note  Address  at  the  Managed  Funds  Association  Annual  Forum  (Jun.  25,  2005)  available  at 
http://www.cftc.gov/opa/speeches05/opabrownhruska34.htm (last visited June 1, 2008) (stating 
the  CFTC’s  study  of  the  role  of  managed  funds  in  our  markets,  ‘‘[C]ontradicts  with  force  the 
anecdotal observations and conventional wisdom regarding hedge funds and speculators, in gen-
eral.’’). 

67 See, e.g., supra note 66 and accompanying text. 
68 Richard  Hill,  Lieberman  Says  He  Will  Consider  Legislation  to  Address  Commodity  Prices, 

40 BNA 21 (May 26, 2008)) (emphasis added). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

25 

Lukken  and  Harris.69 Those  who  have  blamed  speculation  as  a  material  factor  in 
the rise of energy prices have estimated, for example, that up to $90 of the present 
price  of  the  barrel  of  crude  oil  has  nothing  to  do  with  supply/demand,  but,  instead, 
is caused by unpoliced trader malpractices.70 

In a rather dramatic about face, the CFTC suddenly announced on May 29, 2008 
(or  just  9  days  after  Mr.  Harris’  testimony)  that  that  agency  will  now  collect  sub-
stantial  amounts  of  new  data  to  determine  what  is  undergirding  high  energy 
prices.71 That  release  was  divided  into  three  parts:  (1)  an  attempt  to  collect  addi-
tional data not previously within the CFTC’s possession about trading activities per-
taining  to  ICE’s  WTI  contracts;  (2)  the  collection  of  new  data  pertaining  to  ‘‘index 
trading’’  by  swaps  dealers,  e.g.,  certain  investment  banks  and  hedge  funds;  and  (3) 
the  public  announcement  of  an  ongoing  nationwide  crude  oil  investigation  com-
menced by the CFTC in December 2007 looking into possible unlawful trading mal-
practices. 

Suffice  to  say  for  now  that  the  credibility  of  well  over  2  years  of  assurances  by 
Ms.  Brown-Hruska  and  Messrs.  Lukken  and  Harris  that  all  was  fine  in  these  mar-
kets based on the CFTC’s analysis of ‘‘comprehensive’’ data has been wholly under-
mined by the May 29 release. It is now clear that the data that was being analyzed 
by  the  CFTC  as  the  basis  of  its  assurances  of  regularity  in  these  markets  was,  as 
many  had  repeatedly  warned  over  the  last  2  years,  totally  inadequate  and  unreli-
able. There can be little doubt that this complete reversal by the CFTC was not mo-
tivated by a newly minted aggressive regulatory stance. Rather, it was almost driv-
en by political forces that no longer allowed Messrs. Lukken and Harris to continue 
their rosy assessment. 

First,  it  is  certainly  more  than  a  mere  coincidence  that  the  now  revealed  CFTC 
investigation  into  manipulation  of  the  oil  markets  is  said  to  have  begun  in  Decem-
ber 2007. As shown below,72 that was the very month that this Congress mandated 
that  the  FTC-rather  than  the  CFTC—examine  the  crude  oil  futures  markets,  espe-
cially  in  light  of  the  CFTC’s  foot  dragging.  Nothing  has  spurred  the  CFTC  into  ac-
tion  over  these  last  4  years  more  than  legislation  undercutting  its  regulatory  turf. 

69 See,  e.g.,  Edmund  Conway,  George  Soros:  rocketing  oil  price  is  a  bubble,  DAILY TELEGRAPH 
(May  27,  2008)  available  at  http://www.telegraph.co.uk/money/main.jhtml?xml=/money/ 
2008/05/26/cnsoros126.xml  (last  visited  June  1,  2008)  (quoting  Mr.  George  Soros  as  stating 
‘‘Speculators are largely responsible for driving crude prices to their peaks in recent weeks and 
the  record  oil  price  now  looks  like  a  bubble’’);  Written  Testimony  of  Michael  Masters,  Hearing 
Before the Committee on Homeland Security and Governmental Affairs, U.S. Senate, 2 (May 20, 
2008)  available  at  http://hsgac.senate.gov/public/lfiles/052008Masters.pdf  (last  visited  June 
1,  2008)  (quoting  Mr.  Michael  W.  Masters  as  stating  ‘‘Are  Institutional  Investors  contributing 
to food and energy price inflation? And my unequivocal answer is YES’’); Alejandro Lazo, Energy 
Stocks  Haven’t  Caught  Up  With  Oil  Prices,  WASH.  POST ONLINE (Mar.  23,  2008)  available  at 
http://www.washingtonpost.com/wpdyn/content/  article/2008/03/21/AR2008032103825.html 
(last visited June 1, 2008) (quoting Mr. Fadel Gheit as stating ‘‘The largest speculators are the 
largest  financial  companies’’);  Michelle  Foss,  United  States  Natural  Gas  Prices  to  2015,  Oxford 
Institute for Energy Studies 34 (2007) available at http://www.oxfordenergy.org/pdfs/NG18.pdf 
(last  visited  June  1,  2008)  (asserting  ‘‘The  role  of  speculation  in  oil  markets  has  been  widely 
debated but could add upwards of $20 to the price per barrel’’); Economist Blames Subsidies for 
Oil  Price  Hike,  ADVANTAGE BUS.  MEDIA,  (2008),  available  at  http://www.chem.info/ShowPR 
.aspx?PUBCODE=075&ACCT=0000100&ISSUE=0609&ORIGRELTYPE=DM&RELTYPE=PR& 
PRODCODE= 00000&PRODLETT=M&CommonCount=0 (last visited June 1, 2008) (quoting Dr. 
Michelle  Foss  as  stating  ‘‘We  have  an  overpriced  commodity,  and  this  is  going  to  be  around  for 
a  while’’);  Kenneth  N.  Gilpin,  OPEC  Agrees  to  Increase  Output  in  July  to  Ease  Oil  Prices,  N.Y. 
TIMES (June  3,  2004)  available  at  http://www.nytimes.com/2004/06/03/business/03CND 
OIL.html?ei=5007&en=5dbd50c5b369795b&ex=1401681600&partner=USERLAND&pagewanted 
=all&position  (last  visited  June  1,  2008)  (quoting  Mr.  Kyle  Cooper  as  stating  ‘‘There  is  not  a 
crude  shortage,  which  is  why  OPEC  was  so  reluctant  to  raise  production.’’);  Speculators  ‘not  to 
blame’  for  oil  prices,  UPSTREAM,  (April  4,  2008)  available  at  http://www.upstreamonline.com/ 
live/article151805.ece  (last  visited  June  1,  2008)  (quoting  Mr.  Sean  Cota  as  stating  ‘‘It  has  be-
come  apparent  that  excessive  speculation  on  energy  trading  facilities  is  the  fuel  that  is  driving 
this  runaway  train  in  crude  prices’’);  Mike  Norman,  The  Danger  of  Speculation  FOXNEWS.COM, 
(Aug.  19,  2005)  available  at  http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,166038,00.html  (last  visited 
June 1, 2008) (Mr. Norman stating ‘‘Oil prices are high because of speculation, pure and simple. 
That’s  not  an  assertion,  that’s  a  fact.  Yet  rather  than  attack  the  speculation  and  rid  ourselves 
of the problem, we flail away at the symptoms.’’). 

70 See  Alexander  Kwiatkowski  and  Grant  Smith,  Blame  Wall  Street  for  $135  Oil  on  Wrong- 
Way  Betting  (Update  3),  BLOOMBERG.COM (May  22,  2008)  available  at  http://www.bloom 
berg.com/apps/news?pid=20601087&refer=home&sid=a3MgWEzlQch0  (last  visited  June  1, 
2008). 

71 Press  Release,  U.S.  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission,  CFTC  Announces  Multiple 
Energy  Market  Initiatives,  available  at  http://www.cftc.gov/newsroom/general  pressreleases/ 
2008/pr5503–08.html (last visited May 30, 2008). 

72 Energy  Independence  and  Security  Act  of  2007,  Pub.  L.  No.  110–140  § 811,  121  Stat.  1492 

(2007). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

26 

We  need  only  look  at  the  comparable  scenario  created  by  Congress  in  2005  when 
it  gave  FERC  the  authority  to  explore  natural  gas  futures  markets  in  light  of  the 
record high natural gas prices at that time.73 That legislation also caused the CFTC 
to abandon its long standing assertion that the rise in natural gas prices was caused 
by supply/demand only in order to protect its primacy in overseeing the natural gas 
futures  markets.  As  noted  above,74 to  date,  neither  the  courts  nor  Congress  has 
been  kind  to  the  CFTC  in  its  attempt  to  undercut  FERC’s  efforts  to  police  natural 
gas  futures  markets.  The  same  will  doubtless  be  true  when  the  CFTC  attempts  to 
elbow the FTC out of its crude oil investigations. 

Second,  the  month  of  May  2008  has  otherwise  been  unkind  to  the  CFTC  because 
of mounting harsh criticism for the agency’s noblesse oblige attitude toward the eco-
nomic  distress  of  the  American  consumer  faced  with  crippling  gas  prices.  Those 
criticisms  have  been  joined  by  further  threats  to  cut  back  on  CFTC  authority.  For 
example, Senator Lieberman, Chairman of the Senate Homeland Security and Gov-
ernment Affairs Committee, at that Committee’s May 20 hearing flatly rejected Mr. 
Harris’  assurances  there  that  speculation  is  not  at  play  in  energy  and  agricultural 
price  dysfunctions.  Senator  Lieberman  called  for  the  study  of  dramatic  legislative 
measures that would bypass the CFTC and directly bar by legislative directive spec-
ulators from both energy and agricultural futures markets.75 

Senator  Lieberman’s  and  other  legislative  conclusions  about  the  adverse  impact 
of speculation were doubtless driven by the testimony of Michael W. Masters, Man-
aging Member of Masters Capital Management, LLC, at the May 20 hearing.76 Mr. 
Masters  showed  that  investment  banks  and  hedge  funds,  for  example,  who  were 
‘‘hedging’’  their  off  exchange  bets  on  energy  prices  on  regulated  exchanges  were 
quite  remarkably  and  inexplicably  being  treated  by  NYMEX,  for  example,  and  the 
CFTC  as  ‘‘commercial  interests,’’  rather  than  as  the  speculators  they  self  evidently 
are.77 By  lumping  these  investment  banks  and  hedge  funds  with  traditional  com-
mercial  oil  dealers,  even  U.S.  fully  regulated  exchanges  were  not  applying  tradi-
tional  speculation  limits  to  the  transactions  engaged  in  by  these  speculative  inter-
ests.78 Mr.  Masters  demonstrated  beyond  all  doubt  that  a  huge  percentage  of  the 
trades  in  WTI  futures,  for  example,  were  controlled  by  non-commercial  interests.79 
It is now clear that the CFTC in its pre-May 29 assurances had never before exam-
ined the positions of these ‘‘swaps dealers,’’ because in that release it required these 
banks and hedge funds to report their trades to the CFTC and the CFTC committed 
‘‘to review whether classification of these types of traders can be improved for regu-
latory and reporting purposes.’’ 80 

Indeed,  Senator  Bingaman,  Chairman  of  the  Senate  Energy  Committee  and  Nat-
ural  Resources  Committee  in  a  May  27,  2008  letter  to  Acting  Chairman  Lukken, 
stated: ‘‘[I] remain concerned that the Commission’s assertions to date—discounting 
the potential role of speculation in driving up oil prices—have been based on a glar-
ingly incomplete set of data.’’ 81 Senator Bingaman referenced not only the likelihood 
of  the  CFTC  not  having  adequate  data  on  foreign  boards  of  trade  who  do  business 
in  the  U.S.  or  the  over-the-counter  unregulated  futures  markets,  but  the  CFTC’s 
sanctioned practice of ‘‘classify[ing] so-called ‘swaps dealers’—including large invest-
ment  banks  [—]  as  ‘commercial’  market  participants,  alongside  physical  hedgers 
such  as  oil  companies  and  airlines,  rather  than  as  ‘non-commercial  participants,’’ 
the latter of whom would be subject to speculation limits.82 In other words, Senator 
Bingaman  realized  that  when  Messrs.  Lukken  and  Harris  had  been  assuring  the 
Senate  Energy  and  Natural  Resources  Committee  that  speculators  played  no  role 

73 Energy Policy Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109–58, 119 Stat. 594 (2005). 
74 See infra notes 116–25 and accompanying text. 
75 See Hill, supra note 68. 
76 Written Testimony of Michael Masters, Hearing Before the Committee on Homeland Security 
and  Governmental  Affairs,  U.S.  Senate,  (May  20,  2008)  available  at  http://hsgac.senate.gov/ 
public/ lfiles/052008Masters.pdf (last visited June 1, 2008). 

77 Id. at 7–8. 
78 Id. at 7. 
79 Id. at 8, 11. 
80 Press  Release,  U.S.  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission,  CFTC  Announces  Multiple 
Energy  Market  Initiatives,  available  at  http://www.cftc.gov/newsroom/general  pressreleases/ 
2008/pr5503–08.html (last visited May 30, 2008). 

81 Letter  from  Senator  Jeff  Bingaman  to  Walter  Lukken,  Acting  Chairman,  CFTC  (May  27, 
2008)  (emphasis  added)  available  at  http://energy.senate.gov/public/index.cfm?FuseAction= 
PressReleases.Detail&PressReleaselid=0fdd0eb4-4b1d-49f0-a3a2-f89fd0e4b1d3&Month=5&Year 
=2008&Party=0 (last visited June 1, 2008). 

82 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

27 

is the oil prices run up, they were not counting certain investment banks and hedge 
funds, for example, as speculators! 83 

Finally,  a  bipartisan  coalition  of  22  Senators  on  May  23,  2008  sent  a  strongly 
worded letter to the CFTC asking that agency to show cause as to why the charade 
of  treating  the  U.S.-owned  ICE  as  a  U.K.  entity  when  that  exchange  is  run  out  of 
Atlanta,  Georgia  and  is  trading  the  WTI  U.S.  delivered  crude  oil  contract  not  be 
ended  immediately  as  the  underlying  CFTC  staff  FBOT  no  action  letters  allow  by 
their  express  terms.84 That  Senate  letter  made  clear  that  an  unsatisfactory  answer 
from  the  CFTC  would  very  likely  lead  to  further  legislative  diminishment  of  that 
agency’s authority. Each of the above referenced factors almost certainly explain the 
dramatic  change  represented  by  the  CFTC’s  May  29  release.  The  question  remains 
whether  the  release  is  merely  for  appearances  sake;  or  whether  it  truly  represents 
seriousness on the part of the agency to finally investigate these matters. 

There  is  evidence  within  the  May  29  release  that  may  call  into  question  the  sin-
cerity  of  CFTC’s  new  stance.  First,  the  November  1999  staff  FBOT  no  action  letter 
that  the  CFTC  views  as  governing  ICE’s  U.S.  delivered  energy  trades  expressly 
gives  the  CFTC  the  absolute  right  to  collect  immediately  and  directly  any  data  it 
needs from either the FSA (the purported U.K. regulator of the Atlanta-based ICE) 
or  from  ICE  itself.85 Ignoring  the  express  language  of  the  no  action  letters,  the 
CFTC  has  now  for  the  second  time  felt  obliged  to  negotiate  with  FSA  and  ICE  the 
right  to  obtain  the  very  data  it  could  collect  under  the  no  action  letter.86 This 
unneeded subservience, especially to ICE, reflects an unwillingness by the CFTC to 
even  use  effectively  the  power  expressly  granted  to  it  by  its  own  no  action  letters. 
Indeed,  while  the  CFTC  publicly  announced  its  new  initiative  at  1  PM  on  May 
29,87 at 1:05 PM that afternoon ICE felt obliged to issue a press release announcing 
that  it  had  ‘‘facilitated’’  the  turning  over  of  the  data  called  for  in  the  CFTC  re-
lease.88 It  is  self  evident  that  ICE,  in  its  capacity  as  the  second  largest  trader  of 
WTI and as an unregulated U.S. exchange, was almost certainly going to be an enti-
ty  of  interest  to  the  CFTC  in  its  market  investigation.  The  seeming  subservience 
of the CFTC to ICE in negotiating with the exchange over the information the agen-
cy deems necessary for its investigation is akin to asking a key witness to an inves-
tigation  whether  and  to  what  extent  it  will  agree  to  turn  over  material  relevant  to 
the  investigation.  That  is  simply  not  the  way  in  which  serious  investigation  is  con-
ducted,  especially  when  dealing  with  suspicions  that  manipulative  activity  may  be 
found in these markets. 

Moreover,  CFTC  Commissioner  Bart  Chilton  has  acknowledged  that  the  public 
announcement  within  the  May  29  release  raises  that  specter  ‘‘some  people  to  head 
for the paper shredder [.]’’ 89 

It  is  also  important  to  note  that  the  CFTC  release  makes  clear  that  it  has  not, 
in  fact,  finalized  its  agreement  to  obtain  all  of  the  relevant  data  it  needs  from  the 
FSA  and  ICE.  In  this  regard,  there  are  only  ‘‘near-term  commitment[s]’’  to  obtain 
from  the  FSA  and  ICE  ‘‘more  detailed  identification  of  market  end  users’’  and  ‘‘to 
provide  improved  data  formatting  so  trading  information  can  be  seamlessly  inte-

83 See  Gene  Epstein,  Commodities:  Who’s  Behind  the  Boom?,  Barrons  (March  31  2008)  avail-
able  at  http://online.barrons.com/article/  SB120674485506173053.html?mod=blhpsl9l0001 
lblthislweekslmagazinelhomeltop&page=sp  (last  visited  June  1,  2008)  (demonstrating 
that  a  similar  problem  of  miscategorizing  investment  banks  and  hedge  funds  as  ‘‘commercial’’ 
farming interests exists in the agricultural futures markets). 

84 Letter  from  Twenty-Two  Senators  to  Walter  Lukken,  Acting  Chairman,  CFTC  (May  23, 
2008),  available  at  http://cantwell.senate.gov/news/record.cfm?id=298325  (last  visited  June  1, 
2008). 

85 See supra notes 15–18 and accompanying text. 
86 Memorandum of Understanding Concerning Consultation, Cooperation and the Exchange of 
Information  Related  to  Market  Oversight,  CFTC  &  FSA  (2006)  available  at  http:// 
www.fsa.gov.uk/pubs/mou/cftc.pd; Financial Services Authority, FSA signs regulatory coopera-
tion  agreement  with  the  CFTC,  (Nov.  20,  2006)  available  at  http://www.fsa.gov.uk/pages/ 
Library/ Communication/PR/2006/118.shtml (last visited June 1, 2008). 

87 Press  Release,  U.S.  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission,  CFTC  Announces  Multiple 
Energy  Market  Initiatives,  (May  29,  2008),  available  at  http://www.cftc.gov/newsroom/general 
pressreleases/2008/pr5503–08.html (last visited May 30, 2008). 

88 Press  Release,  Intercontinental  Exchange,  Ltd.,  ICE  Facilitates  Agreement  to  Provide  In-
dustry’s  Most  Comprehensive  Reporting  for  U.S.  Energy  Futures  Contracts,  (May,  29,  2008), 
available at http://ir.theice.com/releasedetail.cfm?ReleaseID=312956 (last visited June 1, 2008). 
89 Tina Seeley, CFTC Targets Shipping, Storage in Oil Investigation (Update2), Bloomberg.com 
(May  30,  2008)  available  at  http://www.bloomberg.com/apps/news?pid=20601087&sid=aGz 
RMmDlb9MA&refer=home (last visited June 1, 2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

28 

grated  into  the  CFTC’s  surveillance  system[.]’’ 90 In  other  words,  not  only  did  the 
CFTC  never  know  who  the  end  users  were  trading  WTI  crude  oil  contracts  on  ICE 
(crucial information for determining which entities might be engaging in manipula-
tive  behavior)  and  not  only  did  it  not  have  any  of  the  FSA  data  accessible  for  pur-
poses  of  CFTC  surveillance  programs,  it  does  not  have  this  information  today;  it 
only  has  a  ‘‘near  term  commitment’’  that  the  information  will  be  provided.  In  this 
regard,  the  CFTC’s  assurance  to  Senator  Lieberman  only  2  weeks  ago  that  there 
was  no  manipulation  in  these  markets  based  a  ‘‘comprehensive  analysis  of  actual 
position data of these traders’’ seems to be nothing more than a flight of fancy since 
critical  portions  of  that  data  are  not  even  now  within  the  possession  of  the  CFTC 
after its much ballyhooed May 29 MOU with the FSA and ICE. 

My own view is that there can be no ‘‘final’’ commitment by FSA and ICE on these 
‘‘near term commitment’’ points, because the United Kingdom’s FSA is going to have 
to  reconfigure  (or  more  likely  reinvent)  the  collection  of  its  own  data  in  order  to  be 
able to satisfy the CFTC’s investigative needs in this regard. These ‘‘near term’’ fail-
ures in data collection only serve to highlight the total laxity of the FSA regulatory 
process as it applies to these markets; the extent to which CFTC analysis has been 
and  will  be  uninformed  ;  and  the  absurdity  of  the  CFTC’s  continuous  charade  that 
a  U.S.-owned  exchange  (ICE)  located  in  Atlanta  and  trading  critically  important 
U.S.  delivered  energy  products  (WTI)  should  be  regulated  by  the  United  Kingdom, 
whose  regulation  of  these  markets  is  self  evidently  lacking  by  the  latter’s  need  to 
mask its inadequacies through ‘‘near term commitments.’’ 

Yet,  another  factor  within  the  CFTC’s  May  29  release  evidences  the  weakness  of 
relying  on  foreign  regulators  to  police  U.S.  commodity  trading.  Among  the  new  in-
formation required by the May 29 CFTC release is the requirement that ICE notify 
the  CFTC  when  those  who  trade  on  ICE  ‘‘exceed  position  accountability  levels,  as 
established  by  U.S.  designated  contract  markets,  for  WTI  crude  oil  contracts.’’ 91 In 
other  words,  because  FSA  does  not  have  ‘‘accountability  levels’’  and  because  ICE 
therefore  does  not  establish  them,  the  CFTC  is  requiring  ICE  to  comply  with  ac-
countability levels at its main competitor, NYMEX. 

Needless to say, that is a highly circular way in which to bring an Atlanta-based 
exchange  trading  the  U.S.  delivered  WTI  contract,  but  regulated  by  the  United 
Kingdom, under traditional and long established U.S. controls on excessive specula-
tion and manipulation. Again, would it not be easier to simply require this Atlanta 
exchange  to  register  in  the  United  States?  The  ‘‘Rube  Goldberg’’  quality  of  the 
CFTC’s reliance on the FSA would be humorous were it not be for the fact that U.S. 
consumers are sinking under the weight of increasing gas prices that many respect-
able observers believe are caused in some substantial measure by outsized specula-
tion and possible manipulation on ICE. 

Another important weakness of the CFTC release is that, while it tries to accom-
modate  concerns  about  the  inadequacy  of  the  United  Kingdom’s  regulation  of  ICE, 
the  release  does  not  address  the  fast  growing  problem  of  other  foreign  exchanges 
trading  in  the  U.S.  who  are  quickly  moving  into  the  U.S.  delivered  WTI  contract. 
For example, as mentioned above,92 the Dubai Mercantile Exchange (DME) received 
a  May  2007  staff  FBOT  no  action  letter  enabling  that  Dubai  exchange  to  bring  its 
terminals into the U.S. without registering as a CFTC regulated designated contract 
market.  DME  is  joined  in  this  endeavor  by  NYMEX,  but  its  U.S.  trading  activities 
are regulated by the Dubai government. 

James  Newsome,  the  President  of  MYMEX,  the  former  Chairman  of  the  CFTC 
(2001–2004), and a member of the DME board of directors recently opined that ‘‘he 
sees big opportunities for the DME and a huge potential for [DME] emerging as the 
derivatives  trading  hub  of  South  Asia,  Middle  East  and  Africa  region.’’ 93 He  notes 
at  the  recent  first  anniversary  of  the  DME  WTI  contract,  the  DME  volumes  ‘‘are 
very  similar  to  the  volumes  of  the  WTI  . . .  when  [it  was]  launched’’  on  NYMEX 
itself.94 

The Dubai/NYMEX venture is the playing out of NYMEX’s long threatened strat-
egy  to  level  the  playing  field  with  ICE,  i.e.,  if  an  Atlanta-owned  exchange  can  be 
regulated  as  if  it  were  in  the  UK,  a  New  York  exchange  will  follow  suit  under  the 
banner  of  an  FBOT  no  action  letter  granted  to  a  Dubai  exchange.  Of  course,  the 

90 Press  Release,  U.S.  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission,  CFTC  Announces  Multiple 
Energy  Market  Initiatives,  available  at  http://www.cftc.gov/newsroom/general  pressreleases/ 
2008/pr5503–08.html (last visited May 30, 2008). 

91 Id. 
92 See supra note 46. 
93 Babu  Das  Augustine,  Dubai  ‘could  emerge  as  a  derivatives  trading  Hub’,  Gulfnews.com, 
May  16,  2008,  available  at  http://www.gulfnews.com/business/General/10213595.html  (last 
visited June 1, 2008). 

94 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

29 

CFTC  May  29  release  is  careful  to  limit  improved  data  collection  only  to  ICE  and 
does  not  address  the  parade  of  foreign  exchanges  to  which  the  CFTC  has  offered 
a safe harbor from U.S. regulation. 

It is self evidently absurd that the American public can rest secure that the CFTC 
found  in  the  DME  no  action  letter,  that  Dubai’s  regulatory  scheme  is  comparable 
to that of the U.S.95 The fact that the CFTC as recently as May 2007 could conclude 
that  Dubai’s  regulation  is  in  fact  comparable  to  that  in  the  U.S.  simply  dem-
onstrates  that  there  is  not  a  foreign  regulator  in  the  world  who  would  not  satisfy 
the  CFTC  under  that  agency’s  comparability  standard.  In  this  regard,  I  am  sure 
that the American consumers will take little comfort from an explanation that they 
are  being  protected  from  manipulation  and  excessive  speculation  driving  up  gas 
prices—not by U.S. regulators—but by the Dubai government’s oversight of trading 
of  the  U.S.  delivered  WTI  contract  on  the  DME’s  U.S.  trading  terminals.  I  do  not 
envy any Member of Congress explaining that proposition to his or her constituents. 
Finally, NYMEX President Newsome has further opined that ‘‘[t]he reports on the 
role  of  speculators  on  oil  prices  are  grossly  exaggerated.  If  you  look  at  the  data  on 
who  is  actually  trading,  the  level  of  commercial  participants  remains  70  to  72  per-
cent.’’  Of  course,  as  Michael  Masters  recently  explained,96 Dr.  Newsome’s  calcula-
tion  treats  investment  banks  and  hedge  funds  laying  off  the  risk  of  their  off  ex-
change  swaps  transactions  on  NYMEX  as  the  same  as  a  heating  oil  dealer  using 
the  WTI  contract  on  NYMEX  to  hedge  his  business  risk.  If  those  banks  and  hedge 
funds  were  properly  classified  as  speculators,  about  70  percent  of  the  trading  on 
NYMEX  would  be  speculative—not  commercial.  And,  if  you  were  to  add  all  of  the 
WTI trading on NYMEX, ICE, and the Dubai exchange, speculation might very well 
approach  80–90  per  cent  of  the  WTI  trades  executed  by  U.S.-owned  exchanges.  By 
any  objective  assessment,  the  crude  oil  market  is  now  overwhelmingly  dominated 
by  speculation,  most  of  which  is  not  subject  to  the  age  old  controls  imposed  upon 
speculators  in  these  markets.  One  can  easily  see  then  how  Goldman  Sachs,  a  huge 
trader in these markets itself, could confidently predict that oil will soon reach $200 
a barrel.97 
The  Need  to  Expedite  the  FTC  Investigation  into  Crude  Oil  Futures 

Markets 

Soaring  energy  prices  have  infiltrated  all  sectors  of  the  economy  and  they  have 
drastically  reduced  the  quality  of  life  for  millions  of  Americans.  In  a  May  23,2008 
letter  to  the  CFTC,  a  bipartisan  group  of  22  Senators  stated  the  depth  of  economic 
emergency  caused  by  the  oil  shock:  ‘‘The  doubling  of  crude  oil  prices  in  1  year  is 
unprecedented in the century old history [of these markets]. With oil central to our 
Nation’s economy and current standard of living, today’s skyrocketing oil represents 
a  massive  new  tax  on  American  families  and  business  . . .’’ 98 As  Senator  Binga-
man, Chair of the Senate Energy and Natural Resources Committee, also reminded 
Acting  CFTC  Chairman  Lukken  last  week,  ‘‘American  families,  farmers  and  busi-
nesses are currently struggling under the weight of record-setting fuel prices.’’ 99 

Faced with years of inertia by the CFTC in policing the crude oil futures markets 
(or  for  that  matter  even  recognizing  any  problem  worthy  of  an  investigation),  Con-
gress included within the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (EISA),100 
a provision expanding the power of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) to combat 
price manipulation with respect to crude oil markets.101 The statute specifically pro-
vided that it was: 

95 Dubai  Mercantile  Exchange,  CFTC  No-Action  Letter,  2007  CFTC  Ltr.  Lexis  6  (May  24, 

2007). 

96 See Masters, supra notes 76–79 and accompanying text. 
97 Neil  King  Jr.  and  Spencer  Swartz,  U.S.  News:  Some  See  Oil  at  $150  This  Year—Range  of 

Factors May Sustain Surge; $4.50-a-Gallon Gas, WALL ST. J., May 7, 2008, at A3. 

98 Letter  from  Twenty-Two  Senators  to  Walter  Lukken,  Acting  Chairman,  CFTC  (May  23, 
2008),  available  at  http://cantwell.senate.gov/news/record.cfm?id=298325  (last  visited  June  1, 
2008). 

99 Letter  from  Senator  Jeff  Bingaman  to  Walter  Lukken,  Acting  Chairman,  CFTC  (May  27, 
2008).  Letter  from  Twenty-Two  Senators  to  Walter  Lukken,  Acting  Chairman,  CFTC  (May  23, 
2008),  available  at  http://cantwell.senate.gov/news/record.cfm?id=298325  (last  visited  June  1, 
2008).)  (stating  that  Exxon  Mobile  executive  has  testified  that  the  price  of  crude  oil  should  be 
between $50 to $55 dollars per barrel based on supply and demand principles). 

100 Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007, Pub. L. No. 110–140, 121 Stat. 1492 (2007). 
101 Id.  at  § 811.  Although  the  FTC  has  always  had  the  power  to  provide  consumer  protection 
by preventing ‘‘unfair methods of competition’’ and ‘‘deceptive acts’’ that affected commerce, until 
the passage of the 2007 Act, it did not have the authority to target price manipulation directly. 
15 U.S.C. § 45 (2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

30 

unlawful  for  any  person,  directly  or  indirectly,  to  use  or  employ,  in  connection 
with the purchase or sale of crude oil gasoline or petroleum distillates at whole-
sale,  any  manipulative  or  deceptive  device  or  contrivance,  in  contravention  of 
such  rules  and  regulations  as  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  may  prescribe  as 
necessary  or  appropriate  in  the  public  interest  or  for  the  protection  of  United 
States citizens.102 

The  2007  FTC  anti-manipulation  legislation  is  virtually  identical  to  2005  legisla-
tion enacted by Congress requiring FERC to investigate and prohibit market manip-
ulation  in  the  natural  gas  markets.103 By  January  2006,  FERC  issued  a  final  rule 
under the 2005 legislation implementing its anti-manipulation provisions.104 Pursu-
ant  to  that  rulemaking,  FERC  resolved  all  major  interpretive  issues  it  viewed  as 
arising  under  the  2005  legislation,  including  adopting  the  anti-manipulation  defini-
tions  within  Section  10(b)  of  the  Securities  and  Exchange  Act  of  1934  [and  making 
it clear that its authority extended to investigating and crafting relief in the natural 
gas  futures  markets  if  manipulation  of  natural  gas  prices  was  found  there  (?)].105 
In  short,  FERC  has  provided  the  FTC  with  the  template  for  an  investigative  order 
under the virtually identical legislation governing the FTC’s mandate. 

In  July  2007,  FERC  issued  a  show  cause  order  under  its  anti-manipulation  rule 
against  the  Amaranth  Advisors  hedge  fund,  alleging  that  Amaranth  manipulated 
NYMEX  natural  gas  futures  contracts  to  impact  the  price  of  those  contracts.106 In 
so doing, FERC made it clear that the term within the legislation making it ‘‘unlaw-
ful  for  any  person,  directly  or  indirectly,  to  use  or  employ,  in  connection  with  the 
purchase’’ of natural gas included the authority to investigate and issue appropriate 
relief within the natural gas futures markets, because those markets are ‘‘in connec-
tion  with’’  the  purchase  of  the  commodity  in  question.  FERC  has  now  completed 
over 64 investigations into these markets, reaching settlements in a substantial por-
tion of those cases. 

In  sum,  FERC  has  used  its  2005  legislative  authority  after  which  the  2007  FTC 
crude  anti-manipulation  legislation  was  modeled  to  resolve  all  major  issues  about 
the scope of its mandate, including a definition for market manipulation and a clear 
understanding  that,  if  that  manipulation  emanates  within  futures  markets,  FERC 
has  the  statutory  authority  to  investigate  and  regulate  therein.  Therefore,  the  FTC 
has  a  readymade  model  order,  resolving  many  critical  issues  about  the  scope  of  its 
authority  under  the  2007  legislation,  which  should  have  enabled  it  to  move  quickly 
to  determine  whether  the  unbearably  high  prices  experienced  in  the  crude  oil  mar-
kets by U.S. consumers are related exclusively to market fundamentals or, in crucial 
part, to trading malpractices. 
The National Emergency in the Petroleum Markets Authorizes to FTC to Move Faster 
Instead  of  taking  swift  and  decisive  action  to  address  the  growing  threat  of  fast 
rising crude oil, gasoline and heating oil prices, the FTC opted to employ a leisurely 
administrative route that, unless adjusted as suggested below, will mean that a rule 
governing  investigation  under  the  2007  crude  oil  anti-manipulation  legislation  will 
not be in place until this coming fall at the earliest. Rather than issuing a proposed 
rule based on the model established by FERC in the natural gas markets, the FTC 
instituted  an  advanced  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  (ANOPR)  with  the  comment 
period  to  close  on  June  6,  2008.107 The  ANOPR  is  39  pages  long  and  it  raises  in 
a most highly academic fashion many of the issues long ago confronted and resolved 
in 2005–2006 by FERC in the natural gas context. 

Moreover, picking up the signal that time is not of the essence, the American Pe-
troleum  Institute  (API),  represented  by  the  Covington  &  Burling  law  firm,  has  al-
ready  requested  an  extension  of  the  June  6  ANOPR  deadline,  claiming  that  the 
issues are too difficult to resolve in anything less than a 90 period.108 If this exten-
sion  were  granted,  the  comment  period  for  the  ANOPR  would  not  even  end  until 
late  summer.  At  that  juncture  and  pace,  the  FTC  would  then  analyze  the  ANOPR 
comments  before  it  even  issued  a  proposed  rule  with  its  own  [30]  day  comment  pe-
riod.  Under  this  schedule  (if  not  extended  by  further  requests  for  more  time), 

(2007). 

102 Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007, Pub. L. No. 110–140  § 811, 121 Stat. 1492 

103 Energy Policy Act of 2005, Pub. L.No. 109–58, 119 Stat. 594 (2005). 
104 71 Fed. Reg. 4244 para. 6 (Jan. 26, 2006). 
105 Id. at para. 2. 
106 120 F.E.R.C. P. 61085, 2007 F.E.R.C. Lexis 163 (2007). 
107 16 C.F.R. Part 317 (2008). 
108 Letter  from  the  American  Petroleum  Institute  to  Donald  Clark,  Secretary,  U.S.  Federal 
Trade Commission (May 19, 2008) available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/comments/market manip-
ulation/080519ampetrolinstreqeot.pdf (last visited May 31, 2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

31 

months would pass before the promulgation of the final rule at which time the FTC 
would only then begin its investigation. 

To be sure, in the absence of a full blown emergency, agency rulemaking requires 
a notice and comment period on a proposed rule, with the discretion to precede the 
proposed rule with an ANOPR to flesh out novel issues in aid of developing the pro-
posed rule. However, the Administrative Procedure Act provides critically important 
exceptions  to  these  procedures  in  well  defined  exigent  circumstances.  For  example, 
the APA specifically provides that the notice and comment requirements can be by-
passed  or  short  circuited  when,  ‘‘the  agency  for  good  cause  finds  (and  incorporates 
the  finding  and  a  brief  statement  of  reasons  therefore  in  the  rules  issued)  that  no-
tice and public procedure thereon are impracticable, unnecessary, or contrary to the 
public  interest.’’ 109 Therefore,  when  an  agency  faces  emergencies  or  situations 
where  delaying  for  notice  and  comment  would  seriously  harm  the  public  interest, 
the agency can promulgate a final rule without notice and comment, especially when 
the critical issues have already been resolved under an identical companion statute 
by another Federal agency charged with the identical investigative mission in highly 
related markets and by comments received by the FTC pursuant to the FTC’s exist-
ing ANOPR.110 

The  present  crude  oil  and  gas  price  shocks  presents  precisely  the  circumstances 
for which the APA exception was intended. Sky rocketing oil, gasoline, and heating 
oil prices have placed a stranglehold on the American economy and every American 
consumer. George Soros recently warned that, if left unattended, the oil price crisis 
(which  he  views  as  being  grounded  in  excessive  speculation)  will  drag  the  United 
States  into  the  most  serious  full  blown  recession  since  the  end  of  World  War  II.111 
Surely the present crisis would allow the FTC to short circuit full blown APA proce-
dures.  Indeed,  after  receiving  comments  on  the  ANOPR,  the  FTC  could  model  an 
interim  final  rule  based  on  those  comments  and  the  tailor  made  companion  FERC 
template.  The  FTC’s  investigation  could  at  least  proceed  under  the  interim  rule 
while it takes notice and comment on that interlocutory order. If the FTC acts expe-
ditiously,  it  may  stave  off  economic  chaos  by  bringing  discipline  to  what  many  so-
phisticated economists and market observers believe are unnecessarily chaotic mar-
kets driven by a high level of speculative manipulation. 

Indeed, when FERC went through its rulemaking process on suspected manipula-
tion  leading  to  fast  rising  natural  gas  prices,  it  expedited  its  proceeding.112 In  that 
case, FERC ‘‘balanced the necessity for immediate implementation of this Final Rule 
against  the  principles  of  fundamental  fairness’’  and  determined  that  the  persistent 
high energy prices could lead to opportunities for price manipulation.113 FERC con-
cluded that it ‘‘would be contrary to the public interest to delay regulations that im-
plement  Congressional  intent  to  prohibit  manipulation  in  energy  markets[;]’’  imple-
menting  a  Final  Rule  would  protect  energy  markets  from  manipulation.114 Again, 
because the FTC legislation is nearly identical to that enactment authorizing FERC, 
it  is  certain  that  Congress  expected  the  FTC  to  follow  the  example  set  by  FERC. 
Given the self-evident nature of the emergency before us, the harm that delay could 
cause  the  public,  and  the  example  of  effective  response  given  by  FERC,  the  FTC 
should greatly expedite its rulemaking process in order to bring stability to the gas 
and oil markets.115 
The  FTC’s  Investigation  of  the  Crude  Oil  Markets  Cannot  Be  Blocked  by  the  CFTC 
In its ANOPR, FERC has posed the question of the degree to which the 2007 stat-
utory  mandate  permits  it  to  overlap  the  jurisdiction  of  the  CFTC  into  the  crude  oil 
futures  markets.  Doubtless,  the  CFTC’s  sudden  reversal  of  position  in  announcing 

109 5 U.S.C. § 553(b)(B) (2008). 
110 See id.; Edison Electric Institute, et al., v. EPA, 821 F.2d 714, 720 (D.C. Cir. 1987) (‘‘[T]here 
was a need for immediate action.’’); Chamber of Commerce v. SEC, 443 F.3d 890, 908 (D.C. Cir. 
2006)  (exception  to  notice  and  comment  permitted  ‘‘in  emergency  situations’’  or  where  ‘‘delay 
would result in serious public harm’’) (dicta) (citing cases). 

111 Edmund  Conway,  George  Soros:  rocketing  oil  price  is  a  bubble,  Daily  Telegraph  (May  27, 
2008)  available  at  http://www.telegraph.co.uk/money/main.jhtml?xml  =/money/2008/05/26/ 
cnsoros126.xml (last visited May 29, 2008). 

112 Prohibition of Energy Market Manipulation, 114 F.E.R.C. P61,047, 61 (F.E.R.C. 2006). 
113 Id. 
114 Id. 
115 If  absolutely  necessary  the  FTC  could  propose  an  interim  rule  for  investigation  after  the 
ANOPR period has closed and then expedite the rulemaking process through the APA’s § 553(d), 
until reaching a final rule. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

32 

its own investigation into these markets on May 29, 2008 was intended to aggravate 
that concern on the part of the FTC.116 

An effort was made to thwart FERC in its investigation of the natural gas futures 
markets pursuant to the 2005 legislation by claiming it was infringing on the prov-
ince  of  the  CFTC.  In  CFTC  v.  Amaranth  Advisors,117 Amaranth  tried  to  enjoin 
FERC from proceeding with its administrative action because it could face the possi-
bility  of  having  to  defend  itself  in  two  different  proceedings  pertaining  to  the  nat-
ural gas futures markets.118 The court refused to enjoin the FERC investigation, by 
explaining, inter alia, that Congress expressly envisioned that there would be over-
lap between the enforcement actions of these two agencies.119 

Important  Members  of  Congress  have  also  weighed  in  when  the  CFTC  has  at-
tempted to preempt FERC’s examination of the natural gas futures markets. For ex-
ample, in a recent hearing before the Subcommittee on Oversight and Investigations 
of the House Committee on Energy and Commerce, the Ranking Member Joe Barton 
(R–TX)  (who  was  the  Committee  Chair  when  the  2005  statute  was  passed)  stated, 
‘‘I’m  also  disappointed  to  see  that  CFTC  has  challenged  FERC’s  authority  to  inves-
tigate  and  pursue  the  energy  market  manipulators  despite  the  Congress’s  explicit 
grant  of  authority  to  FERC  in  the  Energy  Policy  Act  of  2005.’’ 120 Acting  Chairman 
Lukken  replied  that  the  CFTC  had  opposed  FERC  action  because  the  Commodity 
Exchange  Act  had  conferred  exclusive  jurisdiction  over  these  contracts  to  the 
CFTC.121 Rep. Barton retorted, 

Well,  then  there’s  no  way  you  can  have  exclusive  jurisdiction  with  this  [2005] 
statutory authority on the books. And what I want to inform you of, as the act-
ing  chairman,  is  that  this  wasn’t  something  serendipitous  or  inadvert[ent].  It 
was put in directly because of what since has transpired. And the—Mr. Kelliher 
[FERC Chairman] and his compadres at the FERC are doing exactly, or at least 
attempting to do exactly what we hoped they would do, which is work with your 
agency  but  use  their  own  authorities  to  ferret  out  the  bad  actors  and  try  to 
make  our  markets  more  open  and  transparent  and  accessible  in  a  nonbiased 
way to any willing participant.122 

Rep. Barton elaborated further: 

So  I’m—I  don’t  see  how  the—your  agency  or  the  courts  can  rule,  unless  they 
assume  that  the  Members  of  Congress  who  passed  this  didn’t  know  what  we 
were talking about and didn’t understand the English language. But I just, you 
know, I want to put on the record at this oversight hearing that this was—this 
particular section was done at my express request because of concerns I had at 
the time about speculation in the oil and gas markets so that we could give the 
FERC some authority, which was ambiguous at that time.123 

Rep.  Barton’s  statements  leave  little  room  for  doubt  that  both  FERC  (under  the 
2005  legislation)  and  the  FTC  (under  the  2007  legislation  modeled  after  the  2005 
statute)  have  the  authority  to  examine  the  role  futures  markets  play  in  manipu-
lating  the  natural  gas  markets  (in  the  case  of  FERC)  and  the  petroleum  markets 
(in the case of the FTC). 

Finally,  the  mere  fact  that  the  CFTC  has  begun  its  own  ‘‘investigation’’  into  the 
current price calamity is no reason for the FTC to delay its own inquiry.124 As Rep. 
Barton  said,  ‘‘This  is  not  an  area  that  we  have  too  many  regulators  and  too  many 
overseers.’’ 125 The  enormity  of  the  economic  chaos  that  looms  in  spiking  crude  oil 
prices  imperils  both  the  stability  of  the  global  economy,  as  well  as  the  American 
people. Given the magnitude of these issues, both agencies should cooperate to work 
simultaneously in this area. 

116 See supra notes 71–74 and accompanying text. 
117 523 F.Supp.2d 328 (S.D.N.Y. 2007). 
118 Id. at 328–29. 
119 Id. at 332. 
120 Rep.  Joe  Barton,  Subcommittee  on  Oversight  and  Investigations,  Statements  during  the 
Energy  Speculation:  Is  Greater  Regulation  Necessary  to  Stop  Price  Manipulation?  (Dec.  12, 
2007) (emphasis added). 

121 Walter  Lukken,  Acting  Chairman  CFTC,  Statements  during  the  Energy  Speculation:  Is 

Greater Regulation Necessary to Stop Price Manipulation? (Dec. 12, 2007). 

122 Barton, supra note 120. 
123 Id. 
124 See supra notes 117–119 and accompanying text. 
125 Barton, supra note 120. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

The FTC Is Required to Adopt SEC’s Definition of Manipulation 

33 

In  its  ANOPR,  the  FTC  includes  a  considerable  discussion  pertaining  to  the 
standard  it  should  adopt  in  determining  whether  conduct  is  manipulative.  Once 
again, this issue has been settled under the 2005 legislation as explained in FERC’s 
final investigative order. Congress passed the FERC legislation in 2005 in direct re-
sponse  to  the  scandal  in  the  natural  gas  markets  that  decimated  the  Western  elec-
tricity markets in 2000 and 2001. The 2005 provision was modeled on the securities 
laws,  and  FERC’s  final  order  under  that  statute  notes  that  the  anti-manipulation 
provisions in the Energy Policy Act of 2005 ‘‘closely track’’ section 10b of the Securi-
ties  Exchange  Act  of  1934.126 Moreover,  both  statutes  ‘‘specifically  dictate  that  the 
terms  ‘manipulative  or  deceptive  device  or  contrivance’  are  to  be  used  ‘as  those 
terms  are  used  in  section  10(b)  of  the  Securities  Exchange  Act  of  1934.’ ’’ 127 FERC 
therefore  patterned  its  own  rule  after  the  SEC’s  10b–5  and  said  it  would  interpret 
its  own  rules  ‘‘consistent  with  analogous  SEC  precedent  that  is  appropriate  under 
the circumstances.’’ 128 

Similarly,  Congress  modeled  the  FTC’s  new  2007  anti-manipulation  provision  on 
10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of the 1934 and Rule 10b–5 to once again make 
it clear (as was the case with FERC) that the FTC must use the extensive securities 
precedent to guide its manipulation investigations in the petroleum markets. For ex-
ample,  ‘‘manipulative  or  deceptive  device  or  contrivance’’  has  clearly  been  defined 
by  the  SEC  and  adopted  by  FERC,  and  have  also  been  interpreted  by  the  courts. 
The  courts  have  established  that  this  standard  covers  ‘‘knowing  or  intentional  mis-
conduct’’ and not price changes caused by negligence or natural market forces. Rath-
er,  the  SEC  definition  is  designed  to  prevent  fraudulent  or  manipulative  conduct 
that  affect  market  prices  ‘‘that  are  intended  to  mislead  . . .  by  artificially  affecting 
market  activity.’’ 129 The  Supreme  Court  has  interpreted  the  phrases  ‘‘manipulative 
or  deceptive’’  in  conjunction  with  ‘‘device  or  contrivance,’’  to  be  applicable  to  inten-
tional  conduct.130 The  SEC  has  broadly  interpreted  the  securities  laws  to  attack 
‘‘the  full  range  of  ingenious  devices  that  might  be  used  to  manipulate  securities 
prices.’’ 131 

Accordingly,  the  FTC  (as  is  true  of  FERC  and  the  SEC)  is  not  required  to  dem-
onstrate reliance, loss causation, or damages, because ‘‘the Commission’s duty to en-
force the remedial and preventative terms of the statute in the public interest, and 
not merely to police those whose plain violations have already caused demonstrable 
loss or injury.’’ 132 
The FTC Is Free to Investigate the Futures Trading Subsidiaries of Banks 

The  FTC  is  specifically  has  general  authority  ‘‘to  prevent  persons,  partnerships, 
or  corporations  . . .  from  using  unfair  methods  of  competition  in  or  affecting  com-
merce  and  unfair  or  deceptive  acts  or  practices  in  or  affecting  commerce.’’ 133 How-
ever, while the FTC has broad authority to protect commerce, as it has noted in the 
ANOPR, it explicitly prohibited from regulating, inter alia, ‘‘banks.’’ 134 

As has been noted above, investment banks are prime players in the crude oil fu-
ture markets. I anticipate that a question will be raised about whether the FTC can 
investigate those institutions. 

The  FTC’s  authorizing  legislation  does  not  provide  a  definition  of  a  ‘‘bank;’’ 135 
rather,  it  cross  references  another  section  of  the  statute,  which  is  concerned  with 
FTC  enforcement.136 This  section  provides  a  list  of  those  institutions  that  qualify 

126 Prohibition of Energy Market Manipulation, 114 F.E.R.C. P61,047; 2006 FERC LEXIS 105 

(Jan 19, 2006). 

127 Id. 
128 Id. 
129 Santa  Fe  Industries  v.  Green,  430  U.S.  462,  476  (1977);  Mobil  Corp.  v.  Marathon  Oil  Co., 
669  F.2d  366,  374  (6th  Cir.  1981)  (holding  that  SEC  is  empowered  to  prevent  manipulation  of 
markets ‘‘by artificial means . . . unrelated to the natural forces of supply and demand.’’). 

130 Ernst & Ernst, 425 U.S. at 197, 199. 
131 Santa Fe Industries, 430 U.S. at 476. 
132 See,  e.g.,  SEC  v.  Credit  Bancorp,  Ltd.,  195  F.Supp2d  475,  490–91  (S.D.N.Y.  2002)  quoting 
Berko v. SEC, 316 F.2d 137, 143 (2d Cir. 1963) citing SEC v. North American Research & Dev. 
Corp.,  424  F.2d  63,  84  (2d  Cir.  1970)(reliance  not  an  element  of  a  Rule  10–b(5)  claim  in  the 
context of an SEC proceeding). 
133 15 U.S.C. § 45(a)(2) (2008). 
134 Id. 
135 15 U.S.C. § 44 (2008). 
136 See 15 U.S.C. § 57(a)(f)(2) (2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

34 

as  ‘‘banks,’’  and  makes  it  clear  that  the  term  relates  to  depository  institutions  reg-
istered as in that capacity with Federal banking regulators.137 

However, even if non-depository institutions, such as Morgan Stanley or Goldman 
Sachs,  are  for  some  reason  deemed  to  be  ‘‘banks’’  for  purposes  of  FTC  regulation, 
the futures trading done by those institutions are executed through subsidiaries nei-
ther registered with the banking regulators nor with the SEC.138 

Finally, to the extent that the finds that a ‘‘bank’’ is involved in manipulative ac-
tivity  within  the  crude  oil  markets,  courts  have  ruled  that  the  FTC  has  investiga-
tory power with regard to banks, even if enforcement activities with regard to those 
institutions  are  beyond  the  Commission’s  authority.  In  FTC  v.  Rockefeller,139 the 
FTC  brought  suit  to  enforce  subpoenas  it  had  issued  to  various  banks  in  order  to 
conduct  an  energy-related  investigation.140 The  banks  sought  to  quash  the  sub-
poenas, arguing that the information sought ran afoul of the ‘‘bank’’ exemption with-
in the FTC’s governing statute.141 The court first determined that the FTC’s author-
ity to ‘‘conduct an investigation of the energy industry is undisputed.’’ 142 The court 
ultimately  held  that  the  FTC  was  lawfully  permitted  to  demand  information  from 
the banks there in pursuit of its statutory obligation to investigate the energy indus-
try.143 For all of these reasons, the FTC should be urged by this Committee to fulfill 
aggressively the 2007 Congressional mandate stop any manipulative practices with-
in  the  petroleum  markets,  including  activity  within  the  crude  oil  futures  markets 
distorting crude oil prices. The path for such an investigation has already been well 
marked  by  FERC.  The  FTC  should  use  all  of  the  powers  available  to  it  to  promul-
gate  its  rule  and  begin  it  investigation  expeditiously.  The  stability  of  the  American 
economy demands nothing less. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Next,  we  will  hear  from  Gerry  Ramm,  President  of  Inland  Oil 
Company, and on—speaking on behalf of the Petroleum Marketers 
Association. 

I  would  like  to  extend  a  special  welcome  to  Mr.  Ramm,  since  he 
comes  from  Ephrata,  Washington.  Thank  you  very  much  for  being 
here. 

137 See  id.  The  statute  specifically  mentions  the  following  institutions  as  being  considered 

banks: 

(A)  national  banks  and  Federal  branches  and  Federal  agencies  of  foreign  banks,  by  the  divi-
sion of consumer affairs established by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency; (B) mem-
ber  banks  of  the  Federal  Reserve  System  (other  than  national  banks),  branches  and  agencies 
of foreign banks (other than Federal branches, Federal agencies, and insured State branches of 
foreign banks), commercial lending companies owned or controlled by foreign banks, and organi-
zations  operating  under  section  25  or  25(a)  [25A]  of  the  Federal  Reserve  Act  [12  USCS  §§ 601 
et  seq.  or  §§ 611  et  seq.],  by  the  division  of  consumer  affairs  established  by  the  Board  of  Gov-
ernors of the Federal Reserve System; and (C) banks insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance 
Corporation  (other  banks  referred  to  in  subparagraph  (A)  or  (B))  and  insured  State  branches 
of  foreign  banks,  by  the  division  of  consumer  affairs  established  by  the  Board  of  Directors  of 
the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Id. 

The statute also presents a cross reference for additional guidance on definitions to the Banks 
and Banking portion of the United States Code. Id.; 15 U.S.C. § 1813 (2008) (listing its own defi-
nitions of the word ‘‘bank’’). It is also worth noting that these definitions are immediately follow 
by a section entitled ‘‘Definitions relating to depository institutions.’’ 15 U.S.C.  § 1813(c) (2008). 
This  reinforces  the  idea  that  the  types  of  institutions  being  excluded  are  institutions  of  which 
‘‘a substantial portion of the business of which institution consists of receiving deposits or exer-
cising  fiduciary  powers.  . . .’’  69  Am.  Jur.  2d  Securities  Regulation-Federal  § 338.  See  Miller  v. 
U.S. Bank of Washington, 865 P.2d 536, 541 (1994). 

138 See  Morgan  Stanley,  Annual  Report  (Form  10–K),  at  114,  148,  157,  202  (Nov.  30,  2007); 
The  Goldman  Sachs  Group,  Inc.,  Annual  Report  (Form  10–K),  at  17–18,  80,  189–92  (Nov.  30, 
2007). 

139 FTC v. Rockefeller, 441 F.Supp. 234 (S.D.N.Y. 1977). 
140 Id. at 236. 
141 Id. at 237. The banks contended that because they were exempt from the FTC jurisdiction, 

the subpoenas issued by the FTC were invalid. Id. at 240. 

142 Id. at 240. 
143 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

35 

STATEMENT GERRY RAMM, PRESIDENT, INLAND OIL 

COMPANY, EPHRATA, WASHINGTON ON BEHALF OF THE 

PETROLEUM MARKETERS ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA 

Mr.  RAMM.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chairman  and  Members  of  the 
Committee. I appreciate the opportunity to provide some insight on 
this  extreme  volatility  and  record-setting  prices  that  we’ve  seen  in 
the recent months in the energy commodity markets. 

I  am  with,  and  representing,  the  Petroleum  Marketers  Associa-
tion  of  America.  We  are  a  national  federation  of  46  states  and  re-
gional  associations  representing  8,000  independent  fuel  marketers 
and almost all the heating oil dealers in the Nation. 

Excessive speculation on energy trading facilities is the fuel that 
is  driving  this  runaway  train  in  crude  oil  prices  today.  Excessive 
speculation  is  being  driven  by  what  Michael  Masters,  of  Masters 
Capital Management, refers to as ‘‘index speculators,’’ as compared 
to  traditional  speculators.  ‘‘Index  speculators’’  are  institutional  in-
vestors,  such  as  corporate  and  government  pension  funds,  sov-
ereign wealth funds, and university endowments. These players are 
sometimes referred to as noncommercial or nonphysical players. 

Index  speculators  have  driven  the  demand,  which  does  not  cor-
relate  to  the  physical—current  physical  demand.  Even  though  the 
rate of increase in China’s demand, and, in fact, the world’s trade— 
or,  the  world’s  rate  of  increase  in  demand,  has  slowed  in  recent 
years, the price of crude oil has almost tripled in that same period. 
Isn’t  it  interesting  that  the  largest  increase  in  demand  has  been 
speculative  trading,  which  has  increased  three  times  in  recent 
years? Is the runup in prices due to physical demand or speculative 
demand created by these indexes? 

This rise in crude-oil prices, which has reached $135 a barrel re-
cently, has dragged with it every single refined petroleum product, 
especially  heating  oil  and  diesel.  And,  in  May,  heating  oil  and  die-
sel  went  up  as  much  as  80  cents  a  gallon  in  that  1  month.  This 
price  spike  occurred  while  heating  oil  inventories  remained  at  or 
near  their  5-year  average.  While  energy  commodities  continue  to 
skyrocket,  petroleum  marketers  and  consumers  are  forced  to  pay 
excessively high energy prices. 

We have come to the conclusion that excessive speculation on en-
ergy  commodity  markets  has  driven  up  the  price  of  crude  oil,  and, 
consequently,  all  refined  petroleum  products,  without  the  supply 
and-demand fundamentals to justify the recent runup. 

Large  purchases  of  crude  oil  futures  contracts  by  speculators 
having  consequence  created  an  additional  demand  for  oil,  which 
drives up the price of the oil futures deliveries. 

The  October  2007  GAO  report  determined  that  futures  market 
speculation could have an upward effect on prices. However, it was 
hard to quantify, because not all the numbers are reported to regu-
latory  agencies.  We  must  have  full  transparency.  Speculators  who 
have  no  contact  with  the  physical  commodity  are  trading  on  over- 
the-counter markets and foreign boards of trade which, due to a se-
ries of legal and administrative loopholes, are virtually opaque. Be-
cause  these  are  unregulated  trades,  or  ‘‘dark  markets,’’  there  is  no 
record.  If  these  trades  were  manipulative  in  nature,  it  would  in-
crease  the  cost  to  the  American  consumer,  it  would  increase  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

36 

cost  of  the  commodity  sold.  Such  trading  would  leave  no  public 
data, and there would be no fingerprints. 

By passing the farm bill, you helped to take a first step in bring-
ing transparency to the energy trading markets, but the CFTC has 
provided ‘‘no action’’ letters to foreign boards of trade, which subse-
quently  now  does  not  give  CFTC  regulatory  authority  over  those 
trading platforms. 

Why  would  the  CFTC  not  want  authority  over  the  trading  plat-
forms  that  are  operating  within  the  United  States  and  trading 
U.S.-delivered  commodities?  We  suggest  that  Congress  and  admin-
istration consider closing the administrative foreign board of trades 
loophole by revoking the CFTC ‘‘no action’’ letters to oversee energy 
trading  platforms,  raising  margin  requirements  or  the  necessary 
collateral  for  noncommercial  entities,  or  so-called  ‘‘nonphysical 
players.’’  Currently,  margins  in  the  futures  trading  are  as  low  as 
3 percent for some contracts. To buy U.S. equities, margin require-
ments are a minimum of 50 percent, requiring noncommercial trad-
ers  to  have  the  ability  to  take  some  physical  delivery  of  the  prod-
uct,  to  provide  adequate  funding  for  the  CFTCs  so  that  they  can 
do  their  job,  PMAA  strongly  supports  the  free  exchange  of  com-
modity  futures  on  an—open,  well-regulated,  and  transparent  ex-
changes that are subject to the rules of law and accountability. 

Reliable  futures  markets  are  crucial  to  the  entire  petroleum  in-
dustry. Let’s make sure that these markets are competitively driv-
en  by  the  fundamentals  of  supply  and  demand.  We  and  our  cus-
tomers  need  our  public  officials,  including  the  Congress  and  the 
CFTC, to take a stand against the loopholes—or the loopholes that 
are artificially inflating energy prices. 

I  want  to  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  to  you  today, 

and I’m available for any questions that you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ramm follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GERRY RAMM,  PRESIDENT,  INLAND OIL COMPANY, 
EPHRATA,  WASHINGTON ON BEHALF OF THE PETROLEUM MARKETERS ASSOCIATION 
OF AMERICA 
Honorable  Chairman  Inouye  and  Ranking  Member  Stevens  and  distinguished 
Members of the Committee, thank you for the invitation to testify before you today. 
I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  provide  some  insight  on  the  extreme  volatility  and 
record setting prices seen in recent months on the energy commodity markets. 

I am an Officer on the Petroleum Marketers Association of America’s (PMAA) Ex-
ecutive Committee. PMAA is a national federation of 46 state and regional associa-
tions  representing  over  8,000  independent  fuel  marketers  that  collectively  account 
for approximately half of the gasoline and nearly all of the distillate fuel consumed 
by  motor  vehicles  and  heating  equipment  in  the  United  States.  I  also  work  for  In-
land  Oil  Company  in  Ephrata,  Washington.  My  Dad  started  Inland  Oil  Company 
in  1946  after  he  returned  from  duty  in  World  War  II.  Today  we  operate  seven  gas 
stations  and  convenience  stores  and  we  also  supply  fuel  to  eight  independent  deal-
ers.  Also,  supporting  my  testimony  here  today  is  the  New  England  Fuel  Institute 
who represents over 1,000 heating fuel dealers in the New England area. 

Last  year,  gasoline  and  heating  oil  retailers  saw  profit  margins  from  fuel  sales 
fall  to  their  lowest  point  in  decades  as  oil  prices  surged.  The  retail  motor  fuels  in-
dustry is one of the most competitive industries in the marketplace, which is domi-
nated by small, independent businesses. Retail station owners offer the lowest price 
for motor fuels to remain competitive, so that they generate enough customer traffic 
inside  the  store  where  station  owners  can  make  a  modest  profit  by  offering  drink 
and snack items. Because petroleum marketers and station owners must pay for the 
inventory  they  sell,  their  lines  of  credit  are  approaching  their  limit  due  to  the  high 
costs of gasoline, heating oil and diesel. This creates a credit crisis with marketers’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

37 

banks,  which  creates  liquidity  problems  and  may  force  petroleum  marketers  and 
station owners to close up shop. 

Excessive  speculation  on  energy  trading  facilities  is  the  fuel  that  is  driving  this 
runaway train in crude oil prices. The rise in crude oil prices in recent weeks, which 
reached  $135.09  on  May  22,  2008,  has  dragged  with  it  every  single  refined  petro-
leum  product,  especially  heating  oil.  According  to  the  Department  of  Energy,  the 
cost of crude accounts for roughly 73 percent of the pump price, up from 62 percent 
in  January  2008.1 Wholesale  heating  oil  prices  from  March  5,  2008–May  28,  2008 
have  risen  from  $2.97  to  $3.81.2 The  spike  comes  despite  warmer  temperatures  in 
the  Northeast  and  the  end  of  the  heating  oil  season.  Interestingly,  Colonial  Group 
Inc.  which  provides  wholesale/retail  petroleum  fuels  announced  May  7,  2008,  that 
it  had  150,000  barrels  of  surplus  heating  oil  available  for  auction.  That  same  day 
heating oil futures set yet another record high with a 9.3 cent gain at $3.37 a gallon 
along  with  temperatures  averaging  in  the  upper  70s  in  the  Northeast.  The  data 
doesn’t add up. 

Large purchases of crude oil futures contracts by speculators have created an ad-
ditional  demand  for  oil  which  drives  up  the  prices  of  oil  for  future  delivery.  This 
has the same effect as the additional demand for contracts for delivery of a physical 
barrel today drives up the price for oil on the spot market. According to the Depart-
ment  of  Energy,  the  amount  of  petroleum  products  shipped  by  the  world’s  top  oil 
exporters fell 2.5 percent last year, despite a 57 percent increase in prices. 

According to a 2006 Senate Permanent Subcommittee on Investigations bipartisan 
report  by  Chairman  Carl  Levin  (D-MI)  and  Ranking  Member  Norm  Coleman  (R– 
MN) entitled, The Role of Market Speculation in Rising Oil and Gas Prices: A Need 
to Put the Cop Back on the Beat, ‘‘Several analysts have estimated that speculative 
purchases  of  oil  futures  have  added  as  much  as  $20–$25  per  barrel  to  the  current 
price of crude oil, thereby pushing up the price of oil from $50 to approximately $70 
per barrel.’’ Who would have thought that crude oil futures would rise to over $130 
a barrel? 

Three  weeks  ago,  Michael  Masters,  Managing  Member  and  Portfolio  Manager  of 
Masters  Capital  Management,  LLC,  a  hedge  fund,  argued  before  the  Senate  Com-
mittee  on  Homeland  Security  and  Government  Affairs  that  institutional  investors 
are  the  cause  of  the  recent  run-up  in  commodity  prices.  Institutional  investors  are 
buying  up  all  the  commodity  contracts  (going  long),  especially  energy  commodities, 
and  are  not  selling,  thereby  causing  the  demand  for  contracts  to  increase  and  put-
ting further pressure on commodity prices. Institutional investors allocate a portion 
of their portfolios into commodities since they are posting solid returns rather than 
traditional investments like stocks and bonds. 

Since  commodities  futures  markets  are  much  smaller  than  equity  markets,  bil-
lions invested into commodity markets will have a far greater impact on commodity 
prices than billions of dollars invested in equity markets. Masters stated that while 
some  economists  point  to  China’s  demand  for  crude  oil  as  the  cause  for  the  recent 
rise in energy costs, he disclaims that assumption. In fact, Masters’ testimony high-
lights  a  Department  of  Energy  report  that  annual  Chinese  demand  for  petroleum 
has  increased  over  the  last  5  years  by  920  million  barrels.  Yet,  over  the  same  five- 
year  period,  index  speculators’  demand  for  petroleum  futures  has  increased  by  848 
million  barrels,  thus  the  increase  in  demand  from  institutional  investors  is  almost 
equal to the increase in demand from China! Wouldn’t this demand by institutional 
investors have some effect on prices? 

Also, many economists and financial analysts report that the weak dollar has put 
pressure  on  crude  oil  prices.  While  the  weak  dollar  explanation  is  partly  true  be-
cause  crude  oil  is  denominated  in  dollars  which  reduces  the  price  of  oil  exports  for 
producers, leading them to seek higher prices to make up for the loss, this does not 
justify  crude  oil’s  move  beyond  $130  a  barrel.  On  May  1,  2008,  the  front  month 
NYMEX WTI crude oil contract closed just under $113 per barrel. Three weeks later 
the  same  front  month  NYMEX  WTI  contract  was  trading  at  over  $132  per  barrel. 
In  that  same  period  of  time  the  dollar  traded  between  $1.50  to  $1.60  against  the 
Euro.  While  the  Euro  strengthened  against  the  dollar,  it  doesn’t  justify  that  crude 
oil  should  have  increased  $19.  There  were  no  significant  supply  disruptions  during 
this time period. 

U.S. destined crude oil contracts could be trading DAILY at a rate that is multiple 
times the rate of annual consumption, and U.S. destined heating oil contracts could 
be trading daily multiple times the rate of annual consumption. Imagine the impact 
on  the  housing  market  if  every  single  house  was  bought  and  sold  multiple  times 

1 Energy Information Administration, ‘‘Gasoline and Diesel Fuel Update,’’ April 2008. 
2 Energy  Information  Administration,  ‘‘U.S.  No.  2  Heating  Oil  Wholesale/Resale  Prices,’’ 

March 5–May 28, 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

38 

every day. An October 2007 Government Accountability Office report, Trends in En-
ergy  Derivatives  Markets  Raise  Questions  about  CFTC’s  Oversight,  determined  that 
futures  market  speculation  could  have  an  upward  effect  on  prices;  however,  it  was 
hard  to  quantify  the  exact  totals  due  to  lack  of  transparency  and  recordkeeping  by 
the CFTC. 

To  be  able  to  accurately  ‘‘add  up’’  all  of  the  numbers,  you  must  have  full  market 
transparency.  This  is  perhaps  the  biggest  barrier  to  obtaining  an  accurate  percent-
age  calculation  of  the  per  barrel  cost  of  non-commercial  speculative  investment  in 
crude  oil,  natural  gas  and  other  energy  products.  Much  of  the  non-commercial  (i.e., 
speculators  that  have  no  direct  contact  with  the  physical  commodity)  involvement 
in  the  commodities  markets  is  isolated  to  the  over-the-counter  markets  and  foreign 
boards-of-trade, which, due to a series of legal and administrative loopholes, are vir-
tually opaque. 

PMAA  would  like  to  thank  Congress  for  passing  the  Farm  Bill  (H.R.  2419),  spe-
cifically, Title XIII, which will bring some transparency to over-the-counter markets. 
However, the Farm Bill is only a first step. 

What  the  Farm  Bill  language  does  not  do  is  repeal  a  letter  of  ‘‘no  action’’  issued 
by  the  CFTC  to  the  London  based  International  Petroleum  Exchange  (IPE)  which 
was  subsequently  purchased  by  the  Intercontinental  Exchange  (ICE).  The  letter  of 
no  action  was  issued  since  the  IPE  was  regulated  by  the  United  Kingdom’s  Finan-
cial Services Authority (FSA), which theoretically exercised comparable oversight of 
the IPE as CFTC did to NYMEX. Recently, however, whether or not the FSA exer-
cises ‘‘comparable oversight’’ was brought into question by CFTC Commissioner Bart 
Chilton.  Congress  needs  to  investigate  whether  or  not  oversight  by  foreign  regu-
lators is ‘‘comparable.’’ Currently, FSA doesn’t monitor daily trading to prevent ma-
nipulation,  publish  daily  trading  information,  or  impose  and  enforce  position  limits 
that prevent excessive speculation. 

ICE is the exchange most often utilized by those who exploit the Enron Loophole. 
ICE  is  a  publicly  traded  exchange  whose  shareholders  are  primarily  investment 
funds. In recent years ICE’s trading volume has exploded at the expense of the reg-
ulated NYMEX. According to the Securities and Exchange Commission filings, trad-
ers on ICE made bets on oil with a total paper value of $8 trillion in 2007, up from 
$1.7 trillion in 2005.3 ICE purchased IPE and will continue to claim exemptions on 
various  contracts  whether  or  not  the  Farm  bill  becomes  law  since  they  effectively 
have a ‘‘get out of jail free card.’’ 

While  PMAA  applauds  the  recent  CFTC  announcement  that  it  will  expand  infor-
mation sharing with the U.K.’s Financial Services Agency and ICE Futures Europe 
to  obtain  large  trader  positions  in  the  West  Texas  Intermediate  crude  oil  contract, 
more  needs  to  be  done  to  prevent  and  deter  market  manipulation  on  all  foreign 
boards of trade. 

Congress and the Administration might also consider: 

1.  Closing  the  Administrative  Foreign  Boards-of-Trade  Loophole  via  review  or 
elimination  of  CFTC  ‘‘no  action  letters’’  to  overseas  energy  trading  platforms. 
PMAA  supports  any  legislative  remedy  that  would  ensure  that  all  off-shore  ex-
changes be subject to the same level of oversight and regulation as domestic ex-
changes  such  as  the  NYMEX  when  those  exchanges  allow  U.S.  access  to  their 
platforms, trade U.S. destined commodities, or are owned and operated by U.S.- 
based companies. 
2. Raising margin requirements (or necessary collateral) for non-commercial en-
tities or so-called ‘‘non-physical players,’’ i.e., commodities traders and investors 
that  do  not  have  the  ability  to  take  physical  possession  of  the  commodity,  or 
otherwise incurs risk (including price risk) associated with the commodity either 
in connection with their business or that of a client. In other words, anyone who 
does  not  meet  the  definition  of  ‘‘eligible  commercial  entity’’  under  7  U.S.C. 
§ 1a(11). Currently, margin requirements in futures trading are as low as 3 per-
cent  for  some  contracts.  To  buy  U.S.  equities,  margin  requirements  are  a  min-
imum of 50 percent. 
3. Requiring non-commercial traders (e.g., financial institutions, insurance com-
panies, commodity pools) to have the ability to take physical delivery of at least 
some of the product. (Rep. John Larson (D–CT) is considering such a proposal). 
4.  Banning  from  the  market  any  participant  that  does  not  have  the  ability  to 
take  direct  physical  possession  of  a  commodity,  is  not  trading  in  order  to  man-
age risk associated with the commodity, or is not a risk management or hedging 

3 Herbst, Moira; Speculation—but Not Manipulation: Financial News, Business Week, May 30, 

2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

39 

service  (again,  anyone  that  does  not  meet  the  statutory  definition  of  ‘‘commer-
cial entity’’ under 7 § U.S.C. 1a(11). 
5. Significantly increase funding for the CFTC. The FY 2009 President’s budget 
recommendation  is  for  $130  million.  While  this  is  an  increase  from  previous 
years,  CFTC  staff  has  declined  by  12  percent  since  the  commission  was  estab-
lish  in  1976,  yet  total  contract  volume  has  increased  over  8,000  percent.  Con-
gress  should  appropriate  sufficient  funding  to  keep  up  with  the  ever  changing 
environment of energy derivatives markets. 

We  and  our  customers  need  our  public  officials,  including  those  in  Congress  and 
on the CFTC, to take a stand against excessive speculation that artificially inflates 
energy  prices.  PMAA  strongly  supports  the  free  exchange  of  commodity  futures  on 
open, well regulated and transparent exchanges that are subject to the rule of laws 
and  accountability.  Many  PMAA  members  rely  on  these  markets  to  hedge  product 
for the benefit of their business planning and their consumers. Reliable futures mar-
kets  are  crucial  to  the  entire  petroleum  industry.  Let’s  make  sure  that  these  mar-
kets are competitively driven by supply and demand. 

Thank you again for allowing me the opportunity to testify before you today. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Mr. Ramm. 
Fourth,  we’ll  hear  from  Lee  Ann  Watson,  Deputy  Director  of  Di-
vision  of  Investigation,  Office  of  Enforcement,  for  the  Federal  En-
ergy  Regulatory  Commission.  And  Ms.  Watson  helped  develop  and 
implement FERC’s anti-manipulation authority, which is the same 
authority  that  we  have  given  to  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  as 
it relates to physical oil markets. 

Ms. Watson, welcome. 

STATEMENT  OF  LEE  ANN  WATSON,  DEPUTY  DIRECTOR, 
DIVISION  OF  INVESTIGATIONS,  OFFICE  OF  ENFORCEMENT, 
FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION (FERC) 
Ms. WATSON. Thank you. 
First,  let  me  apologize  for  my  voice.  I  woke  up  with  a  cold  this 

Ms. WATSON. A little closer? 
Senator CANTWELL.—that’ll help you and less—— 
Ms. WATSON. Is this a little—— 
Senator CANTWELL.—strain on your voice. 
Ms. WATSON.—better? 
Senator CANTWELL. Yes, thank you. 
Ms. WATSON. Thank you. 
Madam  Chair  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  thank  you  for 
inviting me to testify today. I am here today to discuss the experi-
ence  of  the  Federal  Energy  Regulatory  Commission,  or  FERC,  in 
implementing  the  statutory  authority  granted  to  FERC  in  the  En-
ergy  Policy  Act  of  2005,  or  as—I  will  refer  to  it  as  EPAct—to  pro-
hibit  manipulation  in  wholesale  electric  energy  and  natural  gas 
markets. 

In  particular,  this  experience  may  be  useful,  as  it  may  relate  to 
similar  authority  recently  granted  to  the  Federal  Trade  Commis-
sion, or the FTC. I note, however, that I could not address market 
manipulation  in  the  oil  and  petroleum  products  markets.  FERC 
does  not  have  jurisdiction  over  those  markets  or  expertise  in  how 
such manipulation might be prevented by the FTC. 

morning, so bear with me. 

phone a little closer—— 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you.  If  you  could  just  pull  the  micro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

40 

I also note that I appear before you today as a staff witness, and 
I  do  not  represent  the  views  of  the  Commission  or  any  individual 
commissioner. 

EPAct  added  new  provisions  in  both  the  Federal  Power  Act  and 
the  Natural  Gas  Act  to  prohibit  manipulation  in  FERC  jurisdic-
tional  markets  for  wholesale  sales  of  electric  energy  and  natural 
gas  and  electric  transmission  and  natural  gas  transportation.  Be-
cause  the  statutory  authority  was  not  self-implementing,  however, 
upon  passage  of  EPAct,  in  August  2005,  the  FERC  staff  imme-
diately began work in preparing a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking, 
or  NOPR,  which  was  issued  on  October  20,  2005.  After  reviewing 
and considering comments on the NOPR, the FERC issued, on Jan-
uary  19,  2006,  its  final  anti-manipulation  regulations.  These  new 
regulations,  one  for  natural  gas  and  one  for  electricity,  closely 
model Rule 10b–5 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, pursuant 
to  Congress’s  direction  that  the  prohibited  manipulative  activity 
should  be  consistent  with  the  prohibited  activity  in  Section  10b  of 
the  Securities  Exchange  Act.  That  direction  was  an  important  fac-
tor  in  the  FERC’s  ability  to  quickly  implement  its  anti-manipula-
tion regulations and authority. 

The  new  anti-manipulation  regulations  promulgated  by  FERC 
are  very  broad,  just  like  10b–5,  and  are  meant  to  be  a  catchall 
fraud provision, just as Rule 10b–5 has been interpreted in the se-
curities  context.  And  while  FERC’s  anti-manipulation  regulations 
seek  to  draw  on  the  large  body  of  security  case  law  under  Section 
10b and Rule 10b–5, FERC also recognized that the securities case 
law  could  only  be  applied  as  appropriate  in  the  circumstances  of 
each  case  because  of  the  differences  in  the  missions  between  the 
SEC and FERC. For example, the SEC, whose mission is to assure 
adequate  disclosure  in  the  financial  markets  and  to  protect  inves-
tors,  does  not  have  a  duty  to  assure  that  the  price  of  a  security  is 
just  and  reasonable.  The  FERC,  on  the  other  hand,  has  as  a  core 
mission to assure the just and reasonable prices for wholesale sales 
of  electricity  and  natural  gas  and  for  the  transmission  and  trans-
portation of those products. Despite these differences, the securities 
case  law  is  available  by  analogy,  and  thus  provides  guidance  and 
certainty  to  the  market  participants  who  wish  to  avoid  violating 
the FERC’s anti-manipulation regulations within the framework of 
the FPA and the NGA. 

In  developing  and  adopting  the  anti-manipulation  regulations 
under  the  new  EPAct  provisions,  FERC  was  not  writing  on  an  en-
tirely  clean  slate,  since,  prior  to  EPAct,  it  did  have  regulations  in 
place  to  prohibit  market  manipulation.  In  2003,  in  the  aftermath 
of  the  California  energy  crisis,  FERC  had  required  all  market- 
based  rate  sellers  to  incorporate,  in  their  tariffs  or  authorizations, 
a  rule  prohibiting  market  manipulation.  However,  because  the 
breadth  and  application  of  the  anti-manipulation  provisions  con-
tained  in  EPAct  were  substantially  greater,  the  FERC  decided  to 
rescind its prior provisions. 

In  addition  to  implementing  its  new  anti-manipulation  rules 
under  EPAct  quickly,  FERC  also  promptly  issued  a  policy  state-
ment on enforcement, highlighting the factors it would take into ac-
count  in  determining  civil  penalties,  which  were  also  enhanced 
under  EPAct.  In  this  regard,  FERC  also  looked  to  other  agencies 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

41 

with  more  experience,  such  as  the  Department  of  Justice,  the 
CFTC, and the SEC, and modeled the policy statement on enforce-
ment on prior proven policies of its sister agencies. 

The FERC has not hesitated to put its new anti-manipulation au-
thority  to  work  to  protect  consumers.  In  July  2007,  less  than  2 
years  after  EPAct  was  enacted,  the  FERC  issued  two  orders  to 
show cause for alleged market manipulation, seeking to oppose civil 
penalties in excess of $450 million, and this includes the Amaranth 
case,  which  has  been  noted  earlier  today.  Further,  since  the  time 
that EPAct provided FERC with the increased civil penalty author-
ity,  it  has  approved  15  settlements  which  include  civil  penalties  of 
over $52 million. 

This concludes my remarks, and I would be happy to answer any 

questions the Members of the Committee might have. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Watson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LEE ANN WATSON,  DEPUTY DIRECTOR,  DIVISION OF 
INVESTIGATIONS,  OFFICE OF ENFORCEMENT,  FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY 
COMMISSION (FERC) 
Madam Chair and Members of the Committee: 
Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  today.  My  testimony  addresses  the  Federal 
Energy  Regulatory  Commission’s  (FERC)  implementation  of  the  aspects  of  the  En-
ergy  Policy  Act  of  2005  (EPAct  2005)  provisions  prohibiting  manipulation  of  whole-
sale  electric  energy  and  natural  gas  markets.  I  appear  before  you  today  as  a  staff 
witness  and  do  not  represent  the  views  of  the  Commission  or  any  individual  Com-
missioner. 

At  the  outset,  I  should  note  for  the  Committee’s  information  that  I  am  not  pre-
pared to discuss whether there is or has been manipulation of oil or petroleum mar-
kets  nor  am  I  able  to  discuss  crude  oil  or  gasoline  prices.  With  respect  to  oil  and 
petroleum, FERC’s jurisdiction is very limited. FERC has jurisdiction only over rate-
making of oil pipeline transportation in interstate commerce under the authority of 
the  Interstate  Commerce  Act  and  the  Department  of  Energy  Organization  Act  of 
1977,  42  U.S.C.  § 7101  et  seq.  FERC  has  no  jurisdiction  over,  and  therefore  no  au-
thority  to  investigate,  the  prices  charged  for  oil,  gasoline,  diesel,  or  heating  oil,  or 
the markets where those and other oil and petroleum products are traded. 

FERC’s  primary  mission  is  to  ensure  ‘‘just  and  reasonable’’  rates  for  certain 
wholesale  sales  of  electric  energy  and  natural  gas  in  interstate  commerce  and  elec-
tric transmission and natural gas transportation in interstate commerce. FERC’s ef-
forts  to  prohibit  manipulation  of  the  wholesale  sales  of  electric  energy  and  natural 
gas markets began in earnest in November 2003, prior to EPAct 2005. At that time, 
the  FERC  adopted  the  Market  Behavior  Rules,  including  Market  Behavior  Rule  2.1 
In contrast to the FERC’s current broad EPAct 2005 anti-manipulation regulations, 
which I will discuss momentarily, Market Behavior Rule 2 was limited in scope and 
application; it applied to certain sales and sellers of electricity and natural gas. Not-
withstanding its limitations, Market Behavior Rule 2 and its companion rules were 
an important first step in an evolving enforcement program at FERC that balanced 
the  need  for  clearly  delineated  ‘‘rules  of  the  road’’  for  market  participants  without 
unduly impairing FERC’s ability to address new and unforeseen abuses. 

On  August  8,  2005,  EPAct  2005  became  law  and  significantly  supplemented  the 
Commission’s  enforcement  authorities.  Three  enforcement  tools  in  particular  pro-
vided  FERC  with  the  ability  to  more  adequately  police  jurisdictional  electric  and 
natural  gas  markets  and  sanction  manipulative  behavior  in  those  markets.  First, 
EPAct  2005  amended  the  FPA  and  NGA  to  grant  broad  statutory  authority  to  pro-
hibit fraud and market manipulation. Second, it granted robust civil penalty author-
ity  to  deter  and  punish  violations  of  FERC  orders,  rules  and  regulations.  Third,  it 
provides  authority  to  seek  a  court  order  to  bar  individuals  found  to  have  violated 
FERC’s  new  anti-manipulation  authority  from  acting  as  an  officer  or  director  of  a 

1 Investigation  of  Terms  and  Conditions  of  Public  Utility  Market-Based  Rate  Authorizations, 
‘‘Order  Amending  Market-Based  Rate  Tariffs  and  Authorizations,’’  105  FERC  ¶ 61,218  (2003), 
reh’g  denied,  107  FERC  ¶ 61,175  (2004);  Amendments  to  Blanket  Sales  Certificates,  105  FERC 
¶ 61,218 (2003), reh’g denied, 107 FERC ¶ 61,174 (2004). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

42 

jurisdictional entity, or engaging in FERC-jurisdictional transactions. I discuss these 
new authorities in further detail below. 

In  sections  315  and  1283  of  EPAct  2005,  Congress  added  section  4A  to  the  Nat-
ural  Gas  Act  (NGA)  and  section  222  to  the  Federal  Power  Act  (FPA),  respectively.2 
These  sections  prohibit  ‘‘any  entity,’’  not  only  those  traditional  energy  companies 
regulated  by  FERC,  from  the  use  or  employment  of  ‘‘any  manipulative  or  deceptive 
device or contrivance,’’ as those terms are used in section 10(b) of the Securities Ex-
change  Act  of  1934  (Exchange  Act),  in  connection  with  the  purchase  or  sale  of  nat-
ural  gas,  electric  energy,  or  transportation  or  transmission  services  subject  to 
FERC’s jurisdiction.3 Although sections 315 and 1283 of EPAct were not self-imple-
menting,  by  modeling  them  on  section  10(b)  of  the  Exchange  Act,  and  explicitly  di-
recting  that  certain  terms  be  used  as  in  section  10(b),  Congress  provided  FERC  a 
clear model to follow—SEC Rule 10b–5—in prohibiting market manipulation.4 

On October 20, 2005, only 2 months after the passage of EPAct 2005, FERC took 
the  first  public  step  toward  implementing  the  anti-manipulation  fraud  authority 
when  it  issued  a  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (NOPR).5 FERC  was  able  to  act 
quickly in part because FERC staff had been studying SEC Rule 10b–5 in anticipa-
tion  of  the  passage  of  EPAct  2005.  Upon  the  passage  of  EPAct  2005,  FERC  staff 
met  with  senior  enforcement  staff  from  the  SEC  and  held  several  subsequent  con-
ference  calls  with  them  to  aid  in  FERC’s  understanding  of  the  model  upon  which 
it would propose its anti-manipulation rule. Thirty parties filed comments and nine 
parties filed reply comments to the NOPR, representing a diverse group of industry 
stakeholders.  Overwhelmingly,  commenters  were  supportive  of  our  efforts  to  imple-
ment  well-developed,  clear  and  fair  rules  modeled  on  SEC  Rule  10b–5  because  the 
approach  provided  FERC,  and  industry,  the  opportunity,  where  appropriate,  to 
make  use  of  the  significant  body  of  case  law  that  has  developed  under  Exchange 
Act  section  10(b)  and  SEC  Rule  10b–5.  In  the  NOPR,  FERC  noted  the  overlap  be-
tween its previously adopted Market Behavior Rule 2 and the proposed EPAct 2005 
anti-manipulation  regulations.  FERC  said  that  it  would  retain  Market  Behavior 
Rule  2  pending  the  promulgation  of  a  final  EPAct  2005  regulation  so  as  to  ensure 
there  would  be  no  gap  in  FERC’s  prohibition  of  market  manipulation.  FERC  also 
said,  however,  that  it  would  seek  comment  on  whether  it  should  revise  or  rescind 
Market Behavior Rule 2. 

In  November  2005,  FERC  proposed  to  rescind  Market  Behavior  Rule  2  and  the 
analogous  gas  regulation  once  it  issued  new  anti-manipulation  provisions  of  EPAct 
2005.6 FERC  noted  that  rescission  of  Market  Behavior  Rule  2  would  simplify 
FERC’s rules by avoiding duplicative regulation, and in so doing, reduce regulatory 
uncertainty by assuring that all market participants are held to the same standard. 
FERC  explained  that  rescinding  the  Market  Behavior  Rules  was  consistent  with 
Congressional  intent  in  EPAct  2005,  which  provided  FERC  explicit  anti-manipula-
tion  authority  and  a  clear  model  to  follow  in  implementing  that  authority.  FERC 
was  concerned  that  having  two  general  anti-manipulation  rules,  differing  in  scope 
and  application,  would  result  in  significant  regulatory  uncertainty  without  offering 
any  additional  protection  for  customers.  After  careful  review  of  the  21  comments 
and four reply comments in response to the November 2005 order, which were most-
ly  supportive  of  FERC’s  objective  to  bring  greater  clarity  to  its  rules  and  regula-
tions,  FERC  exercised  its  discretion  and  rescinded  Market  Behavior  Rule  2  in  Feb-
ruary  2006,  approximately  a  month  after  the  effective  date  of  the  new  EPAct  2005 
anti-manipulation regulations.7 

As mentioned earlier, in EPAct 2005, Congress added section 4A to the NGA and 
section 222 to the FPA. These sections prohibit ‘‘any entity’’ from the use or employ-
ment  of  ‘‘any  manipulative  or  deceptive  device  or  contrivance,’’  as  those  terms  are 
used  in  section  10(b)  of  the  Exchange  Act,  in  connection  with  the  purchase  or  sale 
of natural gas, electric energy, or transportation or transmission services subject to 
FERC’s jurisdiction. 

On  January  19,  2006,  just  5  months  after  the  passage  of  EPAct  2005,  FERC  im-
plemented  section  4A  to  the  NGA  and  section  222  to  the  FPA  and  promulgated  its 
final  EPAct  2005  anti-manipulation  regulations,  which  are  codified  in  Part  1c  of 
Title  18  of  the  Code  of  Federal  Regulations.8 Consistent  with  Congressional  intent, 

2 Energy Policy Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109–58, 119 Stat. 594 (2005) et seq.; 15 U.S.C. §§ 717 

et al. (2000); 16 U.S.C. §§ 791 et al. (2000). 

3 Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78j(b) (2000). 
4 17 C.F.R. § 240.10b–5 (2007). 
5 Prohibition of Energy Market Manipulation, 113 FERC ¶ 61,067 (2005) (NOPR). 
6 Investigation  of  Terms  and  Conditions  of  Public  Utility  Market-Based  Rate  Authorizations, 

113 FERC ¶ 61,190 (2005). 

7 Order Revising Market-Based Rate Tariffs and Authorizations, 114 FERC ¶ 61,165 (2006). 
8 18 C.F.R. § 1c (2007). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

43 

the scope of application of Part 1c is not limited to FERC jurisdictional entities. In-
stead,  Part  1c  is  a  ‘‘catch-all’’  provision,  applying  to  any  entity  that  perpetrates  a 
fraud, with the requisite scienter, in connection with the purchase or sale of natural 
gas  or  electric  energy  or  transportation  or  transmission  services  subject  to  FERC’s 
jurisdiction.  The  issues  raised  by  commenters  to  the  NOPR  did  not  require  sub-
stantive changes to the proposed rule because the preamble to the final rule, Order 
No.  670,  deals  with  the  issues  raised  and  provides  clarity  and  guidance  as  to  how 
the  rule  will  operate.9 For  example,  in  Order  No.  670,  FERC  recognizes  the  dif-
ferences in mission between the FERC and the SEC—that is, the SEC does not have 
a  duty  to  assure  that  the  price  of  a  security  is  just  and  reasonable  just  as  FERC’s 
duty  is  not  to  protect  purchasers  though  a  regime  of  disclosure.  Despite  these  dif-
ferences in mission, however, FERC recognized that natural gas and power markets, 
like securities markets, are susceptible to fraud and market manipulation. 

Part  1c  gives  FERC  an  important  tool  to  ensure  that  the  markets  subject  to  its 
jurisdiction are well-functioning, and represents an important step toward assuring 
that  customers  are  properly  safeguarded  from  acts  of  market  manipulation  while 
providing regulatory certainty to market participants. Part 1c became effective upon 
its  publication  in  the  Federal  Register  on  January  26,  2006.  Two  enforcement  ac-
tions,  one  under  Part  1c  and  one  under  its  predecessor  Market  Behavior  Rule  2, 
where  FERC  made  preliminary  findings  of  market  manipulation  involving  traders’ 
unlawful  actions  in  natural  gas  markets  and  proposed  civil  penalties  totaling  $458 
million, demonstrate that FERC is dedicated to ensuring the markets subject to its 
jurisdiction  are  well-functioning  and  free  from  fraud.10 FERC’s  investigative  activi-
ties are not limited to these two matters, but FERC’s regulations prohibit staff from 
discussing any other potential investigative matters. 

In  EPAct  2005,  Congress  also  granted  FERC  enhanced  authority  to  assess  civil 
penalties for violations of the Federal Power Act, Natural Gas Act and the Natural 
Gas Policy Act in three important ways. First, Congress expanded FERC’s FPA civil 
penalty  authority  to  cover  violations  of  any  provision  of  Part  II  of  the  FPA,  as  well 
as of any rule or order issued there under.11 Second, Congress extended FERC’s civil 
penalty authority to cover violations of the NGA or any rule, regulation, restriction, 
condition,  or  order  made  or  imposed  by  FERC  under  NGA  authority.12 Third,  Con-
gress  established  the  maximum  civil  penalty  FERC  may  assess  under  the  NGA, 
NGPA,  or  Part  II  of  the  FPA  as  $1,000,000  per  violation  for  each  day  that  it  con-
tinues.13 Since January 1, 2006, FERC has employed its new civil penalty authority, 
which  was  not  made  retroactive  by  EPAct  2005,  in  15  cases  resulting  in  a  total  of 
over $52 million in civil penalties and tailored compliance plans. 

The third tool EPAct 2005 provided FERC is the ability to seek an order of a Fed-
eral  district  court  to  prohibit,  conditionally  or  unconditionally,  and  permanently  or 
for  such  period  of  time  as  the  court  determines,  any  individual  who  is  engaged  or 
has engaged in practices constituting a violation of FERC’s EPAct 2005 anti-manip-
ulation  regulations  from:  (1)  acting  as  an  officer  or  director  of  a  natural  gas  com-
pany;  or  (2)  engaging  in  the  business  of  the  purchasing  or  selling  of  natural  gas  or 
electric  energy,  or  the  purchasing  or  selling  of  transmission  services  subject  to 
FERC’s jurisdiction. This is a particularly useful tool where, for example, FERC de-
termines  that  it  is  necessary  to  seek  the  removal  of  a  rogue  trader  that  was  found 
to  have  violated  Part  1c  as  an  individual.  A  similar  provision  is  contained  in  the 
FPA. 

Prior to the promulgation of FERC’s new anti-manipulation rule, but on the same 
day in October 2005 when FERC issued its proposed anti-manipulation rule NOPR, 
FERC  issued  its  Policy  Statement  on  Enforcement  to  provide  the  public  with  guid-
ance and regulatory certainty regarding FERC’s enforcement of the statutes, orders, 
rules and regulations it administers.14 Among other things, the Policy Statement on 
Enforcement  details  the  FERC’s  penalty  assessment  process.  Shortly  after  the 
issuance  of  the  Policy  Statement  on  Enforcement,  FERC’s  instituted  a  No-Action 
Letter  Process  whereby  regulated  entities  can  seek  informal  staff  advice  regarding 
whether a transaction would be viewed by staff as constituting a violation of certain 

9 Prohibition of Energy Market Manipulation, III FERC Stats. & Regs., Regulation Preambles 

P31,202 (2006) (Order No. 670). 

10 See  Energy  Transfer  Partners,  L.P.,  120  FERC  P  61,086  (2007)  (Market  Behavior  Rule  2); 

Amaranth Advisors L.L.C., 120 FERC P 61,085 (2007) (Anti-Manipulation Rule). 

11 16  U.S.C.  § 825o–1  (2000)  (as  amended  by  EPAct  2005,  § 1284(e));  16  U.S.C.  § 823b  (2000). 
12 15 U.S.C. § 717t–1 (2000) (added by EPAct 2005, § 314(a)(1)). 
13 Supra  notes  11  and  12;  15  U.S.C.  § 3414(b)(6)  (2000)  (as  amended  by  EPAct  2005,  § 314). 
14 Enforcement of Statutes, Orders, Rules, and Regulations, 113 FERC ¶ 61,068 (2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

44 

orders  or  regulations.15 In  both  Orders,  FERC  drew  on  the  best  practices  of  other 
economic regulators including the Department of Justice, SEC and CFTC. As of May 
15, 2008, following a public conference where stakeholders were invited to comment 
on  aspects  of  FERC’s  enforcement  program,  FERC  issued  a  Revised  Policy  State-
ment  on  Enforcement  which  builds  on  the  October  2005  statement.16 Additionally, 
in December 2006, FERC issued a policy statement regarding the process for assess-
ing civil penalties, which provides a comprehensive review of the statutory require-
ments  associated  with  the  imposition  of  civil  penalties  under  Parts  I  and  II  of  the 
FPA, the NGA, and the NGPA.17 

In conclusion, I want again to thank the Committee for this opportunity to testify 
today on an important aspect of the FERC’s enforcement program. I would be happy 
to answer any questions members of the Committee may have. 

*

*

* 

In  sum,  below  are  the  milestones  in  the  implementation  timeline  for  the  EPAct 

2005 anti-manipulation regulations: 

1.  Pre-Passage  of  EPAct  2005:  FERC  staff  conducts  due  diligence  on  SEC  and 
CFTC anti-manipulation rules and precedent. 
2. August 8, 2005: EPAct 2005 becomes law and FERC staff forms an anti-ma-
nipulation rule drafting team. 
3. September 14, 2005: FERC staff meets with SEC staff to discuss SEC’s expe-
rience with Rule 10b–5. 
4. October 20, 2005: FERC issues its NOPR to prohibit energy market manipu-
lation  and  FERC  issues  its  first  Policy  Statement  on  Enforcement  to  provide 
guidance and regulatory certainty regarding FERC’s enforcement program. 
5.  November  18–December  30,  2005:  FERC  receives  and  reviews  thirty  com-
ments and nine reply comments on the NOPR. 
6.  January  19,  2006:  FERC  promulgates  its  anti-manipulation  rules  by  amend-
ing  its  regulations  to  implement  the  anti-manipulation  authority  granted  in 
EPAct 2005. 
7. January 26, 2006: FERC’s anti-manipulation regulations became effective. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you very much. And, again, we appre-

ciate you being here, Ms. Watson. 

We’re now going to hear from Mark Cooper, Director of Research 

at Consumer Federation of America. 

We appreciate you being here to testify today, Mr. Cooper. 

STATEMENT OF DR. MARK N. COOPER, DIRECTOR OF 
RESEARCH, CONSUMER FEDERATION OF AMERICA 

Dr.  COOPER.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chairwoman,  Members  of  the 

Committee. 

The  speculative  bubble  in  petroleum  markets  has  cost  the  aver-
age  American  household  about  $1,500  in  increased  gasoline,  nat-
ural gas, and electricity expenditures in the 2 years since the Sen-
ate  Permanent  Committee  on  Investigations  first  called  attention 
to  the  problem.  The  Senate  knew  about  this  problem  2  years  ago. 
It  has  cost  the  economy  well  over  half  a  trillion  dollars  in  those  2 
years. 

Worse still, it is now clear that the commodities futures markets 
have ceased to play their proper role of helping to smooth the func-
tioning  of  physical  markets  for  vital  commodities  like  energy  and 
food.  Instead,  they  have  become  engines  of  speculation  that  feed 
volatility, amp up volume, and increase risk, driving prices up and 

15 Informal Staff Advice on Regulatory Requirements, 113 FERC ¶ 61,174 (2005). 
16 Enforcement of Statutes, Orders, Rules, and Regulations, 123 FERC ¶ 61,156 (2008) (Revised 
Policy Statement on Enforcement) (superseding Enforcement of Statutes, Orders, Rules, and Reg-
ulations, 113 FERC ¶ 61,068 (2005)). 

17 Process for Assessing Civil Penalties, 117 FERC ¶ 61,317 (2006). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

45 

driving  commercial  traders  out  of  these  markets.  Unfortunately, 
the CFTC and the FERC have failed to protect the public, because 
they were slow to recognize the problem are not looking for the real 
causes,  for  they  look  for  a  narrow  set  of  abuses,  adopting  existing 
case  law,  they  ignore  the  much  broader  flaws  in  the  commodities 
futures markets. Energy commodities, in particular, are vulnerable 
to abuse, but they are traded in markets that are either totally un-
regulated or inadequately regulated. Prices are well above the costs 
of  production.  Risk  premiums  are  high  and  rising.  The  market 
structure  and  behaviors  are  biased  in  favor  of  higher  prices  and 
against consumers. There is a pervasive pattern of past abuses, in-
cluding manipulation of large positions, lack of transparency, struc-
tural  advances  enjoyed  by  large  traders,  the  exercise  of  market 
power,  insider  trading,  self-dealing,  and  trading  practices  that  ac-
celerate market trends. 

Energy  commodity  markets  are  a  recent  phenomenon,  and  they 
have  been  plagued  by  inefficiency,  manipulation,  and  rampant 
speculation  throughout  much  of  their  history,  creating  additional 
risk,  which  requires  costly  management,  enriches  the  speculators 
and arbitrageurs, but does physical traders and consumers no good 
whatsoever.  These  markets  need  to  be  overhauled  from  top  to  bot-
tom. 

It  would  be  reassuringly  simple  if  we  could  just  blame  the  cur-
rent speculative bubble on the blind ignorance, indifference, and in-
eptitude  of  the  regulatory  agencies,  ‘‘just  fire  the  commissioners 
and  clean  the  problem  up.’’  The  recent  proposals  that  have  been 
put  on  the  table  are  baby  steps  that  will  not  solve  the  problem. 
There are more fundamental problems that must be addressed. 

We have made it so easy to play in financial markets that invest-
ments  in  long-term  productive  assets  are  unattractive.  We  must 
turn  down  the  volume  by  imposing  more  stringent  conditions  on 
these financial markets. We must not only close the Enron loophole 
which allowed the vast swath of unregulated trading to take place, 
but  we  also  must  ensure  vigorous  enforcement  of  registration  and 
reporting. 

We  must  take  back  the  authority  we  have  given  to  foreign  ex-
changes  and  stop  abandoning  authority  to  private  actors.  Large 
traders  should  be  required  to  register  and  report  their  entire  posi-
tions across all commodity markets. Without comprehensive report-
ing,  there  will  always  be  room  for  mischief  that  is  out  of  the  sight 
of  the  regulator.  Registration  reporting  should  trigger  scrutiny  to 
ensure  the  good  character,  integrity,  and  competence  of  traders. 
Failure  to  comply  with  these  regulations  should  result  in  manda-
tory  jail  terms.  Fines  are  not  enough  to  dissuade  abuse  in  these 
commodity  markets,  because  there  is,  just,  so  much  money  to  be 
made  that  people  will  keep  trying  and  trying.  You  have  to  throw 
the  bad  guys  in  jail.  That’s  the  only  way  you’ll  get  the  attention 
of  all  the  people  who  know  they  can  make  a  fortune  by  manipu-
lating these markets. 

More  broadly,  we  need  to  restore  the  balance  between  specula-
tion  and  productive  investment.  Margin  requirements  and  reserve 
requirements  in  organized  exchanges  are  a  fraction  of  the  margin 
requirements  on  stocks.  If  it  is  cheaper  to  put  your  money  into 
speculation,  why  bother  with  real,  productive  investment?  The 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

46 

margin requirements for commodity trading among noncommercial 
traders should be 50 percent higher than the margin requirements 
for  investment  in  stocks.  They  should  be  more  lenient  for  physical 
traders  and  commercial  traders  who  really  need  to  get  these  com-
modities into the tanks and to consumers. 

We must level the playing field between long-term productive in-
vestment  and  short-term  speculative  gains,  with  a  tax  on  short- 
term capital gains between 33 and 50 percent. This will make hold-
ing  productive  assets  for  long  periods  as  attractive  as  flipping 
short-term financial paper. 

If  we  do  not  do  more  than  the  approaches  that  are  on  the  table, 
we will continue to lurch from crisis to crisis. The halfhearted reac-
tion  of  the  CFTC  and  the  FERC  are  the  regulatory  equivalent  of 
FEMA’s  reaction  to  Hurricane  Katrina,  too  low  and  too  slow  be-
cause the agency does not adequate the magnitude of the disaster. 
American  consumers  are  suffering  needlessly  from  the  speculative 
bubble in vital necessities. It is time for thorough reform and rereg-
ulation of financial commodities markets so that they can serve the 
American people, not oppress them. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Cooper follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. MARK COOPER, DIRECTOR OF RESEARCH, 

CONSUMER FEDERATION OF AMERICA 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, 
My name is Dr. Mark Cooper. I am Director of Research at the Consumer Federa-
tion of America. I greatly appreciate the opportunity to testify today on the immense 
burden  that  the  speculative  bubble  in  commodities  is  placing  on  American  house-
holds.  Congressional  studies,  like  that  prepared  by  the  Senate  Permanent  Sub-
committee  on  Investigations,  committee  on  Homeland  Security 1 and  Governmental 
Affairs 2 and  industry  analyses  have  become  convinced  that  speculation  is  contrib-
uting  to  skyrocketing  energy  prices—by  adding  as  much  as  $30  per  barrel  or  more. 
Natural  gas  prices  have  been  afflicted  by  a  speculative  premium  of  a  similar  order 
of  magnitude.3 Since  the  Senate  Permanent  Subcommittee  on  Investigations  first 
flagged this problem 2 years ago, the speculative bubble in the energy complex has 
cost  the  economy  more  than  $500  billion—i.e.,  half  a  trillion  dollars.  Expenditures 
for  household  energy  have  more  than  doubled  in  the  past  6  years  and  speculation 
has  played  a  significant  part  in  that  run  up.4 In  the  past  2  years,  the  speculative 
bubble has cost consumers over $1,500. 

The national economy and households budgets are being clobbered by these rising 
energy prices and it is not just supply and demand that are to blame. Our analysis 
shows  that  there  is  a  powerful  interaction  between  physical  market  problems  and 
financial market problems that creates a vicious, anti-consumer price spiral (see Ex-
hibit 1). In today’s hearing I focus on the financial market aspect. 

1 Senate  Permanent  Subcommittee  on  Investigations,  Committee  on  Homeland  Security,  The 
Role  of  Market  Speculation  in  Rising  Oil  and  Gas  Prices:  A  Need  to  Put  the  Cop  Back  on  the 
Beat (June 27, 2006). 

2 Akira  Yanagisawa,  Decomposition  Analysis  of  the  Soaring  Crude  Oil  Prices:  Analyzing  the 
Effects  of  Fundamentals  and  Premium  (Institute  of  Energy  Economics,  March  2008;  Robert  J. 
Shapiro and Nam D. Pham, An Analysis of Spot and Futures Prices for Natural Gas: The Roles 
of Economic Fundamental, Market Structure, Speculation and Manipulation (August, 2006). 

3 Mark  Cooper,  The  Role  of  Supply,  Demand  and  Financial  Commodity  Markets  in  the  Nat-
ural Gas Price Spiral, A report Prepared for the Midwest Attorney General Natural Gas Work-
ing Group (Illinois, Iowa, Missouri, and Wisconsin (March, 2006). 

4 Statement  of  Dr.  Mark  Cooper,  ‘‘Consumer  Effects  of  Retail  Gas  Prices,’’  Judiciary  Com-

mittee Antitrust Task Force, U.S. House of Representatives, May 7, 2008 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

Exhibit 1: Physical, Financial and Regulatory Factors in the Energy Price Spiral 

47 

Source:  Mark  Cooper,  ‘‘The  Failure  of  Federal  Authorities  to  Protect  American  Energy  Con-
sumers  from  Market  Power  and  Other  Abusive  Practices,’’  Loyola  Consumer  Law  Review,  19:4 
(2007), p. 318. 
The Problem of Hyper-Speculation in Energy Commodity Markets 

In March of 2006 I published a report for the Attorneys General of Illinois, Iowa, 
Missouri  and  Wisconsin  that  concluded  that  all  was  not  right  in  natural  gas  finan-
cial markets. 

Thus,  while  there  is  a  spiral  of  upward  pressure  on  prices  radiating  from  the 
physical  market  and  filtered  through  regulation,  this  analysis  shows  that  the 
financial  commodity  markets  may  be  dramatically  accentuating  the  problem  of 
high and volatile prices. 
Defenders  of  the  financial  markets  want  to  blame  the  whole  problem  on  the 
physical  markets  and  even  claim  that  traders  will  help  solve  the  problem.  But 
the evidence suggests that the financial commodity market bears at least some 
of the blame for pushing prices up. Today, the evidence that the financial com-
modity  markets  are  significantly  accelerating  price  increases  in  natural  gas 
markets is circumstantial, but quite strong. 
The overall pattern of prices supports the proposition that they have run up be-
yond anything that is justified by the problems in the physical market. 

• We  have  a  commodity  that  is  vulnerable  to  abuse,  in  a  new  market  that  has 

been under-regulated from its birth. 

• Public  policy  adopted  in  2000  further  reduced  regulation  and  opened  the  door 
to counterproductive, if not outright manipulative, behaviors and pushed prices 
higher. 

• We have a clear theory about how consumers could be hurt in this market. 
• The problem is that both the structure of the market and the behaviors of mar-

ket players are biased in favor of higher prices and against consumers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
P
O
O
C
3
0
6

48 

• We have evidence at the micro levels of a pervasive pattern of past abuses and 

rumors about suspicious behavior in the current market.5 
There  are  several  ways  in  which  financial  markets  may  be  magnifying  the 
upwardly volatile spiral of prices and contribute to the ratchet: 
Financial  markets  thrive  on  volatility  and  volume,  but  volatility  and  volume 
have costs. Producers of gas demand to be paid a higher premium to bring their 
gas to market sooner rather than later. Traders demand to be rewarded for the 
risks they incur, risks that are increased by the trading process itself. 
The  influx  of  traders  fuels  volatility  and  raises  concerns  about  abusive  or  ma-
nipulative trading practices. 
Econometric  analyses  of  the  natural  gas  markets  in  recent  years  raise  impor-
tant  questions  as  to  how  well  the  natural  gas  markets  work.  Given  the  uncer-
tainty  about  the  functioning  of  these  markets,  the  claim  that  the  market  price 
is always right because it’s the market price should be questioned: 
The  economic  analysis  does  not  support  the  claim  that  these  markets  operate 
efficiently to establish prices. 
Risk premiums, which raise the price substantially (10 to 20 percent), are high 
and rising. 
Prices are well above the underlying costs of production. 
The operation of financial markets is no accident. Trading reflects the rules that 
are established—by law and through self-organization. The most troubling part 
about  natural  gas  trading  is  that  policymakers  really  have  no  clue  about  what 
goes on: 
The majority of transactions take place in markets that are largely unregulated. 
These over-the-counter markets, reported in unaudited, unregulated indices, are 
a major factor in setting the price of natural gas. And these unaudited, unregu-
lated  markets  have  behaved  very  poorly  in  recent  years,  with  numerous  in-
stances of misreporting of prices. 
Even where there is light-handed regulation, the rules are inadequate to protect 
the public: 
Players in the natural gas markets can hold very large positions without having 
to  disclose  the  size  of  their  positions  to  any  regulatory  authority,  and  a  small 
number  of  large  players  can  influence  the  price  that  consumers  pay  in  a  very 
short  period  of  time  and  under  circumstances  that  place  the  consumer  at  risk. 
Index  prices  are  often  based  on  a  small  number  of  self-reported  transactions 
and there are no mechanisms for determining if such transactions represent an 
accurate  sampling  of  the  natural  gas  market.  When  even  the  hint  of  account-
ability  was  imposed  by  merely  being  asked  to  certify  the  veracity  of  reported 
transactions, traders stopped reporting.6 
There  has  been  a  failure  of  public  policy  at  every  level  to  build  a  system  that 
protects the public. The structure of the physical markets induces conduct that 
has  created  and  is  sustaining  a  tight  market.  The  structure  of  the  financial 
commodities  markets  induces  conduct  that  magnifies  upward  pressures  on 
prices . . . 
The  financial  markets  are  not  only  largely  unregulated,  they  are  structured  in 
such  a  way  that  there  are  a  large  number  of  small  buyers  who  have  weakened 
incentives and limited ability to resist price increases facing a small number of 
large sellers who have a strong incentive and a much greater ability to hold out 
for higher prices. Holding out on the supply side may simply mean buying and 
holding assets in the ground or positions in the futures market and waiting for 
buyers who need the commodity to blink. 
Most  troubling  is  the  fact  that  many  of  the  impacts  of  many  of  the  legislative 
and  regulatory  policies  that  have  worked  to  the  detriment  of  consumers  were 
predictable  and  preventable,  given  the  nature  of  the  commodity  and  the  type 
of  market  that  Congress  and  the  regulatory  agencies  in  Washington  created.7 

5 Cooper, Mark Cooper, The Role of Supply, Demand and Financial Commodity Markets in the 

6 Cooper, Mark Cooper, The Role of Supply, Demand and Financial Commodity Markets in the 

Natural Gas Price Spiral, p. 88. 

Natural Gas Price Spiral, p. 9. 

7 Cooper, Mark Cooper, The Role of Supply, Demand and Financial Commodity Markets in the 

Natural Gas Price Spiral, p. 89. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

49 

When the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission got wind of the report, without 
ever talking to us about it, they ridiculed it at an open meeting of the Commission. 
The Chairman of the FERC, reflecting the party line of the Administration, insisted 
that  all  the  price  gyrations  were  the  result  of  market  fundamentals.  He  was  abso-
lutely certain that the FERC had its finger on the pulse of the commodity markets. 
He was absolutely wrong.8 At the very moment he was rejecting our analysis, unbe-
knownst to him, the Amaranth corner was taking place. Neither the FERC nor the 
CFTC had a clue about what was going on. 

Missing a massive manipulation is embarrassing, but the real damage came when 
the blind ignorance of the FERC led it to waste the chance to use its newly minted 
powers under the Energy Policy Act of 2005 to follow our recommendations to adopt 
a  broad  view  of  abusive  behaviors  that  afflict  energy  commodity  markets.9 As  I 
wrote in the natural gas report: 

The  FERC  has  also  issued  rules  implementing  the  Energy  Policy  Act  of  2005 
that  change  its  market  monitoring  procedures  and  implement  new  powers 
granted in the Act. It has entered into a vague memorandum of understanding 
about sharing information. The foregoing analysis demonstrates that a lot more 
than  manipulation  is  at  issue  in  the  natural  gas  price  spiral  and  suggests  that 
much  more  needs  to  be  done.  Both  the  FERC  and  the  CFTC  are  looking  for  a 
very narrow range of manipulative behaviors with a very narrow telescope. Un-
like  other  physical  commodities,  a  vast  amount  of  trading  of  natural  gas  goes 
on  in  the  over-the-counter  markets  that  are  hidden  from  the  view  and  beyond 
the authority of these agencies. The indices that are based on this unregulated 
market activity have been unreliable and remain subject to doubt. 
In the case of regulated activities the changes at the FERC replicate the weak-
nesses  of  the  CFTC  approach  by  adopting  its  definitions  and  case  law.  It  may 
be illegal to contrive to manipulate markets and there are new fines if you are 
caught doing so, but the FERC is going to have great difficulty proving manipu-
lation,  when  prices  are  ‘‘moved.’’  It  is  precisely  for  this  reason  that  the  CFTC 
and the exchanges subject to its jurisdiction do more than rely on narrowly de-
fined manipulation statutes to prevent abuse.10 

The FERC and the CFTC have failed to adopt a broad view of abuses in financial 
markets.  They  cannot  see  the  abuse  because  they  are  not  looking  for  it.  My  earlier 
analysis  of  natural  gas  markets  identified  the  numerous  ways  that  prices  can  be 
moved by actions that are well below the radar of the FERC and the CFTC. 

There  are  strands  in  this  literature  that  identify  potential  and  actual  abusive 
practices. . . 
manipulation facilitated by large positions, 
lack of transparency, 
structural advantages enjoyed by large traders or the exercise of market power, 
insider trading and self-dealing, 
trading  practices  that  accelerate  market  trends,  perhaps  causing  them  to  over-
shoot.11 

Instead  of  taking  a  hard  look  at  the  broad  pattern  of  abuse,  the  FERC  adopted 
a very narrow view of manipulation, taking on the existing CFTC case law and defi-
nitions.  Instead  of  providing  new  and  vigorous  oversight  over  the  natural  gas  mar-
ket, we have a second cop walking the same beat with it eyes half shut. 

Unfortunately, the Federal Trade Commission has started down the same useless 
path.  The  lengthy  discussion  of  intension  (scienter)  in  the  advanced  notice  of  pro-
posed  rulemaking  points  the  FTC  down  the  same  dead  end  path  that  the  FERC 
took.  The  FTC  needs  to  break  out  of  the  narrow  ‘‘scienter’’  manipulation  view  to 

8 A  point-by-point  response  to  the  FERC’s  misguided  comments  on  the  report  was  provided 
to but never acknowledged by the Commission (Letter Appendix to Cooper, The Role of Supply, 
Demand and Financial). 

9 Federal  Energy  Regulatory  Commission,  Order  No.  670,  Prohibition  of  Energy  Market  Ma-
nipulation,  Docket  No.  RM06–3–000,  January  19,  2006;  Memorandum  of  Understanding  Be-
tween  The  Federal  Energy  Regulatory  Commission  and  the  Commodity  Futures  Trading  in 
Commission  Regarding  Information  Sharing  and  Treatment  of  Proprietary  Trading  and  Other 
Information, October 12, 2005. 

10 Cooper,  Mark  Cooper,  The  Role  of  Supply,  Demand  and  Financial  Commodity  Markets  in 

the Natural Gas Price Spiral, p. 93. 

the Natural Gas Price Spiral, p. 68. 

11 Cooper,  Mark  Cooper,  The  Role  of  Supply,  Demand  and  Financial  Commodity  Markets  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

50 

identify  and  attack  the  broad  range  of  practices  and  structural  conditions  that  can 
and have been moving prices in the markets.12 

The problems that have afflicted natural gas have afflicted other energy commod-

ities. 

Natural  gas  markets  share  this  pattern  of  abuse  with  other  energy  markets. 
Unilateral actions by any of a number of individuals in any of a number of cir-
cumstances  provide  a  landscape  in  which  upward  price  movements  are  prob-
able. ‘‘There are regular squeezes in the Brent [oil] market . . . The whole trick 
is to collect more money in CFDs [contract for differences] than you lose on the 
physical  squeeze  . . .  People  seem  to  do  it  in  turn.  It  depends  on  who’s  smart 
enough to move in a way nobody notices until it happens.’’ 
In  a  case  brought  by  a  private  party  in  late  2001,  the  practical  reality  was  re-
vealed. 
Tosco  won  a  settlement  claiming  that  Arcadia  Petroleum  (a  British  subsidiary 
of  the  Japanese  firm  Mitsui)  engineered  an  elaborate  scheme  to  manipulate  oil 
prices  in  September  2001  through  the  use  of  OTC  derivatives  and  a  large  cash 
market  position  to  corner  the  market  in  Brent  crude  oil.  As  a  result,  the  price 
of Brent crude soared between August 21 and September 5, and pushed its price 
to a premium over West Texas Intermediate crude oil (WTI) . . . 
Dated  Brent,  which  acts  as  a  price  marker  for  many  international  grades,  is 
physical  crude  traded  on  an  informal  market,  rather  than  a  regulated  futures 
exchange.  This  lack  of  regulation  poses  problems  for  oil  producers  and  con-
sumers  seeking  a  fair  price  . . .  A  typical  Brent  squeeze  involves  a  company 
quietly  building  a  strong  position  in  short-term  swaps  called  contracts  for  dif-
ference,  or  CFD’s,  for  a  differential  not  reflected  in  current  prices.  The  company 
then  buys  enough  cargoes  in  the  dated  Brent  market  to  drive  the  physical  price 
higher, which boosts the CFD differential . . . 
The  Company  may  lose  money  on  the  physical  side,  but  it’s  more  than  com-
pensated  for  by  profits  on  its  offsetting  paper  position  in  the  short-term  swaps 
market.’’13 

The  problem  in  oil  markets  has  continued  to  mount,  as  I  explained  in  a  law  re-

view article last year. 

On April 29, 2006, the New York Times ran a front-page article under the head-
line  ‘‘Trading  Frenzy  Adds  to  Jump  in  Price  of  Oil.’’ 14 The  Times  article  opens 
with  a  brief  paragraph  on  the  conditions  in  the  physical  market  but  then  de-
votes about 36 column inches to the proposition that financial markets are add-
ing to the price increase. 
‘‘A global economic boom, sharply higher demand, extraordinarily tight supplies 
and  domestic  instability  in  many  of  the  world’s  top  oil-producing  countries—in 
that environment higher oil prices were inevitable. 
But crude oil is not merely a physical commodity . . . It has also become a valu-
able  financial  asset,  bought  and  sold  in  electronic  exchanges  by  traders  around 
the world. And they, too, have helped push prices higher . . . 
‘‘Gold  prices  do  not  go  up  because  jewelers  need  more  gold,  they  go  up  because 
gold is an investment,’’ said Roger Diwan, a partner with PFC Energy, a Wash-
ington-based consultant. ‘‘The same has happened to oil . . .’’ 
‘‘It  is  the  case,’’  complained  BP’s  chief  executive,  Lord  Browne,  ‘‘that  the  price 
of oil has gone up while nothing has changed physically.’’ 15 
Three  key  factors  serve  to  drive  the  price  spiral  higher:  volume,  volatility  and 
risk . . . 
The  structure  and  availability  of  markets  plays  a  role  in  allowing  the  volumes 
to increase. 
Changes  in  the  way  oil  is  traded  have  contributed  their  part  as  well.  On 
Nymex,  oil  contracts  held  mostly  by  hedge  funds—essentially  private  invest-
ment  vehicles  for  the  wealthy  and  institutions,  run  by  traders  who  share  risk 

12 Federal  Trade  Commission,  Prohibition  on  Market  Manipulation  and  False  Information  in 

Subtitle B of the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007, 16 CFR 317. 

13 Cooper,  Mark  Cooper,  The  Role  of  Supply,  Demand  and  Financial  Commodity  Markets  in 

14 Jad  Mouawad  &  Heather  Timmons,  Trading  Frenzy  Adds  to  Jump  in  Price  of  Oil,  N.Y. 

the Natural Gas Price Spiral, p. 64. 

Times, Apr. 29, 2006, at A–1. 

15 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

51 

and  reward  with  their  partners—rose  above  one  billion  barrels  this  month, 
twice the amount held 5 years ago. 
Beyond  that,  trading  has  also  increased  outside  official  exchanges,  including 
swaps  or  over-the-counter  trades  conducted  directly  between,  say,  a  bank  and 
an airline . . . 
Such  trading  is  a  24-hour  business.  And  more  sophisticated  electronic  tech-
nology  allows  more  money  to  pour  into  oil,  quicker  than  ever  before,  from  any-
where in the world. 
The  influx  of  new  money  is  sustained  by  movements  of  different  institutions 
and  individuals  into  the  market.  ‘‘Everybody  is  jumping  into  commodities  and 
there is a log of cash chasing oil,’’ said Philip K. Verleger Jr., a consultant and 
former senior advisor on energy policy at the Treasury Department.’’ 
This  fundamental  observation  had  been  offered  a  couple  of  years  earlier  in  a 
front page Wall Street Journal article entitled, ‘‘Oil Brings Surge in Speculators 
Betting  on  Prices:  Large  Investors  Playing  Ongoing  Rise  is  Increasing  Demand 
and Price Itself:’’ 
Oil  has  become  a  speculator’s  paradise.  Surging  energy  prices  have  attracted  a 
horde of investors—and their feverish betting on rising prices has itself contrib-
uted to the climb. 
These investors have driven up volume on commodities’ exchanges and prompt-
ed  a  large  push  among  Wall  Street  banks  and  brokerage  firms. . .to  beef  up 
energy-trading capabilities. As the action has picked up in the past year, those 
profiting include large, well-known hedge funds, an emerging group of high-roll-
ers,  as  well  as  descendants  of  once-highflying  energy-trading  shops  such  as 
Enron Corp.16 

A  recent  paper  from  the  Japanese  Ministry  of  Economy  Trade  and  Industry 
(METI) has echoed the conclusion of the Senate Permanent Subcommittee on Inves-
tigations. 

According to the METI paper, during the second half of 2007, when the physical 
price of Wet Texas Intermediate crude averaged $US90 a barrel, market specu-
lation, geopolitical risk and currency factors were responsible for $US30–$US40 
of the price. 
The  average  WTI  ‘‘fundamental  price,’’  consistent  with  the  underlying  supply/ 
demand situation, was around $US60/barrel during the December half-year, ac-
cording  to  the  paper,  citing  research  for  the  Institute  of  Energy  Economics  in 
Japan. 
Last week the benchmark WTI futures contract touched $US135/bbl, more than 
double the level of a year previously. 
‘‘We cannot say exactly what the fundamental price is at the moment,’’ a METI 
official  said  yesterday.  ‘‘But  we  believe  the  increases  this  year  in  the  market 
price have much to do with the influx of speculative money.17 

The  study  from  the  Institute  on  Energy  Economics  mentioned  above  draws  a  di-

rect link between the growth in speculation and the rising price. 

In  the  futures  market,  oil-futures  trading  at  New  York  Mercantile  Exchange 
(NYMEX)  are  expanding  faster  than  actual  spots.  While  the  futures  markets 
are  designed  to  hedge  price  fluctuations  risks,  oil  is  becoming  a  commodity, 
making the futures market something like an alternative investment target. As 
a  result,  long  position  by  speculators  (‘‘non-commercial’’  and  ‘‘non-reportable’’) 
conspicuously leads to a rise in the oil prices in more cases.18 

The  plague  of  the  ‘‘influx  of  speculative  money’’  has  now  spread  to  food  commod-
ities.  For  instance,  the  evidence  is  mounting  that  speculation  is  contributing  to  the 
run up in food commodity prices that we have experienced over the past year. Spec-
ulation can be seen as contributing to price increases and volatility, as a study from 
the University of Wisconsin recently noted. 

One  unique  aspect  of  the  market  the  last  year  has  been  the  size  of  the  non- 
commercial  position  in  the  futures  market  for  corn.  Speculative  traders  have 
significantly increased their net long position over the last year, while non-com-
mercial  traders  have  tended  to  be  net  short.  Note  that  corn  prices  have  been 

16 Id. 
17 Peter Alford, ‘‘Japan Blames Speculators for Oil Hike,’’ May 28, 2008. 
18 Akira  Yanagisawa,  Decomposition  Analysis  of  the  Soaring  Crude  Oil  Prices:  Analyzing  the 

Effects of Fundamentals and Premium (Institute of Energy Economics, March 2008), p. 5. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

52 

highly  correlated  with  the  net  positions  of  non-commercial  traders  since  the 
first quarter of 2006/2007, and the speculators have had large net long positions 
most of the year. It is important to note that this does not imply causality, only 
correlation. However, there does appear to be reason to study more carefully the 
impact of speculative activity on both price levels and volatility.19 

Policy  must  Recognize  the  Unique  Nature  of  Vital  Commodities  and  the 

Dysfunctional Nature of Current Financial Markets 

It  would  be  reassuring  if  we  could  blame  the  current  speculative  bubble  on  the 
arrogance,  ignorance  and  ineptitude  of  the  regulatory  agencies  with  oversight  re-
sponsibilities. If that were the case, we could just fire the commissioners and secre-
taries  and  clean  up  the  problem.  Unfortunately,  there  is  a  more  fundamental  prob-
lem that must be addressed. Federal authorities must look broadly at the conditions 
in  modern  financial  markets  that  feed  volatility,  amp  up  volume,  and  increase  risk 
and policymakers must impose new structural oversight on these markets to return 
them  to  their  proper  role,  as  institutions  that  help  smooth  the  functioning  of  phys-
ical markets. They have become centers of idle speculation that do vastly more harm 
than good. 

Congress  must  recognize  that  certain  commodities  are  fundamentally  different. 
Energy is at the top of the list of commodities that have special vulnerabilities, but 
energy  commodities  are  not  alone.  The  transformation  of  commodity  markets  into 
speculative  engines  is  hurting  food  commodities  as  well.  The  description  I  wrote  of 
natural  gas  applies  to  greater  or  lesser  degree  to  the  entire  energy  complex  and 
many food commodities. 

Because  natural  gas  is  a  physical  commodity  that  is  actually  consumed  (unlike 
a pure financial instrument), difficult to store, and expensive to transport, nat-
ural gas markets are challenging . . . The key elements identified are the sup-
ply-side  difficulties  of  production,  transportation  and  storage,  and  the  demand- 
side  challenges  of  providing  for  a  continuous  flow  of  energy  to  meet  inflexible 
demand, which is subject to seasonal consumption patterns. 
‘‘[T]he  deliverables  in  money  markets  consist  of  a  ‘‘piece  of  paper’’  or  its  elec-
tronic  equivalent,  which  are  easily  stored  and  transferred  and  are  insensitive 
to weather conditions. Energy markets paint a more complicated picture. Ener-
gies  respond  to  the  dynamic  interplay  between  producing  and  using;  transfer-
ring  and  storing;  buying  and  selling—and  ultimately  ‘‘burning’’  actual  physical 
products.  Issues  of  storage,  transport,  weather  and  technological  advances  play 
a major role here. In energy markets, the supply side concerns not only the stor-
age  and  transfer  of  the  actual  commodity,  but  also  how  to  get  the  actual  com-
modity  out  of  the  ground.  The  end  user  truly  consumes  the  asset.  Residential 
users need energy for heating in the winter and cooling in the summer, and in-
dustrial  users’  own  products  continually  depend  on  energy  to  keep  the  plants 
running  and  to  avoid  the  high  cost  of  stopping  and  restarting  them.  Each  of 
these  energy  participants—be  they  producers  or  end  users—deals  with  a  dif-
ferent  set  of  fundamental  drivers,  which  in  turn  affect  the  behavior  of  energy 
markets . . . 
What makes energies so different is the excessive number of fundamental price 
drivers, which cause extremely complex price behavior.’’ 
Complexity  of  physical  characteristics  translates  into  a  highly  vulnerable  prod-
uct in this commodity market. 
‘‘Although  the  formal  analysis  examines  transportation  costs  as  the  source  of 
friction, the consumption distortion results suggest that any friction that makes 
it  costly  to  return  a  commodity  to  its  original  owners  (such  as  storage  costs  or 
search costs) may facilitate manipulation. 
The extent of market power depends on supply and demand conditions, seasonal 
factors,  and  transport  costs.  These  transport  cost  related  frictions  are  likely  to 
be  important  in  many  markets,  including  grains,  non-precious  metals,  and  pe-
troleum products. 
Transportation  costs  are  an  example  of  an  economic  friction  that  isolates  geo-
graphically  dispersed  consumers.  The  results  therefore  suggest  that  any  form 

19 T.  Randall  Fortenbery  and  Hwanil  Park,  The  Effect  of  Ethanol  Production  on  the  U.S.  Na-
tional  Corn  Price,  University  of  Wisconsin-Madison,  Department  of  Agricultural  Economics, 
Staff Paper 523, April 2008, p. 16. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

53 

of transactions cost that impedes the transfer of a commodity among consumers 
can make manipulation possible.20 

These  characteristics  demand  much  more  vigorous  oversight  of  energy  and  food 
commodity  markets  than  other  commodities,  especially  financial  instruments  and 
precious  metals  that  have  few  physical  uses.  Unfortunately,  for  about  a  decade  we 
have  had  much  less  oversight  of  energy  markets.  More  broadly,  the  transformation 
of  commodity  markets  generally  has  created  problems  for  physical  markets.  When 
commodity  markets  lose  touch  with  the  underlying  physical  market  fundamentals, 
they do more harm than good. 

Physical  traders  get  frozen  out.  I  found  this  in  my  study  of  the  natural  gas  mar-
ket.  The  utilities  that  actually  sell  the  gas  to  the  consumer  could  not  play  in  the 
hyper-inflated commodity markets. They simply tied their purchases to the indexes, 
hoped for the best and let the consumer suffer the consequences. 

There  is  a  general  consensus  that  utilities  are  not  in  the  markets  as  hedgers, 
although  a  small  number  are.  Moreover,  there  is  a  belief  that  hedging  has  de-
clined, as volatility and large financial players have moved into the market. 
‘‘Most  utilities  have  stopped  hedging  and  instead  rely  on  the  fuel-adjustment 
clause that allows them to pass on to consumers . . . Many utilities exited trad-
ing, Duke being the last one. The point is they are not really in the game except 
for Constellation, Sempra, Dominion and a few others. That more customers are 
exposed  to  price  risk  because  they  are  passing  on  the  higher  costs  to  cus-
tomers.’’ 
Cooper said many utilities probably have stopped hedging in such a risky envi-
ronment because they have to eat their losses if they miscalculate. ‘‘Utilities are 
not  in  the  business  of  predicting  prices,’’  he  said.  ‘‘They  don’t  care  what  the 
price it. They pass it on to customers.’’ 
While  the  institutional  context  in  which  utilities  function  certainly  restricts 
their inclination to play in the financial market, as volatility and prices mount, 
it  becomes  more  burdensome  for  all  users.  The  cost  of  hedging  becomes  higher 
and higher. 
But  with  gas  above  $10/mmBtu  and  futures  market  direction  unpredictable, 
even hedging and other risk management tools are becoming more and more ex-
pensive—raising the question of whether the benefit is worth the cost . . . 
For  example,  Invista  uses  financial  derivatives,  collars  and  similar  tools  to 
hedge  against  current  market  conditions.  But  gas  at  $10/mmBtu  or  higher  and 
unprecedented  volatility  ‘‘makes  all  of  these  actions  a  little  more  costly,’’  Poole 
noted.  ‘‘It  raises  the  question:  is  the  elimination  of  price  volatility  worth  the 
cost?’’ 
And while Invista has the money and in-house expertise to handle risk manage-
ment activities internally rather than farming them out to marketers or energy 
service  companies,  ‘‘unfortunately,  for  smaller-volume  companies  that  may  not 
be a feasible option.’’ 
Tying  prices  to  indices  is  the  ultimate  short-term  strategy.  This  institutional 
view raises concerns because the capital-intensive infrastructure of the industry 
has  historically  been  financed  by  long-term  contracts.  The  deregulation  and 
unbundling of the industry inevitably shortened the time horizon of the partici-
pant.  Flexibility  and  choice  loosens  commitments  and  makes  ‘‘bypass’’  possible. 
Pipelines  cannot  count  on  shippers  as  much  as  in  the  past.  Utilities  cannot 
count  on  load  as  much  as  in  the  past.  Merchants  demand  faster  recovery  of 
costs. 
In  fact,  a  major  impetus  for  restructuring  of  the  natural  gas  industry  was  the 
high  social  cost  associated  with  rigid  long-term  contractual  arrangements  . . . 
With  the  natural-gas  sector  restructuring  . . .  trading  arrangements  have  be-
come  much  more  short  term  and  flexible  in  both  price  and  in  terms  and  condi-
tions.  We  have  observed  this  phenomenon  throughout  the  natural-gas  sector, 
from  gas  procurement,  gas  storage,  and  retail  transactions,  to  capacity  con-
tracting for pipeline services. 
Long-term  commitments  to  transportation  and  storage  facilities,  exposes  the 
contracting  parties  to  greater  risk  in  this  environment,  especially  where  long- 
term commitments to supply cannot be secured. The mismatch between the in-

20 Cooper,  Mark  Cooper,  The  Role  of  Supply,  Demand  and  Financial  Commodity  Markets  in 

the Natural Gas Price Spiral, pp. 28–29 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

54 

centive  structure  and  the  necessary  time  horizon  results  in  missed  opportuni-
ties. For example, 
Jack  Flautt,  Managing  Director  of  March  &  McLean,  suggested  there  is  an 
anomaly  in  the  storage  investment  area.  It  is  strange,  in  his  view,  that  inves-
tors  are  not  trampling  one  another  to  participate  in  the  storage  development 
market. ‘‘The value of storage today is greater than at any time in my lifetime,’’ 
but  Flautt  reported  he  gets  only  blank  stares  from  bankers  at  the  suggestion. 
The  hesitance  of  public  utility  commissions  to  push  utilities  to  jump  back  in  to 
long-term  commitments  is  understandable  and  the  task  of  realigning  risks  is 
challenging.21 

The  disutility  of  hyper-inflated  commodity  markets  was  recently  underscored  by 

a study of food commodities conducted by Texas A&M University. 

The  increased  activity  in  futures  markets  has  had  the  unexpected  consequence 
of  reducing  producer’s  ability  to  manage  price  risk  using  futures  markets.  The 
large  influx  of  money  into  the  markets,  typically  long  positions,  has  pushed 
commodities  to  extremely  high  levels.  But,  these  funds  also  quickly  move  large 
amounts of money in and out of positions. This has generated much more price 
volatility in the futures markets. In response, the exchanges have increased the 
daily  move  limits  for  most  of  the  agricultural  commodities  over  the  past  6 
months. . . . 
The  up  and  down  volatility  in  the  market  and  expanded  trading  price  limits 
mean  that  more  margin  calls  occur.  Small  elevators  and  even  large  grain  com-
panies and cotton merchants, who are trading even larger volumes, not to men-
tion farmers doing their own price risk management, have been unable to make 
the margin calls. 
Producers,  elevators,  and  companies  use  bank  financing  to  finance  their  busi-
nesses and the price risk management. As the margin calls have increased, they 
have exhausted their ability to finance their normal hedging activities and have 
therefore been forced out of the market.22 

Simply  put,  commercial  entities  that  need  the  physical  commodities  to  run  their 
enterprises  are  priced  out  of  the  market.  If  you  do  not  have  deep  pockets,  are  tied 
to  the  physical  schedule  of  production  and  consumption,  and  live  in  the  real  world 
of  bank  finance,  hyper-inflated  commodity  markets  are  a  big  part  of  the  problem, 
not the solution. 
Policy Responses 

The exchanges have come to serve the interests of the idle rich speculators by con-
stantly  adjusting  rules  to  make  it  comfortable  for  the  non-commercial  entities  to 
play their games and abandoned their role of providing liquidity to promote produc-
tive  commercial  enterprise.  We  need  to  deflate  this  speculative  bubble  and  return 
these commodity markets to their proper role. 
Oversight 

Congress  has  closed  a  loophole  in  the  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission 
Modernization  Act  that  allowed  energy  commodities  traded  off  exchanges  to  go  un-
regulated. This foolish provision allowed the Enron debacle to spread broadly to en-
ergy markets and fostered dozens of other cases and uncounted thousands of abuses. 
Affectionately known as the Enron-loophole, Congress recently voted to close it, but 
that is not enough. Congress needs to make sure that this provision is implemented 
with  extreme  vigor.  Large  traders  who  trade  in  commodities  in  the  U.S.  ought  to 
be  required  to  register  and  report  their  entire  positions  in  those  commodities  here 
in the U.S. and abroad. Registration and reporting should trigger scrutiny to ensure 
the good character, integrity and competence of traders. 

If  traders  are  not  subject  to  comprehensive  reporting  requirements,  there  will  al-
ways be room for mischief that is out of sight to the regulator. If they are unwilling 
to  report  all  their  positions,  they  should  not  be  allowed  to  trade  in  U.S.  markets. 
If  they  violate  this  provision,  they  should  go  to  jail.  Fines  are  not  enough  to  dis-
suade  abuse  in  these  commodity  markets  because  there  is  just  too  much  money  to 
be made. We need mandatory jail sentences. 

Regulatory  authorities  must  also  require  full  auditing  of  private  indexes.  The 
FERC  failed  to  impose  this  condition  on  the  critical  natural  gas  indexes  and  has 

21 Cooper,  Mark  Cooper,  The  Role  of  Supply,  Demand  and  Financial  Commodity  Markets  in 

the Natural Gas Price Spiral, pp. 28–29 

22 David  P  Anderson,  et  al.  The  Effects  of  Ethanol  on  Texas  Food  and  Feed,  Agricultural  and 

Food Policy Center, Texas A&M University, April 10, 2008, p. 32. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

55 

been  tied  up  in  court  over  even  modest  transparency  requirements.  Federal  and 
state regulators should refuse to allow indices that are not fully audited and trans-
parent to be used in any ratemaking transactions. Unaudited indices should simply 
not be allowed to influence consumer costs in regulatory proceedings. 
Incentives 

We  need  to  restore  the  balance  between  speculation  and  productive  investment. 
Public  policy  has  made  speculation  much  more  attractive  that  investment  in  genu-
inely  productive  enterprise.  Not  only  was  energy  commodity  trading  less  regulated, 
it was also less demanding. Margin requirements on organized exchanges are a frac-
tion  of  the  margin  requirements  on  stocks.  If  it  is  cheaper  to  put  your  money  into 
speculation,  why  bother  with  real  investment.  The  margin  requirement  for  com-
modity  trading  among  non-commercial  traders  should  be  fifty  percent  higher  than 
the  margin  requirement  for  investment  in  stocks.  However,  we  should  impose  less 
onerous  terms  on  physical  players  and  even  scale  the  terms  to  the  size  of  the  posi-
tion,  so  that  smaller  physical  players  can  regain  access  to  these  futures  markets. 
We  must  also  set  lower  position  limits  and  increase  settlement  windows  so  that 

individual players cannot influence price. 

We  must  level  the  playing  field  between  long-term  productive  investment  and 
short-term speculative gains. We need a tax on short-term capital gains between 33 
and  50  percent,  (which  reflects  the  difference  in  the  net  present  value  of  income 
from  on  a  one-year  investment  repeatedly  flipped  and  the  net  present  value  of  a 
stream  of  income  an  investment  held  for  10  years—discounted  at  the  OMB  sug-
gested  discount  rates  of  7  and  10  percent  respectively),  to  make  holding  productive 
investments for long periods as attractive as flipping short-term financial paper. 
Physical Markets 

While  this  hearing  focuses  on  the  financial  markets,  I  would  be  remiss  if  I  did 
not  also  mention  the  physical  market.  Again,  my  analysis  of  natural  gas  markets 
provides  a  broad  framework  for  oversight  policies  to  begin  addressing  the  institu-
tional flaws that have given rise to physical market problems. 

In  the  physical  market,  policymakers  have  allowed  the  supply  side  to  become 
concentrated  and  vulnerable  to  the  exercise  of  market  power.  Meanwhile,  pro-
ducers  have  been  slow  to  invest  in  exploration  and  development,  compounding 
the problem of tight supplies. 
The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission exacerbated the problem by failing 
to ensure a transparent price reporting mechanism. It deregulated markets and 
granted  market-based  rate  authority  without  requiring  full  and  honest  disclo-
sure  of  information  or  effective  competition  on  the  ground.  In  retrospect,  it  ap-
pears  that  there  have  been  repeated  market  ‘‘aberrations,’’  but  fraud  and  mar-
ket manipulation are not the only concerns. The ability of strategic behavior to 
influence price because of structural weaknesses in market rules is a more gen-
eral concern. 
The position of the major oil companies with large holdings of natural gas phys-
ical assets, dominance of natural gas marketing, and active involvement in nat-
ural gas financial markets poses a serious threat to consumers. The inadequate 
investment  in  exploration  over  the  course  of  a  decade  or  more  contributed  to 
the  tight  supply  conditions.  The  massive  windfall  of  cash-flow  in  recent  years 
dulls  the  incentive  for  the  majors  to  supply  gas  to  the  market.  They  can  keep 
it  in  the  ground  and  hold  out  for  higher  prices.  They  are  under  no  pressure  to 
sign  long-term  contracts,  except  at  extremely  high  prices.  As  major  marketers 
and traders, they can move markets. 
The  fact  that  the  majors  straddle  these  markets,  several  of  which  are  lightly 
or  unregulated,  compounds  the  problem,  since  their  ability  to  profit  by  taking 
contrary  positions  in  various  markets  is  hidden  from  regulators.  Policymakers 
must have the information necessary to make informed judgments about wheth-
er  the  major  oil  companies  are  exercising  market  power,  strategically  in  the 
long-term  and  unfairly  exploiting  the  tight  markets  they  have  helped  to  create 
in the short term. 
A  joint  task  force  of  Federal  and  state  anti-trust  and  regulatory  authorities 
should be formed . . . 

Conclusion 

Vigorously enforced registering and reporting requirements will chase the bad ac-
tors  out  of  the  commodity  markets  and  the  margin  and  tax  policies  will  direct  cap-
ital  out  of  speculation  and  into  productive  long-term  uses.  Creating  a  class  of  idle 
rich speculators, who are immune to the business cycle, was a huge mistake. Allow-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

56 

ing this huge log of money to pump up the volume, volatility and risk has cost con-
sumers dearly. 

Let us assume a modest estimate of $30 per barrel that is cited by industry ana-
lysts as the amount that the speculative bubble has added to the price of oil in the 
past  2  years  and  use  my  modest  estimate  of  $2.50  per  thousand  cubic  feet  for  nat-
ural gas. Since the Senate Committee on Oversight and Investigations issued its re-
port,  the  speculative  bubble  in  energy  commodities  has  cost  America  well  over  half 
a trillion dollars. It is time to do something about it. 

The  investigations  of  manipulation  by  the  FERC  and  the  CFTC,  stepped  up 
grudgingly  in  response  to  mounting  political  pressure,  are  woefully  inadequate  and 
looking  for  the  wrong  thing.  This  is  not  a  question  of  manipulation,  but  a  funda-
mental  breakdown  of  the  functioning  of  these  markets.  The  FTC  seems  inclined  to 
make  the  same  mistake  in  its  Advanced  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking.  We  need 
much more vigorous action to reign in the speculative bubble and return the futures 
markets to their proper role to improve the functioning of physical commodity mar-
kets. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you very much. 
And I, again, want to thank all the witnesses for testifying today 
and for your testimony, that can be submitted in full to the record. 
You  know,  I  heard  from  many  of  you  commenting  about  com-
modity  indexes  and  the  process  by  which  the  futures  market  oper-
ates,  and  I  just  want  to  make  sure  that  I’m  clear.  If  I  could  just 
ask each of you if you believe that the current price for oil is based 
only  on  supply-and-demand  fundamentals  or  if  it’s  based  on  other 
things,  as  well.  If  you  could  just  give  me  a  yes  or  no.  Because  I 
think  I  understand  where  each  of  you  are,  but  I  want  to  try  to  be 
a  little  more  succinct  about  whether  this  is—the  current  price  is 
based  on  supply-and-demand  only,  or  are  we  seeing  other  factors? 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Well,  I’ll  take  the  first  crack  at  that.  I  think 
the price is completely unmoored from supply demand. I don’t want 
to discount supply demand; there is a supply demand problem. But, 
I  think  the  vice  president  of  ExxonMobil,  who  said  that  his  judg-
ment was that the price should be at $50 or $55, another oil execu-
tive  said  somewhere  between  $35  and  $65—the  price  of  oil  at  the 
beginning  of  this  millennium  was  $18  a  barrel.  Yes,  it  should  be 
higher than it is, and we need to do all the efforts, more substitute 
energy,  et  cetera.  But,  we’re  paying,  some  believe,  as  high  as  50 
percent  premium  to  the  pockets  of  speculators  who  are  operating 
in markets that are completely unpoliced. It’s the equivalent of tell-
ing  a  community,  ‘‘The  crime  rate  has  been  low.  We’re  pulling  the 
police back. They’re too expensive. Be sure you lock your doors.’’ 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I  should  have  said,  at  the  beginning,  that  I 
am going to do 5-minute rounds here, so—to try to keep us—a flow 
of  members  asking  questions—so,  if  you  could  be  succinct—so,  I 
was just looking for, kind of, a yes or no on whether people thought 
it was—— 

Mr. GREENBERGER. Sorry. 
Senator CANTWELL.—the current price was only based on supply 

and demand, or other things were impacting it. 

Mr. Soros? 
Mr. SOROS. There is definitely a speculative bubble that is super-
imposed on fundamental trends in supply and demand. That is not 
specific  to  the  present  moment,  because  this  is  in  the  nature  of 
markets.  Markets  don’t  just  passively  reflect  fundamentals.  What 
speculation,  or  prevailing  biases  or  misconceptions  prevail  in  the 
market  also  affect  the  so-called  fundamentals  that  markets  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

57 

supposed  to  reflect.  And  occasionally  they  go  into  this  self-rein-
forcing  bubble  mode,  and  I  think  this  is  what  we  are  witnessing 
today  in  the  oil  market.  But,  we  have  seen  it  in  housing—we  see 
it all the time. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Ramm,  do  you  have  a  quick  answer  to 

that? Dr. Cooper, do either of you have a quick answer to that? 

Mr. RAMM. The quick answer is no. 
Senator CANTWELL. It’s not just supply and demand. 
Mr. RAMM. It isn’t. 
Senator CANTWELL. Yes. 
Mr.  RAMM.  With  respect  to  the  fact  that  if  you  only  look  at  the 
physical supply and demand, it would not base—get based on those 
fundamentals. 

Senator CANTWELL. Dr. Cooper? 
Dr.  COOPER.  I’ll  be  quite  precise.  Forty  dollars  for  the  physical 
cost  of  producing  crude,  the  economic  cost;  $40  for  the  cartel  tax 
that  OPEC  and  the  oil  companies  put  on  us;  and  $40  for  specula-
tion. So that two-thirds of the current price is, simply put, baloney. 

Senator CANTWELL. OK. 
Ms. Watson, I know you’re probably going to tell me you can’t an-

swer, so I’m not even going to ask you about that. 

So,  Dr.—Mr.  Soros,  you,  in  your  testimony,  said  that  circum-
venting speculative position limits should be banned, provided that 
that ban can be applied to, you know, all markets. 

Mr. SOROS. Yes. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  You’re  basically  saying  that  the  speculation 
position, the lack thereof, is causing a great deal of what we’re see-
ing—or  could  cause  a  great  deal  of  what  we’re  seeing  in  this  bub-
ble. 

Mr.  SOROS.  Whenever  you  have  outside  speculators  coming  into 
a  market  on  a  very  large  scale,  and  particularly  coming  in  on  one 
side of that market, in present time on the buying side, they do dis-
tort  the  otherwise  prevailing  balance  between  supply  and  demand. 
So,  the  presence  of  financial  speculation  can—have  some  useful 
service in providing liquidity, but when it gets too big, it can unbal-
ance the market, and that is why there should be limits on specula-
tive positions, and those limits should bear some relationship to the 
size of the market that you are dealing with. 

The  oil  market  is  very  big,  but  some  of  the  agricultural  markets 

are very small, and speculation can really play havoc. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Greenberger,  do  we  have  speculation 

limits on all U.S. oil-traded product? 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Absolutely  not.  We  have  them  on  some,  but 
large  portions  not,  because  in  2000  this  Congress  said,  ‘‘You  can 
trade  outside  of  regulated  exchanges.’’  And,  because  of  that  Enron 
loophole, which I believe has not been closed for crude oil, there are 
no—no  speculation  limits  in  these  markets  that  are  unregulated. 
There’s a second charade that an exchange located in Atlanta trad-
ing  U.S.-delivered  products  is  really  in  the  United  Kingdom,  or 
Dubai, who’s partnered with New York Mercantile—— 

Senator CANTWELL. But that is a U.S. commodity? 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Absolutely.  They’re  trading  U.S.  West  Texas 
Intermediate;  30  percent  of  the  market  is  in  a—is  in  an  exchange 
that has no spec limits. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

58 

And,  by  the  way—Mr.  Soros  talks  about  index  speculation—we 
just  discovered,  in  the  last  2  weeks,  that  even  our  regulated  mar-
kets  are  treating  those  banks  and  hedge  funds  that  are  in  index 
positions  as  commercial  interests  not  subject  to  speculation.  My 
calculation is, right now, that at least 70 percent of the U.S. crude- 
oil market is driven by speculators and not people with commercial 
interests.  Most  of  those  speculators  do  not  have  spec  limits;  they 
can buy whatever they want. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Senator Dorgan? 
Senator DORGAN. Thank you very much. 
I just want to observe that the Commodity futures Trading Com-
mission  has  seen  an  8  percent  decrease  in  its  staff  over  time,  and 
an  8,000-percent  increase  in  commodity  trading.  Let  me  say  that 
again,  because  some  people  think,  in  this  Congress,  and  have  for 
some  while,  that  regulation  is  a  four-letter  word.  This  important 
regulatory  body  has  seen  an  8,000  percent  increase  in  commodity 
trading and, at the same time, a 12 percent decrease in their staff-
ing level. That speaks volumes, in my judgment. 

Now,  let  me  ask—Mr.  Greenberger,  tell  me  succinctly—you  told 
us  what’s  wrong,  and  suggested  that,  you  know,  the  officialdom 
here  is  a  dope,  in  terms  of  thinking  they  had  closed  the  loophole. 
What steps would you take to address these issues? 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  I  have  it  in  my  testimony.  I  would  go  back 
to  the  status  quo  ante  before  the  Enron  loophole  was  passed.  The 
status quo ante was, if you’re trading energy futures in the United 
States, they must be traded on a regulated exchange that has spec-
ulation limits, margin requirements, et cetera. 

The  Enron  loophole  told  energy  traders,  ‘‘Go—you  can  go  wher-
ever  you  want,  there’s  no  margin  requirements  and  no  regulated 
margin  requirements,  no  spec  limits,  no  large  traders  reporting.’’ 
You—I’ve  proposed  adding  two  words  to  the  Commodity  Exchange 
Act: the words ‘‘energy’’ in two different places, and everybody who 
trades  energy  would,  as  Mr.  Soros  said,  have  speculation  limits  if 
they’re speculators. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Yes.  I  think  you  alluded  to  it,  but  you  know 
and  I  know  that  was  not  a  deliberate  policy—the  creation  of  that 
loophole  was  not  a  deliberate  policy  debated  by  the  Congress,  it 
was, in my judgment, a shameful chapter of something being stuck 
in,  in  the  midnight  hours,  in  a  large  piece  of  legislation  that  was 
moving,  and  it  has  caused  massive  amounts  of  problems,  and  con-
tinues to cause significant problems. 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Absolutely.  And,  by  the  way,  I  should  just 

add, Alan Greenspan advised against it. 

Senator DORGAN. Yes. Even a stopped clock is right twice a day, 

they say. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator DORGAN. Mr. Greenspan—and let me just—— 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  also  make  the  point  that,  while  a  lot 
of  this  speculation—and  I  mentioned  subprime  earlier—has  been 
going  on—a  lot  of  folks,  including  Mr.  Greenspan  at  this—at  the 
Fed—sat  at  their  chair  without  taking  the  kind  of  action  that 
should have been taken. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

59 

But,  let  me  go  to  another  point,  if  I  might.  I  want  to  ask  you 
about  margin  requirements.  NYMEX  and  others  will  say,  you 
know, ‘‘We don’t have evidence of unbelievable speculation. If it ex-
ists,  it  must  be  over  on  the  dark  side,  it  must  be  on  the  unregu-
lated  side.’’  They  say,  ‘‘Increasing  margin  requirements  will  do 
nothing.’’ Respond to that, if you will, Mr. Greenberger. 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Oh,  well,  look,  NYMEX  says  that  because 
they  treat  investment  banks  and  hedge  funds  as  oil  dealers. 
They’re—— 

Senator DORGAN. And they are not. 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Yes.  Of  course  they’re  not.  Thirty  percent  of 

what they deem to be oil dealers are Morgan—— 

Senator DORGAN. I understand. 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.—Stanley  and  Goldman  Sachs.  So,  they  say, 
‘‘Wow. You know, we look at the speculators and they don’t include 
one-half  the  speculators.’’  Yes,  if  you  impose  margin  requirements, 
it’s an unfortunate thing that we have to talk about this, but spec-
ulators should have increased margin requirements. 

Senator DORGAN. You think it will be effective. 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.  It—as  Mr.  Soros  said,  it’s  a  last  resort,  but 

we’re desperate right now. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Soros, what should the increase in margin 
requirements  be?  I  believe  the  margin  requirement  on  stocks  is 
about  50  percent.  I  think,  on  these  contracts,  it’s  5  to  7  percent. 
What do you suggest we do with—— 

Mr. SOROS. Unfortunately—— 
Senator DORGAN.—respect to margin—— 
Mr.  SOROS.—I’m  really  not  an  expert  in  the  oil  markets.  I  said 
that in my testimony. And so, I really can’t express a view. I’m just 
not familiar enough with oil trading to be able to say. 

Senator DORGAN. Dr. Cooper, what do you recommend? 
Dr.  COOPER.  I  want  to  make  an  observation.  I  did  a  report  for 
attorneys  general  in  four  Midwestern  states—Illinois,  Iowa,  Mis-
souri,  and  Wisconsin.  We  looked  at  the  natural  gas  market,  and 
much of my testimony reflects our early—this was in March of—— 

Senator DORGAN. Right. 
Dr.  COOPER.—2006,  a  couple  of  months  before  the  Permanent 
Committee  came  out  with  a  similar  finding.  The  fascinating  thing 
was that, at the time, a puny hedge fund—and, let’s be clear, Ama-
ranth was not a very big hedge fund—a puny hedge fund had accu-
mulated  a  massive  position  in  the  natural  gas  market,  and  the 
CFTC and the FERC did not have a clue. They were completely in 
the dark about this going on. 

Now,  as  we’ve  heard,  a  year  and  a  half  later  the  FERC  sort  of 
starts  to  figure  it  out  and  fines  these  folks  a  little  bit  of  money. 
And compared to these markets, it’s a little bit of money. 

The simple fact of the matter is that you cannot let these people 
play.  Enron  loved  its  title.  They  called  themselves  ‘‘asset  light.’’ 
And everyone thought that was the neatest thing in the world, be-
cause, hey, if you don’t have any—— 

Senator DORGAN. Right. 
Dr. COOPER.—assets, you can really fool around. The simple fact 
of  the  matter  is  that  if  we  tie  trading  to  real  assets,  we  will  dis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

60 

cipline  the  heck  out  of  people  who  are  running  around  in  these 
markets. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Just  one  more  quick  point.  Investment  banks 
and others are taking large positions on this commodity where they 
have not previously taken positions. Then we hear Goldman Sachs 
say,  ‘‘We  think  it’s  going  to  be—it’s  going  to  go  to  $200  a  barrel.’’ 
Is  there  an  impression,  of  anybody  on  the  table,  that  if  you  look 
behind the curtain you’d see people taking long positions on oil and 
then making statements? Would that be surprising? 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Oh,  Goldman  Sachs  is  very,  very  long  in 
these  markets.  As  Mr.  Soros  said,  these  banks  have  gotten  into 
the—these  financial  institutions  have  dominated  this—markets, 
and they’re on the long side. That’s why the price is going up, and 
that’s  why  commercial  users  who  need  these  markets  can’t  use 
them,  because  the  price  of  these  contracts  are  going  through  the 
roof. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Is  it  in  their  interest  to  predict  higher  prices? 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Well,  I  don’t  want  to—let  me  just  say,  from 
my  observation,  I  find  it  highly  ironic  that  when  you  control  the 
price  of  crude  oil,  that  you  can  comfortably  predict  it  will  go  up 
from $135 to $200. I find that to be more than a mere coincidence. 
Senator DORGAN. I have another round of questions, but my time 

is expired. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Senator Snowe? Or, Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you very much, Madam Chair. 
Mr.  Greenberger,  as  I  was  listening  to  you  rail,  understandably, 
on the Enron loophole and how it’s not really closed when it comes 
to crude oil, I was reminded of a forum that we had just a few days 
ago  in  Moorhead,  Minnesota,  where  someone,  who  had  just  your 
tone  of  voice—he  was  just  a  retired  guy  that  was  standing  there 
and  saying,  ‘‘Congress  keeps  saying  they’re  doing  stuff,  but  they’re 
not  really  doing  stuff.’’  So,  what  I  want  to  get  at  right  now  is  how 
we can really get something done here. 

And  you  talked,  and  Senator  Dorgan  just  asked  you  a  few  ques-
tions,  about  the  Enron  loophole,  so  I—from  my  understanding  of 
this  in  your  testimony  is  that  the  first  problem  with  it—put  aside 
the crude oil—was that the way the language read in the farm bill, 
you  saw  that  it  just  put  too  much  burden  on  the  CFTC  to  try  to 
get  to  the  bottom  of  it.  And  tell  me  about  that  and  what  the  prob-
lem is with that and how that can be fixed. 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Before  the  Enron  loophole  passed,  for  78 
years,  the  status  quo  had  been,  ‘‘If  you  trade  a  futures  contract,  it 
must be regulated. If you want to get it deregulated, the trader has 
the burden to demonstrate that deregulation will not lead to fraud, 
manipulation,  and  excessive  speculation.’’  The  Enron  loophole  said 
to  all  the  speculators,  ‘‘Go  wherever  you  want.  You  have  no  con-
trols.’’  The  ‘‘End  the  Enron  Loophole’’  says,  ‘‘On  a  contract-by-con-
tract  basis,  it  is  now  the  burden  of  the  CFTC  to  prove  that  each 
contract should be regulated.’’ So, it has to go through complicated 
administrative  hearings,  which  I  can  tell  you  will  be  challenged 
vigorously by people who can afford to make those challenges, and 
will  have  to  prove,  by  substantial  evidence,  that  that  contract  will 
be  regulated.  Those  decisions  will  be  challenged  judicially,  that— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

61 

it’s a nightmare, and the CFTC said it knows of one contract, over 
the  thousands  in  this  area,  that  it  believes  should  be  brought  out 
from the shadows of the Enron loophole. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  OK.  Then  the  second  thing—so,  it’s  to 
change  that  language  with  the  burden,  but  the  second  thing  is, 
while the language covered crude oil, because of the CFTC’s actions 
with  these  ‘‘no  action’’  letters  that  Mr.  Ramm  was  talking  about, 
that  that  is  also  an  additional  problem.  And  I  think  this  bill  was 
introduced, which is Senate file 2995, that attempts to fix that, but 
you don’t believe that it would fix it. 

Mr. GREENBERGER. I have—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. And you want to elaborate on that? 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.  I  have  a  lengthy  dissertation  on  that.  There 
is now nothing in the law that sanctions foreign board of trades in 
the United States trading U.S. products being able to escape regu-
lation. That legislation says, ‘‘If the CFTC finds the home regulator 
comparable,  it’s  OK  for  them  not  to  be  regulated.’’  The  CFTC,  in 
May  2007,  found  the  Dubai  Financial  Services  Authority  to  have, 
quote, ‘‘comparable regulation to the United States.’’ So, that legis-
lation will sanction—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. What they did. 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.—what  is  now,  in  my  belief,  illegal,  and  will 
soon, if somebody wakes up, be invalidated either by a private indi-
vidual  being  hurt  by  it,  or  a  State  attorney  general.  If  you  pass 
that,  you’ll  block  attorney  generals  from  getting  rid  of  that  loop-
hole. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  So,  your  argument  is,  which  you  just—you 
gave  your  idea  to  Senator  Dorgan—that  the  idea  is  to  put  the 
words  ‘‘energy’’  back  in  so  that  we  can  actually  go  back  to  where 
we  were  before  this—what  Dr.  Cooper  calls  ‘‘the  foolish,  but  affec-
tionately called, Enron loophole’’ got put into the law? 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Yes.  Overnight,  that  will  bring  down  the 
price  of  crude  oil,  I  believe,  by  25  percent.  Now,  there  has  to  be  a 
grace  period,  obviously,  but  it  would  say  that  anybody  in  the 
United  States  trading  United  States-delivered  products  must  be 
subject to regulation. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Mr.  Ramm,  is  your  idea  consistent  with 
what Mr. Greenberger has been saying? By the way, I think it’s in-
teresting  for  people  to  know,  who  are  watching  this,  that  a  lot  of 
people think gas stations have been making money, hand over foot, 
during  these  increased  prices,  and  I  think  it’s  interesting  to  hear 
you  talk  about  the  fact  that  we  need  more  regulation  of  specula-
tion, because, in fact, it’s not true. 

Mr. Ramm? 
Mr.  RAMM.  We  are  completely  in  agreement  with  rescinding  the 
‘‘no  action’’  letters,  because  of  the  things  that  have  happened  to 
date. And, you’re right, petroleum marketers are going out of busi-
ness, farmers are going out of business. We can’t get the capital to 
finance  our  receivables.  Farmers  can’t  get  the  capital  to  get  the 
money to operate their farms. 

Now, I know that the CFTC has put out an announcement in try-
ing  to  help  with  the  Banking  Committee  to  try  to  free  up  capital 
for farmers, but oil marketers won’t be able to deliver that fuel, be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

62 

cause  they  can’t  afford  to  buy  it,  to  have  receivables  for  it  either. 
So, we’d be looking for some relief there also. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. I just wanted to thank both of you, be-
cause  I  can  tell  you,  I’m  not  going  up  and  telling  that  guy  yelling 
at the forum in Moorhead that Dubai is going to take care of him. 
So,  thank  you  for  your  thoughts  and  ideas,  and  I’m  sure  we’ll  be 
using them as we go forward. 

Senator CANTWELL. Senator Snowe? 

STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  And  I  thank  you  for 
holding  this  hearing  today  on  this  very  critical  issue,  and  exam-
ining  one  of  the—you  know,  most  unexamined,  unexplored  areas, 
which  is  the  energy  futures  market,  that’s  certainly  deeply  dis-
turbing  and  deeply  troubling,  certainly  puts  us  at  a  tipping  point 
in our economy with respect to the high energy prices. And I know, 
for  my  constituents  in  Maine,  the  questions  that  they  are  asking 
is  exactly  why  this  is  happening,  it’s  totally  inexplicable,  in  terms 
of where we are today. 

As  you  said,  Mr.  Ramm,  about  home  heating  oil  prices  in  my 
state,  80  percent  of  winter  heat’s  derived  from  oil.  Eighty  percent. 
And the price currently is $4.50. You know, it went up a single day 
in  May,  according  to  my  Maine  oil  dealers,  30  cents  in  one  day,  7 
percent.  It  just  doesn’t—you  know,  it  just  doesn’t  stand  to  reason, 
it’s  not  rational.  And  I’m  concerned  because  clearly  it  represents  a 
tipping  point  for  America,  in  terms  of  its  economy  and  for  Ameri-
cans.  You  know,  we’re  talking  about  maybe,  you  know,  $5,000  oil 
bills  for  the  average  Mainer  or  anybody  using  home  heating  oil 
next  winter.  And,  I  mean,  that’s  now.  We’re  not—we  have  no  way 
of  knowing  what  it’s  going  to  be  next  winter.  You  pay  a  cap  price 
of $4.89 in Maine right now. 

So,  this  is  deeply  disturbing  and  devastating.  I  mean,  it  could 
place our economy in ruins. People are asking the question, why is 
this  happening?  And  it  is  not  based  on  supply  and  demand,  and 
that’s  what  I’m  hearing.  Would  you  all  agree  it  is  not—and  that’s 
the  question  that  Madam  Chair  asked,  and  whether  or  not  it’s 
based on supply and demand. And it’s not. 

And so, we’ve taken the first step in the farm bill. Senator Fein-
stein  and  I  and  Senator  Cantwell  introduced—that  legislation  be-
came law several weeks ago. But, I’m concerned about the timidity 
of  the  agencies,  as  well,  in  not  aggressively  pursuing  the  specula-
tion that’s now pervasive. 

So,  one  of  the  questions  I  would  like  to  ask  is,  with  respect  to 
the foreign board of trades, should we have the ability to limit their 
positions? You know, in fact, in one of our questions that we posed 
to the Commodity Futures Trading Commission recently in a letter 
that Senator Feinstein, Senator Cantwell and I submitted with re-
spect  to  the  West  Texas  Intermediate  crude  oil  futures  that  now 
represent—31 percent of U.S. oil is traded on foreign markets. And 
this  is  in  accordance  with  the  response  by  the  Commodity  Futures 
Trading  Commission.  That’s  alarming.  I  mean,  that  is  31  percent. 
And  so,  we  don’t  require  the  same  standard  for,  obviously,  foreign 
trades  by,  you  know,  future—by  American  oil  speculators  on  for-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

63 

eign  markets.  Is  that  an  area  that  we  should  be  engaged  in,  and 
should  we  give  the  authority  to  the  Commodity  Futures  Trading 
Commission to engage in that process? 

Mr. Greenberger? 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Senator  Snowe,  that  is  a  staff—that  foreign 
board  of  trade  license  to  come  into  the  United  States  and  sell  in 
the  United  States  U.S.-delivered  products  but  be  regulated  back 
home  is  a  staff  ‘‘no  action’’  letter.  Unfortunately,  I’m  embarrassed 
to  say  I  wrote  the  template  for  it.  It  has  1,000  conditions  in  it. 
Under  the  present  circumstances,  it  can  and  should  be  terminated 
this afternoon. It is—my view is, the way they have converted this 
limited  license  into  a  total  exemption  is  grossly  unlawful  and 
makes no sense, and my view is, as Mr. Ramm said, it should be— 
if  the  CFTC  doesn’t  come  to  its  senses,  which  it  could  do—it’s  not 
a  commission  regulation,  it’s  a  letter;  they  could  revoke  it  by  the 
terms  of  the  letter—then  you  must  stop  this,  you  must  stop  Dubai 
and  NYMEX  partnering,  selling  commodities  in  the  United  States 
on the assumption that speculation will be controlled in Dubai. 

Senator  SNOWE.  So,  is  that  the—is  that  something  that  we 

should be demanding immediately today—— 

Mr. GREENBERGER. As I—— 
Senator SNOWE.—and that they could do it unilaterally? 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Oh,  yes.  And,  as  I  read  your  letter,  Senator 
Snowe,  that’s  exactly  what  you  asked.  I  have—I  know  that  there 
are  commissioners  who  would  like  to  do  it,  but  they  don’t  have  a 
control  there.  That  can  be  ended.  If  they  don’t  end  it,  you  should 
end it right away. 

And by the way—I know you have limited time, I hope I can just 
expand—what  the  traders  come  in  and  say  is,  ‘‘Oh,  if  you  regulate 
us  in  the  United  States,  we’re  going  to  go  to  Dubai  and  London.’’ 
You  know,  that’s  phony  baloney.  I  sat  there,  10  years  ago,  when 
18 foreign exchanges came to me and said, ‘‘We cannot survive un-
less we are in the United States. We need the United States inves-
tors  and  United  States  markets.’’  They  can’t  escape  United  States 
jurisdiction. 

And I must say, if that’s the reaction of Goldman Sachs and Mor-
gan  Stanley  and  British  Petroleum  to  the  suffering  that  you’re  ex-
periencing,  they’re  not  going  to  go  to  London,  they’re  going  to  try 
and trade in the United States and make it appear they’re in Lon-
don.  But,  my  view  is,  if  they  want  to  go  to  Dubai,  God  bless.  The 
price  of  gas  in  the  United  States  will  come  dropping  down.  We 
should wish them well. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  I  appreciate  that  forthrightness.  And  I 
think  that  is  certainly  something  that  we  should  be  pursuing  as 
soon as possible. Thank you. 
Thank you, Madam Chair. 
Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Madam Chair. I appreciate you hav-

ing this hearing. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

64 

Let  me  follow  up,  if  I  can,  Mr.  Greenberger,  on  what  you  were 

just talking about with Dubai and these other exchanges. 

As  I  understand  it,  the  way  it  works  is,  in  order  to  trade  in  oil 
commodities,  you  only  have  to  put  6  percent  of  the  capital  down, 
and  that  is,  what,  a  16-to-1  ratio,  something  like  that.  Should  we 
look at that? Is that a way to address this? 

Mr. GREENBERGER. It is ‘‘a’’ way, and I think it should be looked 
at for speculators. But, I think what Mr. Soros said is the historic, 
traditional answer in these markets. You need speculation to make 
them liquid, but you can’t have 90 percent of the market be specu-
lation,  which  I  believe  is  the  case  today  in  West  Texas  Inter-
mediate.  The  historic  way,  from  1922,  with  the  Grain  Act,  passed 
by  farmers—at  the  request  of  farmers,  since  2000,  when  Mr. 
Gramm  deregulated  these  markets,  speculation  limits  were  de-
signed, contract by contract, to say, ‘‘Yes, speculators, come in, but 
you  can  only  have  a  small  part  of  this  market.  It’s  for  Mr.  Ramm. 
This  market  is  for  him  to  hedge  his  interests.’’  And  what  we  have 
now,  I  believe  data  will  soon  be  released  that,  if  you  calculate, 
properly, the West Texas Intermediate market, you will see 90 per-
cent  of  it  is  dominated  by  hedge  funds,  banks,  endowments,  pen-
sion  funds,  mutual  funds,  et  cetera.  They’ve  taken  over.  And,  as 
Mr.  Soros  said,  you  can’t  run  the  market  like  that.  It’s  completely 
dysfunctional. 

So, I say everybody should be regulated, spec limits should be ap-
plied,  and  margin  increase  for  speculators  should  definitely  be 
looked at. 

Senator  PRYOR.  The  price  of  West  Texas  crude  today  is,  what, 

roughly $130 a barrel? 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Well,  interestingly  enough,  it  touched  $135 
the  day  the  CFTC  announced  that  it  would  do  something  about  it. 
By  the  end  of  the  day,  it  was  $126.  So,  it’s  somewhere  between 
$125 and $130 right now. 

Senator  PRYOR.  If  we  did  the  fixes  that  you’re  recommending, 
what  do  you  think  the  price  of  a  barrel  of  West  Texas  crude  may 
go to? 

Mr. GREENBERGER. Well, I wish I could forthrightly predict that, 
because I wouldn’t be here now, I’d be in a beach in Rio de Janeiro. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.  But,  my  prediction  is—for  whatever  it’s 
worth, is you’d get at least a 25 percent drop in the cost of oil, and 
a corresponding drop in the cost of gasoline. 

Senator PRYOR. All right, and—— 
Mr. GREENBERGER. Some people estimate 50 percent. 
Senator PRYOR. Let me follow up on something that I know that 
Senator  Dorgan  feels  very  passionate  about,  and  that  is  to  stop 
putting oil into the strategic petroleum reserve, which we did, 2 or 
3  weeks  ago,  and  the  President  ultimately  signed  it.  What  impact 
will that have? 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Well,  you  know,  OPEC,  which  is  the  biggest 
strategic  petroleum  reserve  in  the  world,  will  not  release  oil  into 
this  market,  because  they  believe  that  they  can  throw  all  the  oil 
they  want  to  throw  at  this  market,  but  the  speculators  will  con-
tinue to drive it up. My view is, if you don’t control speculation, you 
can  empty  the  strategic  petroleum  reserve  and  the  price  of  oil  will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

65 

continue  to  go  up.  And  that’s  why  people  say,  ‘‘Oh,  we  want  green 
energy,  we  want  biofuel.’’  Well,  the  biofuel  developers  are  going  to 
need  to  hedge  when  they  get  their  biofuel  going,  and  what’s  going 
to  happen  when  you  get  all  this  new,  clean  energy  is,  the  banks 
are  going  to  go  into  those  markets  and  rob  those  guys  blind,  like 
they’re  robbing  the  gas-station  owners  and  heating-oil  dealers  in 
this  country  right  now.  Small  business  people  are  tanking.  The 
other  day,  I  talked  to  Sean  Cota,  who’s  the  head  of  the  New  Eng-
land  Fuel  Institute,  and  I  said,  ‘‘Sean,  make  sure  you  have  some-
one  at  this  hearing,’’  and  he  wrote  back  and  said,  ‘‘Michael,  I’m  in 
a  meeting  with  Vermont  oil  dealers.  Half  of  them  think  they  will 
be gone as a financial institution by the end of this week.’’ 

Senator PRYOR. If I—— 
Mr. SOROS. If I may—— 
Senator PRYOR. Yes, Mr. Soros. 
Mr. SOROS. If I may point out that the additions to the index fu-
tures buying in the last few years has been a multiple of the addi-
tions to the strategic reserves, and that is the—what I call the ele-
phant in the room. 

Senator PRYOR. Explain that, if you can, to the Committee. 
Mr. SOROS. Well, that these institutions, acting as a herd—— 
Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Mr.  SOROS.—are  accumulating  much  larger—or  setting  aside 

much larger reserves than the strategic reserve is. 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Mr.  SOROS.  Now,  of  course,  it’s  not  a  physical  reserve,  and  some 
people argue that, therefore, it doesn’t affect the price, but I would 
differ, because I think it does affect the price. It has the same effect 
as other buying. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Dr.  Cooper,  let  me  ask  you—it’s  a  follow  up  to  something  you 
said  earlier.  You  gave,  kind  of,  a  40–40–40  to  a  price,  I  guess,  of 
a  barrel  of  oil.  As  I  understand  it,  what  you’re  saying  is  that,  in 
your  view,  what,  only  about  $40  is  the  real  cost  of  a  barrel  of  oil? 
Dr. COOPER. Yes, I’d pick the middle of the range that the oil in-
dustry is—has offered, up on the Hill here in the last few months. 
I  mean,  one  set  of  executives  said  $50  or  $55.  Now,  that’s  at  the 
margin.  Another  executive  recently  said  $35  to  $60.  So,  the  eco-
nomic cost of producing and delivering a gallon of gasoline into my 
car  is  about  $2.25,  if  you  look  at  the  real  economic  costs.  And  ev-
erything  above  that  is  funny-money,  a  combination  of  speculation 
and the exercise of market power. 40–40–40 is, I think, a good rep-
resentation  of  $120.  The  Institute  for  Energy,  in  Japan,  recently 
looked at the year-end 2007 and came up with the figure of $30 or 
$40  for  speculation.  The  Senate  committee  came  up  with  $25, 
but—— 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Dr. COOPER.—that was a couple of years ago. 
Senator PRYOR. I understand. 
All  right.  Well,  let  me  ask  one  last  question.  I’m  not  sure  who 
this should be directed to, but maybe all of you can chime in if you 
feel like you should. 

There  have  been  some  reports  that  owners  of  crude-oil  storage 
tanks  and  pipelines  are  using  their  knowledge  regarding  their  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

66 

ventories  and  the  flow  to  make  bets  on  the  future.  I  don’t  know  if 
you’re aware of these reports. Supposedly, these owners are putting 
out  misleading  information  in  order  to  make  trades  and  to  profit 
on  that  misunderstanding.  Again,  I  don’t  know  if  you’re  familiar 
with  those.  But,  first,  do  you  believe  that  some  of  that  is  going  on 
right  now?  Second,  these,  seem  to  be  manipulative  and  deceptive 
acts,  and  what  should  we  do  to  make  sure  this  doesn’t  happen  in 
the future? Well, it certainly shouldn’t happen right now, but what 
can we do to stop it? So, who wants to take a bite at that? 

Dr.  COOPER.  If  you  look  at  the  report  we—I  did  for  the  Midwest 
attorneys  general—this  was  during  the  natural  gas  problem  in 
2006—the  traders  knew  what  was  going  on.  I  mean,  they  would 
look at the market, say, ‘‘This is wacky,’’ and they would identify— 
they knew there were people who were engaging in a variety of be-
haviors,  which  the  CFTC  and  the  FERC  do  not  think  is  illegal— 
are  illegal.  Under  the  case  law,  it’s  really  tough.  But,  the  simple 
fact  of  the  matter  is  that  there  is  a  whole  range  of  trading  prac-
tices,  including—that’s  insider  trading;  I  mentioned  that  in  my 
list—which,  in  fact,  pump  up  the  price.  They  are  not  currently  on 
the radar screen of these agencies. 

The best way to begin to address that is, one, expand the author-
ity  of  the  agencies,  as  you’ve  done  for  the  FTC.  But,  if  you  look  at 
the  FTC’s  Advance  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking,  they’re  getting 
ready  to  go  down  the  same  dead-end  street  that  the  FERC  went. 
They’re  not  really  going  to  expand  their  power,  they’re  just  going 
to  adopt  the  existing  case  law.  But,  the  existing  case  law  is  inad-
equate to deal with the post-Enron problem in these markets. 

So,  you  need  to  expand  those  authorities,  but  you  also  need  to 
find  ways  to  tie  these  financial  markets  back  to  the  physical  com-
modities.  We  don’t  need  to  trade  a  barrel  of  oil  or  a  methane  mol-
ecule  30  times  between  wellhead  and  burner  tip.  That’s  excessive 
liquidity. That’s too much liquidity. These markets are supposed to 
help  us  get  physical  commodities  out  of  the  ground  and  into  our 
gasoline tanks. They’re not there for people to make huge fortunes. 
Tie  the  trading  back  to  the  physical  reality  and  you  will  dampen 
down the speculation. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Senator  Carper  will  be  next,  and  then  I  know  there  are  several 
members  who  have  joined  us  who  want  to  get  in  their  first  round 
of  questions.  I  do  intend  to  get  a  second  round  in,  and  hopefully 
still have us out of here roughly around noon. So, if members want 
to stay for a second round, that would be great. 

So, Senator Carper? 

STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 

Senator CARPER. Thank you, Madam Chair. 
Welcome. It’s—you’re good to come. We appreciate your presence, 

and we appreciate your testimony. 

About  2  weeks  ago,  we  held  a  hearing  in  the  Senate  Banking 
Committee  on  a  subject  not  dissimilar  to  the  one  that  we’re  dis-
cussing  here  today.  During  the  course  of  that  discussion  and  testi-
mony, the Members of the Committee, learned that there are three 
principal  factors  contributing  to  the  run-up  in  oil  prices.  One  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

67 

those  is  deemed  to  be  the  change  in  the  value  of  the  dollar,  the 
drop in the value of the dollar relative to many other currencies in 
the  world.  A  second  factor  was  believed  to  be  explained  by  supply 
and  demand.  The  third  factor  was  speculation.  I  don’t  know  that 
I would say one factor is greater than the other. But, is—I’ve joined 
this Committee, sort of, in midcourse here during the Q&A—is that 
pretty  much  the—where  you  all  are  coming  from,  as  well?  Are 
those—is that a fair summary of your conclusions, too? 
[The prepared statement of Senator Carper follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER, U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 
As  we  have  watched  oil  prices  break  record  after  record,  many  of  us  have  ex-

pressed concern about the impact of speculators on the price of oil. 

Just a few weeks ago, I asked Chairman Inouye to consider holding a hearing on 
this  issue  and  here  we  are.  I’d  like  to  thank  him  for  responding  to  my,  and  many 
of my colleague’s, request so quickly. 

High gas prices are impacting Americans in many ways. Transportation is becom-
ing  a  larger  and  larger  portion  of  the  household  budget.  And  transportation  costs 
are impacting the cost of everything from groceries to construction. 

There are many factors that go into the cost of gasoline. There is the cost of explo-
ration of a finite and possibly dwindling resource. There is the cost of refining crude 
oil. 

There is increasing demand from developing nations, like China and India. There 
has also been for increasing demand here in the U.S., as vehicle miles traveled has 
increased 150 percent since the 1970s. 

But  there  is  also  the  impact  of  market  manipulation  and  speculation.  We  have 
seen speculators drive the Internet bubble and the housing bubble. And now specu-
lators may be driving the cost of gas higher. But this speculation impacts every sin-
gle American, hitting working class Americans the hardest. 

Today,  we  will  hopefully  learn  what  we  can  and  should  do  to  reduce  the  impact 
of  speculation  on  the  price  of  oil  and  make  sure  that  the  price  is  based  on  supply 
and  demand.  At  the  least,  we  need  to  make  sure  there  is  sufficient  transparency 
in our markets and in the participants. 

If  we  act  soon,  this  could  help  all  Americans  deal  by  lowering  gas  prices  in  the 

short run and prevent similar, unnecessary price spikes in the future. 

However,  we  have  a  larger  challenge.  Even  if  true  market  forces  are  at  work, 

many Americans do not have the ability to opt out of the gas market. 

In many areas, if the price of something goes to high, people stop buying it. Then 

the market reacts and prices come down. 

But  because  of  the  way  most  communities  have  been  developed  and  the  limited 
transportation network we have provided, most Americans have no choice but to buy 
gasoline. 

Let’s  restore  fair  market  forces  to  the  price  of  gas.  Let’s  ensure  we  understand 

who is investing in gasoline and why. 

But  as  we  discuss  climate  change  and  the  reauthorization  of  the  transportation 
bill next year, we must provide Americans with transportation options so that they 
can save money on gas, reduce demand and maybe reduce prices too. 

And let’s just start with Mr. Soros. 
Mr.  SOROS.  Well,  it  definitely—I  spoke  about  the  backward-slop-
ing  supply  curve;  that  is  to  say  that  oil-producing  countries  find  it 
and have no incentive, or less incentive to convert their oil reserves 
underground,  which  are  set  to  appreciate  in  value,  into  dollar  re-
serves above ground, which have a tendency to lose their value. So, 
that is a very important factor in creating the current upward pres-
sure  on  oil  prices.  Generally,  the  institutional  demand  for  these 
commodity  futures  indexes  is  also  a  flight  from  currency.  The  dol-
lar  has  lost  its  position  as  the  unquestioned,  undoubted  storer  of 
value  reserve  currency,  and  there  is  no  suitable  alternative  to  it. 
Therefore, there is a general flight from currencies and a search for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

68 

commodities.  And  so,  the  commodity—this  is  a  very  important  ele-
ment in the commodities movement that you’re currently—— 

Senator CARPER. Thank you, Mr. Soros. 
Mr. Greenberger? 
Mr. GREENBERGER. I agree with what Mr. Soros said, and I agree 
with  what—the  assessment  you  articulated.  And  I  happen  to  be-
lieve  that  there’s  a  correlation  between  the  weak  dollar  and  exces-
sive  speculation.  The  day  that  the  CFTC  said  it  might  do  some-
thing  about  this,  the—it  was  announced  that  oil  went  down  $4.41. 
But,  that  was  looking  from  the  prior  day’s  price.  It  went  down 
about $7 that day. The dollar went up. The dollar went up. 

If  we  could  get  our  oil  prices  under  control,  it  would—and  our 
farm prices and our—by the way, the subprime meltdown all leads 
back  to  this  deregulation.  The  critical  instrument  of  credit  default 
swaps freed by this act would have been regulated but for this act. 
If  we  could  get  these  things  under  control,  I  believe  the  dollar 
would strengthen. And so, there’s a correlation between speculation 
killing the economy and that reflecting itself in the U.S. dollar not 
being what it should be. 

Senator CARPER. Thank you. 
Mr. Ramm? 
Mr.  RAMM.  I  do  agree  that  those  are  three  major  components  of 
price  today.  In  the  area  of  supply  and  demand,  it’s  kind  of  ironic 
that  probably  the  largest  cost  increase  in  bringing  supply  to  the 
market  is  petroleum—is  the  cost  of  petroleum,  because  it’s  forcing 
prices  to  go  up  on  every  service  rig,  every  exploration  job,  and  it’s 
causing  prices  to  go  up,  so  it’s  making  the  cost  of  oil  go  up,  by 
itself. 

In  regards  to  the  currency,  another  ironic  thing  is  that  as  the 
dollar has fallen—and it has, because of oil being traded as a U.S. 
currency,  globally—it  has  taken  a  hit  on—especially  for  the  U.S. 
citizens. But, as Mr. Solos said, as that money has left those tradi-
tional  markets,  it  has  flowed  into  the  commodity  market.  And  he 
has  also  said  that  it’s  the  elephant  in  the  room;  that  amount  of 
money,  compared  to  the  futures  market,  is  huge.  It’s  absolutely 
huge. Not as big, when you would go back to the currency market. 
And  then,  the  last  would  be  speculation,  because  that,  in  itself, 
is  one  of  the  feeders  of  the  commodity  that  they  need,  which  is 
cash, for excess speculation. 

Senator CARPER. Right. 
Ms.  Watson—my  time’s  just  about  to  expire—and  Dr.  Cooper— 

just briefly, if you would, please. 

Ms. WATSON. I really can’t address that on behalf of FERC, since 

it’s not under our jurisdiction. 

Senator CARPER. All right, thank you. 
Dr. COOPER. 40–40–40. Forty dollars for the economic cost of—— 
Senator CARPER. You’re good at sticking on my—— 
Dr. COOPER. Well, you know, but—— 
Senator CARPER.—staying on—— 
Dr. COOPER.—it’s—— 
Senator CARPER. We can learn from you. 
[Laughter.] 
Dr.  COOPER.  The  evidence  clearly  supports  those  three  numbers. 
OPEC  is  only  defending  $80  a  barrel,  so  the  most  recent  $40  is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

69 

coming from someplace else. The Senate Commerce Committee, the 
Senate  Oversight  Investigations  Committee,  found  $25.  So,  it’s 
quite  clear,  the  oil  companies  have  testified  to  something  in  the 
neighborhood  of  $40  per  barrel  for  the  economic  costs.  So,  these 
numbers  are  straightforward.  They’re  there  on  the  table.  We  have 
to deal with them. 

And  I  would  love  to  fix  the  supply  and  demand.  That’s  tough. 
That’s a long-term issue we’ve talked about. I know I can deal with 
the speculation if I roll up my sleeves, assert the national authority 
of  the  U.S.  Government,  as  Professor  Greenberger  has  suggested, 
to regulate the commodities that are traded here. 

The  United  States  accounts  for  one-quarter  of  all  the  gasoline 
consumed  in  the  world.  If  we  regulate  this  market  well,  we  will 
whip  the  rest  of  the  world  into  shape,  as  opposed  to  abandoning 
our authority to foreign governments and private corporations. 

Mr. SOROS. May I—— 
Senator CARPER. Mr. Soros? 
Mr.  SOROS.—respectfully  disagree  with  this  40–40–40,  which  I 
have  now  heard  too  many  times.  I  just  think  that  is  an  exaggera-
tion.  I  think  that  there  are  very  serious  underlying  factors  for  the 
rise in the price of oil. And, while it would be desirable to deal with 
the  fraud  on  top  of  those  factors,  we  should  not  lose  sight  of  the 
underlying problems that need to be addressed, as well. 

Senator CARPER. Thank you. 
Thanks, Madam Chair. 
Senator CANTWELL. Senator Thune? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator THUNE. Thank you, Madam Chair. 
Let me ask that question another way. If, let’s say, today a price 
per  barrel  of  oil  is  $130.  Without  the  role  of  speculation,  what’s 
that price? 

Dr. COOPER. I think it goes down 25 percent, which is about $40. 
There’s  a  tremendous  speculative  premium  that’s  been  inserted 
into the price of oil over the—essentially over the last 6 or 7 years. 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Yes,  Sunoco—ExxonMobil  and,  I  believe, 
Sunoco  recently  said  $35  to  $65,  $50  to  $55.  There  are  a  legion  of 
economists who believe that there is at least a one-quarter specula-
tive  premium  that  has  nothing  to  do  with  supply  demand.  And 
given what these oil companies are saying—and, by the way, many 
of  these  oil  companies  are  just  as  angry  as  Mr.  Ramm  is—they 
can’t hedge, either. These airlines can’t hedge anymore. These mar-
kets are not hedging, they’re gambling casinos. They’re not for com-
mercial  interests  anymore.  So,  it  would  go  down,  and  it  could  go 
down  very  quickly  if,  as  Dr.  Cooper  said,  we  rolled  up  our  sleeves. 
This is not a hard problem. 

Senator THUNE. And I’ve seen different assessments, too, and at-
tempts  to  quantify  the  impact  of  various  parts  of  this  equation. 
What—in  terms  of  the  weak  dollar,  what  is  the—what  would  you 
say  is  the  impact  on  the  price  per  barrel  of  oil  attributable  to  the 
fact  that  the  dollar  has  been  substantially  below  where  it’s  been, 
historically? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

70 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Well,  I  think  Mr.  Soros  explained  that  about 
as  well  as  it  can  be  explained.  If  you’re  holding  an  asset  that  you 
control  the  price  of,  and  you  can  drive  it  up—Morgan  Stanley  is, 
I  am  told—Senator  Snowe  may  know  better—the  largest  holder  of 
heating oil in New England. They don’t want to release it, because 
if  they  can  control  the  price—and  they’re  obviously  doing  a  great 
job, Senator Snowe is telling you; in May, heating oil is going up— 
they  don’t  want  to  exchange  it  for  the  U.S.  dollar.  The  U.S.  dollar 
is  going  down.  That’s  a  bad  trade.  So,  what  do  they  want  to  do? 
They  want  to  hold  it.  And  that  is—if  there  is  a  supply  demand 
problem, it is a question of hoarding, here. The speculators are not 
just  placing  bets  in  these  futures  markets,  they’re  saying,  ‘‘Gosh, 
if I can control the price of heating oil, I’m going to go out and buy 
heating  oil.’’  So,  you  have  Morgan  Stanley  as  the  biggest  heating 
oil owners in New England. 

Mr.  SOROS.  If  I  may,  I  think  it  is  a  little  misleading.  The  way 
we  are  presenting  it  now,  because  let  us  say  that  there  is,  and  I 
believe  that  there  is,  a  speculative  froth  in  the  price  of  oil,  and  it 
has  really  developed  in  the  last  few  months,  and  you  really  see  it. 
But  underlying  it  there  is  this  problem  that  the  cost  of  replacing 
the  existing  oil  supply  is  rising,  it  is  becoming  increasingly  costly, 
and  the  oil  fields  are  aging,  in  that  their  depletion  is  accelerating. 
And  there  is  this  upward  pressure  on  demand—also  a  real  force 
which  we  didn’t  mention—the  rising  standard  of  living  in  the  de-
veloped world, and the—against this, if you now head into a reces-
sion, prices would—the price of oil would come down. But, once you 
come out of the recession, it would go up again. So, there is an un-
derlying  problem,  and  there  is  really  a  need  to  develop  alternative 
sources  of  energy.  We  do  have,  also,  global  warming,  which  is  a 
very  serious  problem.  So,  while  we  are  focusing  on  the  speculative 
excesses, we should not lose sight of these underlying problems. 

Senator  THUNE.  And  I  don’t  disagree.  There  are  fundamentals— 
market  fundamentals,  obviously,  that  are  impacting  this,  but 
there’s nothing that has, probably, has more of an economic impact 
on my state than the price of energy. I mean, we are a cold weath-
er  climate,  we  are  a  geographically  dispersed  population,  travel 
long  distances,  and  we’re  very—agriculture  is  our  number  one 
economy.  So,  this  is  an  issue  that  we’ve  really  got  to  get  our  arms 
around. 

Now,  you—Dr.  Cooper  suggested  the  margin  requirement  for 
commodity trading among noncommercial traders should be 50 per-
cent higher than the margin requirement for investment in stocks. 
Would  that  balance  the  role  of  speculative  investment  and  produc-
tive investment? 

Dr.  COOPER.  I  base  that  number  on  a—I  did  a  simple  little  dis-
count  question  of  how  much  a  dollar  depreciates  over  10  years 
when it’s put into a long-term asset versus being flipped, year after 
year.  I  did  that  at  the  two  OMB-mandated  discount  rates,  to  sim-
ply  get  an  idea  of  what  it  takes  to  balance  the  attractiveness  of 
that  short-term  ‘‘flip  it  every  year  and  collect  the  returns’’  versus 
‘‘hold it for 10 years and earn a normal return.’’ So, that simply re-
flects  the  time  value  of  money  between  a  1-year  investment  and  a 
10-year  investment.  I  would  encourage  the  Committee  to  look  for 
other  things.  We  used  to  have  a  short-term  capital  gains  tax.  And 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

71 

in a capitalist economy, the single most powerful instrument of di-
recting  investment  is  tax  policy.  That’s  basically  all  you’ve  got  if 
you want to rely on a broad market approach. So, I think that’s an 
important thing to consider so that we rebalance the attractiveness 
of  the  short-term  flipping,  which  is  what’s—became  quite  a  phe-
nomenon  in  the  housing  market  and  long-term  investments.  We 
tell consumers, ‘‘Invest long term.’’ We have to balance this playing 
field  so  that  we  can  get  the  returns  on  the  long-term  investments. 
Senator THUNE. Madam Chair, I know my time’s expired. I’d like 
to  ask  some  more  questions.  Maybe  I  could  submit  those,  if  pos-
sible, for the record. 

But, thank you all very much for your testimony. 
Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Senator Thune. 
Senator Nelson? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Madam  Chairman,  I  have  just  returned  from 
my  state  of  Florida,  having  done  18  town  hall  meetings,  and  I  can 
tell  you  that  people  are  frustrated.  It  doesn’t  make  any  difference 
if you’re in the urban parts of our state or in the rural parts of our 
state, they’re frustrated. That frustration is turning into anger, and 
a lot of it has to do with the price of gas. It is incumbent upon us— 
as I was constantly attacked in these town-hall meetings by people 
that  were  sent  there  by  certain  special  interests  to  say,  ‘‘Well,  the 
solution is just for us to drill more.’’ Well, of course—here’s a chart. 
From  1994  to  2007,  the  red  bars  indicate  the  drilling  permits  that 
were  issued.  The  more  drilling  permits  that  were  issued  in  these 
latter  years  of  2004,  2005,  2006,  and  2007—and  you  can  see  the 
graph—the  price  of  gasoline  keeps  going  higher  and  higher,  which 
would  defy  those  who  want  the  easy  solution  of  ‘‘just  drill  more.’’ 
This is the broken record that I talk about all the time, about going 
to alternative sources of energy, and so forth. 

Now,  I  want  to  ask  these  wonderful  experts  that  we  have  here. 
What  is  the  relationship  between  the  fact  that  the  federal  funds 
rate  has  been  dropping—on  September  15,  federal  funds  rate  was 
at 5.25, and then it’s dropped all the way to 2 percent in 9 months, 
and  yet,  can  you  share  why,  if  you’re  making  easier  money,  is  the 
price of gas—is there a relation between the two? 

Mr. Soros? 
Mr.  SOROS.  It’s  a  very,  very  indirect  relation,  because  the  drop 
in  Fed  funds,  which  reflected  the  slowdown  in  the  economy,  led  to 
a  decline  in  the  value  of  the  dollar,  which  then  reinforced  the  up-
ward pressures on us. So, that would be the connection. It’s an in-
direct connection. 

Senator  NELSON.  All  right,  and  that’s  also,  then,  another  way  of 
saying  that  if  we  want  to  stop  this  indirect  increased  cost  of  oil  as 
a  result  of  the  weakness  of  the  dollar,  ultimately  we’ve  got  to  get 
our economic house in order—— 

Mr. SOROS. Yes. 
Senator NELSON.—and balance the budget. 
All  right.  Mr.  Greenberger,  let  me  ask  you.  Is  the  Dubai  Finan-
cial  Services  Authority—have  they  ever  initiated  an  enforcement 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

72 

action for manipulation in the commodities markets that they regu-
late? 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  In  candor,  I  can’t  answer  that  question,  but 
I  will  tell  you,  as  a  member  of  the  Worldwide  Regulator  Con-
ference,  the  fact  that  Dubai  regulators  would  be  deemed  com-
parable to the United States is laughable. It’s laughable. They may 
have  brought  enforcement  actions,  but,  again,  are  you  going  to  go 
to  Florida  and  tell  your  constituents,  ‘‘Don’t  worry  about  a  thing, 
we’ve got Dubai on the case’’? That’ll make them angry, I think. 

The  second  thing  I  do  want  to  make  clear  is—well,  two  points. 
You know, this Fed funds rate issue is all—we’re not talking about 
it  today,  but  the  subprime  meltdown  is  integrally  involved  in  fur-
ther deregulated instruments, credit default swaps, which, prior to 
this passage of this 2000 act, would have had to be regulated, there 
would  have  been  capital  reserves,  people  would  have  been  looking 
over  people’s  shoulders.  Those  toxic  instruments  are  now  being 
taken, that nobody else will buy, by the United States Federal Re-
serve in exchange for U.S. treasuries. 

And when you say about the weakening of the U.S. economy, the 
United  States—you  and  I  are  holding  those  instruments  as  collat-
eral  for  treasuries  that  are  being  given  to  banks.  And  the  Fed 
funds rate is really a mirage. People are pulling their hair out. The 
true  indication  of  what  interest  rates  are  is  the  London  interbank 
daily  rate,  which  is  basis  point—historically,  basis  points  higher 
than  the  Fed  funds.  Why  is  that?  Because  nobody  believes  that 
they want to lend to these banks, because they are not—you know, 
Bear  Stearns  collapsed,  Lehman  Brothers  is  going  out,  asking  for 
another $300 million. 

So,  what  I’m  saying  to  you  is,  your  job  is  not  just  with  this  en-
ergy  stuff.  The  farm  crisis  points  back  to  this;  the  housing  crisis; 
and if we’re going to put our economy in order, yes, we should bal-
ance the budget; but we can’t let this gambling casino continue and 
see the Bear Stearnses of this world, and other banks who are tee-
tering  on  the  brink  and  need  the  help  of  the  Fed  at  the  discount 
window, and raises serious problems, that’s why our economic situ-
ation  is  held  in  ill  repute,  and  why  the  dollar  is  sinking,  in  my 
view. 

Senator  NELSON.  We  had  a  little  victory,  a  week  and  a  half  ago 
in the farm bill, on creating more oversight in the Commodities Fu-
tures Trading Commission. I take it you don’t think that’s going to 
do much for the price of oil. 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Yes,  because  the  CFTC  has  said  it  does  not 
affect  West  Texas  Intermediate  contracts,  because  those—even 
though  they’re  sold  in  the  United  States  by  United  States-owned 
or  affiliated  entities,  they’re  traded—they’re  controlled  by  London 
and  Dubai,  and  you  cannot  use  the  farm  bill  amendment  to  regu-
late those products. 

And I’ve earlier said, Senator Nelson—I’d be happy to talk to you 
further; you can read my testimony—the farm bill puts the burden 
on  the  public  to  prove  that  there’s  regulation.  The  public  can’t  af-
ford  to  go  through  lengthy  administrative  proceedings  on  a  con-
tract-by-contract basis. The old rule, before Senator Gramm got his 
CFMA  through,  was  that  the  traders  had  to  prove  they  should  be 
deregulated, not that the public had to prove there should be regu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

73 

lation. The CFTC has said that farm bill amendment will affect one 
out of thousands of energy contracts. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you. 
Thank you, Madam Chair. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Greenberger,  I  just  want  to  be—I  want 
to be clear, because there’s something that some people might find 
confusing,  and  that  is,  on  U.S.  products,  we  obviously  believe  that 
if  you’re  selling  U.S.  products,  they  ought  to  be  regulated  in  the 
United  States.  And  when  you  are—as  the  United  States  wants  to 
do,  selling  in  some  other  country,  we  can  do  that,  but  then  we  are 
under the regulations of those markets. Is that correct? 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Well,  it  is  correct,  but  it’s  a  little  more  com-
plicated than that. And, quite frankly, that led to the whole foreign 
board  of  trade  issue.  Some  countries  said,  ‘‘If  you  lightly  regulate 
our  exchanges  coming  into  your  country,  we’ll  lightly  regulate 
yours.’’ But, the fact of the matter is, that is going all in one direc-
tion.  All  the  liquidity  is  in  the  United  States.  It  is  very  important 
that  we  not  just  let  these  Dubai  exchanges  that  have  partnered 
with  our  own  exchanges,  or  ICE,  which  is  in  Atlanta,  Interconti-
nental  Exchange,  be  treated  by  the  United  Kingdom—they’re  rob-
bing us blind. There are no spec limits, there are no position limits, 
there’s  no  large  data  trader  reporting.  That  could  be  stopped  this 
afternoon. 

In  other  words,  the  comity  we  tried  to  create,  and  the  fairness, 
has  been,  in  the  last  7  years,  just  made  into  a  joke,  and  we’ve  lit-
erally  gotten  undressed  in  front  of  the  rest  of  the  world,  and  let 
them do what they will with our gas-paying, oil-paying economy. 

The  final  point  I  want  to  make,  Senator  Cantwell—and  I  don’t 
want the sun to rest before I say this—I agree completely with Mr. 
Soros, and I don’t want to be misunderstood. There are serious sup-
ply  demand  problems  here.  Environment  causes—our  need  to  con-
trol the environment causes some of it. What I am saying is, there’s 
an  unnecessary  premium.  And  when  I  say  things  would  be  easy, 
I  think  we  could  knock  that  premium  out  overnight  if  people  were 
of good faith and brought all this under the kind of regulation that 
this  country  saw  for  78  years,  from  1922  to  2000,  control  specula-
tion. We’ve abandoned that completely. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
I  actually  have  a  question  for  Ms.  Watson,  and  that  is—obvi-
ously,  part  of  the  concern  that’s  been  discussed  here  today  is  how 
the  futures  market  impacts  the  physical  supply,  and  that  was  an 
issue,  as  we  saw  with  both  Enron  and  Amaranth,  as  it  relates  to 
both electricity and natural gas markets. When we gave FERC this 
new authority to stop manipulation, you were able to waive the re-
quired  30-day  notice  and  implement  the  rule  immediately.  Is  that 
correct? 

Ms. WATSON. Yes, it is. 
Senator CANTWELL. And so, you were able to do that, I think, be-

cause—— 

Ms.  WATSON.  We  were  able  to  show  that  we  had  good  cause.  At 
the time, it was in early 2006, and the Katrina—of course, the hur-
ricane  that  hit  in  2005,  we  were  concerned  about  what  might  be 
happening  still,  as  a  result,  on  prices,  and  also,  it  was  in  the  mid-
dle of winter of 2006, so we asked to waive the 30-day time period 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

74 

so  that  we  could  implement  the  anti-manipulation  regulations  im-
mediately. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So,  in  effect,  the  FTC  should  be  able  to  do 
the same thing. I mean, I would assume that they have even more 
history  and  knowledge,  given  what  you’ve  been  able  to  accomplish 
in the electricity and natural gas markets. 

Ms. WATSON. I can’t speak for the FTC, I can only tell you what 

our—what we did. 

Senator CANTWELL. Mr. Greenberger, would you say the FTC has 
a  clear  mandate  to  implement,  and  perhaps  even  to—you  know, 
good  cause  to  implement  an  interim  anti-manipulation  rule,  given 
that it’s such an urgent situation on prices? 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Absolutely,  and  for  several  reasons.  One, 
they’re  being  asked  to  do  in  the  crude  oil  markets  what  FERC  did 
in the natural gas markets. FERC has already set up the template. 
They put out this crazy Advance Notice of Public Rulemaking that 
makes—and  the  American  Petroleum  Institute  came  out  and  said, 
‘‘Gee, you only gave us 30 days notice.’’ Covington & Burling came 
in  and  said,  ‘‘We  need  90  days  to  answer  these  questions,  not  30 
days.’’ Covington & Burling could answer those questions overnight 
if  they—if  it  was  in  their  economic  interest,  I’ll  tell  you  that.  But, 
the—this  procedure  that  the  FTC  has  set  upon  means  there’s  not 
going to be a rule til the early fall. They have the FERC template. 
All  the  questions  they’ve  asked  have  been  answered  by  FERC. 
They don’t need this fancy-dancy academic exercise. 

And  number  two  is  their  good  cause—the  FERC  representative 
talks about Katrina and what was happening in 2006. Senator Nel-
son,  what’s  happening  in  2008?  This  is  a  national  crisis.  There  is 
room  in  the  Administrative  Procedures  Act  for  good  cause,  when 
the public will be harmed by delay, for the agency to move quickly. 
I’ve  put  this  in  my  testimony.  The  FTC,  quite  frankly,  should  be 
kicked in the rear end and get them moving on this thing. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Senator Dorgan? 
Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Greenberger,  are  we  likely  to  expect  the 
current  head  of  the  CFTC  to  address  these  problems  aggressively? 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Well,  he  certainly  tried  to  give  the  appear-
ance of it by his so-called May 29 release. I have my doubts. I think 
Senator  Cantwell  referred  to  this.  Many  of  the  commitments—he’s 
dealing with an Atlanta-based exchange trading U.S. products, and 
he’s  gotten  down  on  his  hands  and  knees  and  said  to  the  British 
and to this exchange, ‘‘Would you please give us the data we need?’’ 
Senator  DORGAN.  Do  you  think  he’s  part  of  the  problem  rather 

than part of the solution? 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  I  most  certainly  do.  I  hate  to  say  that,  be-
cause I like him as a person very much. But, you must recall, he’s 
was  the  Staff  Director  of  the  Committee  that  produced  the  regula-
tion that puts us in the food crisis, energy crisis, and housing crisis 
we’re  in  today.  I  think  he  has  a  vested  interest  in  saying  they  did 
the right thing when they deregulated all these markets. 

Senator  DORGAN.  The  cost  of  ineffective  regulators—the  cost  of 
regulators  who  come  to  government,  not  liking  government,  and 
wanting  not  to  regulate,  is  dramatic.  We’ve  seen  it  in  the  Enron 
scandal,  we’ve  seen  it,  in  my  judgment,  now  with  those  in  a  regu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

75 

latory  capacity  who  are  supposed  to  be  the  referees.  After  all,  a 
free-market system works only if you have referees to call the fouls. 
We have seen now plenty of evidence that those who have come to 
government not believing in the central mission of the agency they 
run have done great damage to our economy. 

Mr.  Soros,  I  have  read  your  most  recent  book,  and,  in  fact,  was 
writing  a  piece,  myself,  on  credit  default  swaps  and  those  kinds  of 
issues  the  other  evening,  and  especially  about  hedge  funds,  gen-
erally.  And  then  I  saw  your  income  last  year.  I  was  going  through 
Alpha magazine. And you did very well last year, $3 billion. That’s 
$250 million a month in income, running a hedge fund. Is that cor-
rect? 

Mr. SOROS. Yes, that is—— 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. SOROS.—that was why—— 
Senator DORGAN. That’s pretty well defined as ‘‘success,’’ I would 

guess. 

tracts? 

I also—is any of that coming from speculative trading in oil con-

Mr. SOROS. No. 
Senator DORGAN. OK. 
Mr. SOROS. No, I’m not a participant in the oil—— 
Senator DORGAN. I did read, recently—and I don’t know whether 
it  was  an  interpretation  of  what  you  said  or  what  you  said—I  did 
read  that  you  were  reported  to  have  said,  ‘‘This  bubble  will  burst, 
the  current  price  of  oil  is  not  destined  to  remain’’—that  this  is  a 
bubble,  and  it  will  burst.  Is  that  an  accurate  reflection  of  what 
you—— 

Mr. SOROS. No, I think it was—— 
Senator DORGAN.—think will happen? 
Mr.  SOROS.  That  was  probably  a  distortion  of  the  testimony 
which I gave today, which is really that there is a bubble element. 
There’s  a  froth.  But,  also  there  are  some  fundamental  factors  be-
hind it. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Yes.  And  I  don’t  think  there’s  disagreement 
about  that.  There  is  the  general  issue  of  energy,  supply  demand, 
you know, 300 million additional Chinese and citizens of India that 
are going to drive vehicles, and they’re going to need to fuel them, 
and  so—so,  I  understand  all  that.  But,  this  issue  today  is  about, 
What  is  the  speculation,  on  top  of  that,  that’s  driven  these  prices 
up? 

Mr.  Greenberger,  I  want  to  ask  you  a  question  that  you  re-
ferred—you referred to this, just briefly. We have been told, ‘‘If you 
increase  the  margin  requirements  for  these  contracts  in  this  coun-
try from 5 to 7 percent, increase those margin requirements some-
where up the line, this will just all migrate and it’ll—all this busi-
ness  is  going  to  migrate.’’  You  say  that’s  total  nonsense.  Describe 
to me why that’s nonsense. 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  Well,  first  of  all,  if  spec  limits  were  in  place, 
some  of  that  business  wouldn’t  be  here,  to  begin  with.  In  other 
words,  as  Mr.  Soros  has  said,  I  believe,  and  as  I’m  saying,  is—we 
have too many speculators, these markets are dysfunctional. For 78 
years,  we  limited  speculation.  So,  it’s  got  to  migrate,  to  bring  the 
markets back into shape. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

76 

But,  second,  Senator,  I  have—will  tell  you,  every  exchange—I 
have this detailed in my testimony—any worldwide exchange worth 
its salt wants U.S. terminals, they want to be in the United States. 
And when they say they’re going to migrate, what they tell you is, 
‘‘Well,  we’re  using  computer  terminals,  but  we’re  going  to  come  up 
with  a  fancy  technology  that  you  don’t  even  know  about.  We’ll  sit 
on  Wall  Street  and  appear  to  trade  in  London  and  Dubai,  and 
therefore, you’ll lose this business.’’ It is a classic proposition of the 
Justice Department, of which I happily served, and the Commodity 
Futures  Trading  Commission,  that  if  you  distort  our  markets  ille-
gally,  wherever  you  are  in  the  world,  we  will  come  after  you  and 
prosecute  you.  Maybe  you’ll  go,  like  Mr.  Vesco,  somewhere  where 
we  can’t  extradite  you,  but  if  you  can  be  extradited,  you’re  going 
to be brought back. So, if these guys, who are sort of sticking it in 
the—their  finger  in  the  face  of  the  American  consumer,  saying, 
‘‘Don’t  regulate  us  or  we’ll  leave  the  country’’—if  they  leave  the 
country, and they do this, an aggressive, effective regulator or pros-
ecutor  will  hunt  them  down  and  bring  them  back.  They  can’t  es-
cape our regulatory mechanism. And I think—— 

Senator DORGAN. But—— 
Mr.  GREENBERGER.—it’s  an  insult  and  disloyal  to  the  United 
States  of  America  to  say,  ‘‘To  help  the  consumer  will  drive  us  to 
go elsewhere and hurt the American economy.’’ 

Senator DORGAN. But, they say they can escape because you can’t 
see  them  and  you  can’t  find  them.  It’s  also  the  case,  isn’t  it,  that, 
at least a sizable American company was one of the founders of the 
Intercontinental Exchange. So, the point is that they say—those of 
us  that  have  said—and  I’ve  been  speaking  on  the  floor  about  this 
a  lot,  about  the  need  to  increase  the  margin  requirement—they 
say,  ‘‘You  do  that,  number  one,  and  you’ll  just  drive  these  folks 
back  into  the  shadows,  and  you  won’t  find  them.’’  You’re  saying 
that that’s—that that cannot, and will not, be the case. 

Mr.  GREENBERGER.  The  founders  of  the  Intercontinental  Ex-
change  were  Goldman  Sachs,  Morgan  Stanley,  and  British  Petro-
leum. Our—what—if—you know, if they go—first of all, those guys 
aren’t  going  to  abandon  their  summer  homes  in  the  Hamptons,  I 
can  assure  you  that;  they’re  going  to  be  here.  They’re  going  to  be 
trading here. If they pick up the phone and call in an order to Lon-
don,  they’re  trading  in  the  United  States,  and  they’re  subject  to 
regulation.  They  will  not,  they  cannot—and  the  further  point  is,  it 
is  an  economic  reality  of  these  markets  that  you  cannot  maximize 
your profits, or, for that matter, even create liquidity, unless you’re 
here  in  the  United  States.  Eighteen  of  these  exchanges  came,  on 
their hands and knees. I had the head of the London International 
Futures Exchange in tears because we weren’t letting him trade in 
the United States fast enough. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  want  to  have  further  conversation  with  you 

at some point this week, if I might, but I—— 

Mr. GREENBERGER. Sure. 
Senator DORGAN. Let me just thank all of the witnesses. I think 

it’s been a good hearing, and I appreciate it. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

77 

Mr.  Soros,  you  talked  about  peak  oil,  and  I  know  that  Senator 
Nelson asked you some questions about drilling. This is something 
people  bring  up  all  the  time  in  my  state  that  maybe  we  can  get 
more drilling going. And there is some more going, say, in Senator 
Dorgan’s  state  of  North  Dakota;  there  are  some  efforts  that  we’re 
supportive  of.  But,  this  idea  that  the  known  oil  reserves  are  being 
depleted,  that  our  country  only  has  2  percent,  I  believe,  of  the  oil 
reserves—you  say  that  the  word  ‘‘peak  oil’’  is  misleading.  Do  you 
want to elaborate on that a little on this line of issues? 

Mr.  SOROS.  Yes.  ‘‘Peak  oil,’’  taken  literally,  means  that  at  some 
point the total volume of production declines. And that may not be 
the  case,  because  if  you  spend  more  money,  you  can  always—not 
always, but you can still increase production. ‘‘Peak oil’’—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. This is like an enhanced—— 
Mr.  SOROS.—is  a  misleading  word.  But,  the  underlying  fact  is 
that  most  of  the  existing  oil  fields  are  now  aging,  and  the  rate  of 
depletion increases as they get older. And you—because of the rise 
in demand and the rise in the price, we now use various techniques 
of  recapturing  more  oil.  That  has  a  tendency  to  sort  of  come  to  a 
certain  sharp  point  where  suddenly  the  oil  field  runs  out.  So,  for 
instance,  in  Mexico  there’s  a  very  large  oil  field  where  the  produc-
tion  has  dropped  by  25  percent  in  1  year.  So,  depletion  is  a  very 
big problem. 

And,  at  the  same  time,  of  course,  you  have  to  go  deeper  and 
deeper in for instance, in Brazil there’s a major new discovery. It’s 
the  most  important  new  oil  field  that  has  been  found  in  many 
years. But, it’s extremely difficult to reach, and it’s going to be very 
expensive to exploit. 

So,  these  are  the  basic  facts.  And  there  is  something  like  ‘‘peak 
oil’’ that is occurring, and when you add to that the very real prob-
lem of global warming, which, could be fatal to our civilization, we 
must  develop  alternative  supplies  of  energy,  other  than  oil,  and 
there  is  no  escape  from  that.  And  probably  cheapest  and  most 
abundant source of alternative energy is coal, but coal is extremely 
polluting.  There  are  ways  of  taking  carbon  out  of  coal;  however, 
that  costs  money.  And  you  don’t,  at  the  present  time,  have  a  price 
on  carbon  that  would  justify  taking  carbon  out  of  coal.  That  is  a 
problem that is confronting us, and we have not dealt with it. And 
that, in my mind, overshadows everything else. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Right. I think one of the things we’re trying 
to  get  at  here  is—you  know,  people  I—talk  about  it  in  Minnesota, 
but  also  that  there’s  money  that’s  going  to  places  that  it  probably 
shouldn’t. But, maybe we can fuel it into what you’re talking about, 
this development of new technology and cleaner coal and solar and 
wind.  And  that’s  what  we’re  trying  to  get  at.  And  we’ve  been,  as 
you  know,  blocked,  time  and  time  again  in  Congress  right  now, 
from doing that. And I just wondered—— 

Mr. SOROS. But, you know—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Go ahead. 
Mr.  SOROS.—it  does  mean  that  the  cost  of  energy  is  going  to  be 
higher. We have to bite the bullet, as far as that is concerned, and 
we have to adjust our way of life. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I  think  that  people  have  gone  beyond 
Jimmy  Carter  with  the  sweater,  gloomy,  saying  that  conservation 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

78 

is  going  to  be  hard.  I  think  that  they  see  this  as  a  huge  economic 
burden to them right now, and they are more interested in looking 
at  whatever  it  is,  mass  transit  or  different  things.  We  just—their 
report came out today, 10 percent increase in mass transit as ways 
of  dealing  with  this.  But,  I  just  wanted  to  get,  quickly,  your  re-
sponse  to  what  Mr.  Greenberger  says,  as  we  get  pushback  on  the 
margin, the ideas of increasing the margin, or also on further clos-
ing  the  Enron  loophole  for  crude  oil  and  the  pushback  that  Mr. 
Greenberger  has  mentioned,  his  company  saying,  ‘‘Oh,  we’re  going 
to  take  our  business  elsewhere  and  it’ll  hurt  your  economy  even 
more.’’ I just wondered how you would respond to that. 

Mr.  SOROS.  Yes.  I  think  that  it  won’t  be  quite  as  easy  as  Mr. 
Greenberger  said  to  regulate  the  unregulated  oil  market,  because 
the oil market is an international market, and trades take place all 
over  the  world.  So,  while  it  may  be  possible  to—and  I  think  the 
American  institutions  that  are,  let’s  say,  now  accumulating  oil  as 
an asset class, could be regulated, and they could be brought under 
regulation,  and  that  would  make  a  very  big  difference.  I  think 
other—actually, bringing hedge funds—many of them not domiciled 
in the United States, many of them not run by people in the United 
States—under  the  same  kind  of  controls  would  be  much  more  dif-
ficult. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
Dr. COOPER. Senator, one observation. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Dr. Cooper? 
Dr.  COOPER.  It  would  be  infinitely  easier  to  convince  the  Amer-
ican people to spend $40 a barrel to address the environmental and 
social  costs  of  energy  consumption  if  we  weren’t  spending  $80  a 
barrel on speculation and the abuse of market power. So, we really 
do have to keep these two things separate. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Right. 
Dr.  COOPER.  I  agree  entirely  that  energy  is—we  really  do  have 
to  recognize  the  social  costs,  but  that  doesn’t  mean  we  should  pay 
the ransom that’s being extracted from us now. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Agreed. 
Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
Senator Nelson, last question. 
Senator  NELSON.  I  agree  about  the  ransom  that  we’re  paying, 
and you all have been wonderful in your presentation here to make 
it  very  clear  about  this  speculation.  But,  at  the  end  of  the  day, 
what  we  have  to  have  is  the  political  will  to  start  weaning  our-
selves  from  dependence  on  oil  and  go  to  the  alternatives.  We  had 
a  wake-up  call  in  the  early  1970s.  We  went  back  to  sleep.  We  had 
a  wake-up  call  in  the  late  1970s.  We  went  back  to  sleep.  We  had 
another  wake-up  call  in  the  late  1980s,  early  1990s,  and  we  went 
back  to  sleep.  Now,  early  in  this  decade  we  had  another  wake-up 
call  that’s  still  continuing,  and  the  question  is,  are  we  going  to  go 
back to sleep? 

The  bottom  line—and  this  is  my  question—isn’t  it  going  to  take 
the  new  President  to  say  that  we’re  going  to  have  the  equivalent 
of an Apollo program, and that we are going to break this depend-
ence on, especially, foreign oil? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

79 

Mr. SOROS. I think, yes. 
Dr. COOPER. If you look at the cost of the climate change legisla-
tion  before—being  considered  by  the  Senate  as  we  speak—I  added 
up the numbers, and it’s almost $5 trillion over about 40 years. So, 
the Senate is now contemplating programs of an immense order of 
magnitude. We’re going to wrangle about how the consumer’s going 
to  bear  that  cost.  But,  the  Congress  has  finally  begun  to  have  this 
debate.  All  of  the  Presidential  candidates  have  said  they  under-
stand that there’s a problem here. So, in fact, we may be—we may 
have wasted a long time, but, you know, the—all the evidence sug-
gests  that  we’re  getting  ready  to  grapple  with  this  really  difficult 
issue. 

Senator NELSON. I’ll end on a good note, Madam Chair. 
You  know,  for  each  of  the  8  years  that  you  and  I  have  been  in 
the Senate, we have tried to increase miles per gallon, and we have 
always  been  defeated  in  the  fleet  average.  We  were  operating  on 
a standard that didn’t mean anything, because it was 25 miles per 
gallon  from  1980s,  but  light  trucks  and  SUVs  were  exempt,  so  it 
didn’t mean anything. Every year, we offered it, and we were beat. 
But,  we  finally  won,  a  modest  increase  of  only  35  miles  per  gallon 
phased  over  the  next  12  years,  to  2020,  but  at  least  we  succeeded 
with  a  modest  increase.  I  hope  that’s  a  foretelling  of  things  to 
come. 

Thank you. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  I  thank  Senator  Nelson  and  all  the 

members for attending hearing. 

And  I  certainly  want  to  thank  the  panel  and—for  their  testi-
mony.  Mr.  Soros,  Mr.  Greenberger,  Mr.  Ramm,  Ms.  Watson,  Dr. 
Cooper, thank you very much for being here. 

We  will  continue  this  discussion.  I  plan  to  continue  to  push  the 
CFTC  on  their  ‘‘no  action’’  letter,  and  certainly  on  the  FTC  in  get-
ting  an  interim  rule  in  place.  But,  we  thank  you  for  illuminating 
this  issue  for  so  many  of  us  in  the  U.S.  Senate,  and  certainly  for 
our constituents. 

This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 12:17 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 
As  we  head  into  the  summer  travel  season,  Americans  are  faced  with  rising  un-
employment rates, fallout from a widespread housing crisis and gas prices exceeding 
$4 per gallon. 

Californians are now paying more for our gas than any other state in the country, 

with the average price of a regular gallon of gasoline topping $4.40 per gallon. 

We  know  there  are  several  factors  contributing  to  the  rise  in  oil  prices  and  gas 
prices  nationwide—increased  demand  for  oil  in  growing  economies  such  as  China 
and India, conflict in oil producing regions that has had a destabilizing effect on the 
market, a weak dollar, and a failed energy policy on the part of our current Admin-
istration  that  has  lacked  the  vision  to  invest  in  renewable  energy  and  other  alter-
natives. 

In addition to these factors, the high price of energy commodities has also contrib-
uted to high oil prices. I am greatly concerned about the impact of market specula-
tion  on  the  price  of  oil.  In  the  past  year,  we  have  witnessed  the  price  of  oil  nearly 
double and analysts now predict the price of a barrel of oil could reach $150 by the 
Fourth of July holiday. 

In  Congress,  I  have  joined  with  my  colleagues  to  call  on  the  President  to  cease 
filling the Strategic Petroleum Reserve and supported the inclusion of provisions in 
the Energy Independence Security Act (EISA) to give the Federal Trade Commission 
authority to prohibit market manipulation and the reporting of false information in 
wholesale petroleum markets. 

I  also  believe  the  Commodities  Futures  Trading  Commission  (CFTC)  needs  to  be 
given  the  authority  once  again  to  regulate  energy  futures  contracts  to  prevent  the 
rampant trading that has driven the price of oil well beyond normal supply and de-
mand costs. 

I  look  forward  to  working  the  Members  of  this  Committee  on  this  and  other  pos-

sible solutions to try to address the growing energy crisis. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

PREPARED STATEMENT INTERCONTINENTALEXCHANGE, INC. (ICE) 

AND ICE FUTURES EUROPE 

IntercontinentalExchange, Inc. (ICE) and ICE Futures Europe are pleased to pro-
vide  a  statement  in  response  to  testimony  provided  at  the  June  3,  2008  Senate 
Hearing  held  by  the  Committee  on  Commerce  Science  and  Transportation.  ICE 
strives  to  demonstrate  leadership  in  supporting  efforts  of  both  the  U.S.  Commodity 
Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) and Congress further enhancing market trans-
parency.  Over  the  past  decade  we  have  taken  efforts  to  consciously  build  our  mar-
ketplace  on  the  cornerstones  of  integrity,  transparency  and  neutrality.  To  do  other-
wise  would  be  unworkable  both  from  a  customer  acceptance  and  a  regulatory  per-
spective. ICE has been instrumental in developing a number of transparency initia-
tives from which the industry has benefited in the past several years. Today we op-
erate a global marketplace that includes three fully regulated futures exchanges and 
a  transparent  over-the-counter  (OTC)  market,  which  will  soon  be  regulated  accord-
ing to commodity trading provisions in the 2008 Farm Bill. 

As a member of the financial services community and a close observer of the glob-
al energy market, ICE would like to respond to certain misconceptions regarding our 
business  and  markets  and  issues  related  to  this  hearing.  In  particular,  there  has 
been  significant  interest  in  Congress  with  the  ICE  Futures  Europe  listing  of  its 
cash-settled West Texas Intermediate (WTI) crude oil contract. 

ICE purchased the International Petroleum Exchange (IPE) in 2001. This has re-
mained  a  U.K.-based  exchange,  now  called  ICE  Futures  Europe,  and  is  fully  regu-
lated by the Financial Services Authority (FSA). The FSA has a wide range of rule- 
making,  investigatory  and  enforcement  powers  and  strives  to  meet  four  statutory 
objectives: 

(81) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

82 

• maintaining confidence in the financial system; 
• promoting public understanding of the financial system; 
• securing the appropriate degree of protection for consumers; and 
• reducing  the  extent  to  which  it  is  possible  for  a  business  to  be  used  for  a  pur-

pose connected with financial crime. 

Since  the  WTI  contract’s  inception,  ICE  has  taken  proactive  measures  to  ensure 
that  the  FSA  and  CFTC,  have  had  adequate  data  to  monitor  ICE’s  markets  across 
borders. A primary focus of the FSA is on cooperating with overseas regulators, both 
to  agree  on  international  standards  and  to  monitor  global  firms  and  markets  effec-
tively.  In  2006  the  information  sharing  agreement  between  the  CFTC  and  the  FSA 
with regard to ICE’s markets was re-examined and reaffirmed. 

This  cooperation  has  now  been  enhanced  through  the  information  sharing  agree-
ment between the CFTC and the U.K. Financial Services Authority (FSA) that was 
announced  on  May  29,  2008.  In  modifying  the  existing  memorandum  of  under-
standing  between  the  CFTC  and  the  FSA,  ICE  Futures  Europe  is  the  only  oil  fu-
tures  exchange  globally  that  reports  information  to  both  the  CFTC  and  FSA.  As  a 
result  of  the  agreement,  ICE  provides  equal  or  greater  disclosure  for  its  markets 
than  U.S.-based  exchanges.  Specifically,  ICE  has  agreed  to  undertake,  or  develop 
the means to undertake, the following immediately: 

1. Provide daily large-trader positions to the CFTC in all U.S. futures contracts, 
including the West Texas Intermediate (WTI) crude oil contract; 
2. Extend the data currently provided to cover all contract months; 
3.  Provide  trader  information  to  ensure  detailed  identification  of  market  end- 
users; 
4.  Provide  data  formatting  so  trading  information  can  be  seamlessly  integrated 
into the CFTC’s existing surveillance system; and 
5.  In  addition  to  the  existing  position  management  program  that  FSA  requires 
of ICE Futures Europe today, ICE Futures Europe will monitor positions to de-
tect  those  that  exceed  the  same  accountability  limits  as  employed  by  U.S.  con-
tract  markets  in  its  U.S.  products  and  to  give  timely  notification  to  the  CFTC 
when that occurs. 

ICE Futures Europe has a well-established position monitoring regime that is rig-
orously  enforced  both  at  the  exchange  level  and  by  the  FSA.  The  FSA  can  and  will 
require positions to be reduced if deemed necessary. Added to this, the market sur-
veillance  staff  at  ICE  Futures  Europe  performs  comprehensive  monitoring  in  real- 
time  across  all  of  its  markets  and  will  notify  the  CFTC  if  speculative  position  ac-
countability  limits  are  exceeded  in  the  WTI  contract.  In  essence,  all  U.S.  contracts, 
including WTI, offered in our markets are now monitored by two regulators. 

We  would  also  like  to  highlight  what  we  believe  are  some  misperceptions  about 
the  products  that  actually  trade  on  our  exchange.  The  futures  products  traded  at 
ICE Futures Europe and governed by the aforementioned regulatory regime include: 
Brent Crude oil, West Texas Intermediate (WTI) Crude oil, Gas Oil, Heating Oil and 
Emissions, as well as several other U.K. or Europe-specific gas and power offerings. 
It is important to make the distinction that ICE’s OTC markets which were the sub-
ject  of  provisions  in  the  2008  Farm  Bill  have  less  than  1  percent  market  share  in 
both  the  physically-delivered  OTC  markets  and  in  the  cash-settled  ‘‘swaps’’  market 
for  coal,  crude  oil,  U.S.  gasoline,  heating  oil,  and  diesel  fuel.  Further,  we  maintain 
an  approximately  25  percent  market  share  for  WTI  Crude  oil,  with  the  majority  of 
this  volume  coning  from  U.K.-based  trading.  The  vast  majority  of  WTI  trading  vol-
ume  occurs  on  NYMEX.  Importantly,  the  price  of  U.S.  gasoline  and  heating  oil  is 
discovered  on  NYMEX,  and  not  on  our  exchange,  where  our  market  share  in  these 
products is less than 1 percent of total contract volume. 

While  there  has  been  significant  focus  recently  on  the  price  of  oil  and  related 
products,  it  is  important  to  note  that  prices  for  all  commodities,  such  as  corn,  soy-
beans,  precious  metals  and  wheat,  have  surged  at  the  same  rate  as  crude  oil,  and 
in  some  cases  more  sharply  and  with  greater  volatility.  It  should  be  noted  that  in 
most of these commodity products, except in crude oil, where ICE and NYMEX have 
coexisted for more than 25 years, there are no major overseas markets offering com-
modity contracts to U.S. markets. These facts indicate that the existence of overseas 
markets cannot bear the blame when it comes to higher prices. While it is tempting 
to  criticize  the  markets  who  deliver  pricing  signals,  economists  continue  to  agree 
that  the  primary  driver  of  commodity  prices  across  the  board  is  a  well-documented 
expansion in demand for the building blocks of emerging economies. 

Finally,  we  would  like  to  point  out  that  the  issue  of  foreign  boards  of  trade  and 
the  no-action  process  was  fully  and  carefully  evaluated  by  the  CFTC  at  the  end  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

83 

2006  and  information  sharing  protocols  were  established  to  provide  U.S.  regulators 
with the very information certain Congressional representatives say they need to do 
their job. Both ICE and NYMEX operate liquid, transparent futures exchanges that 
serve the important function of price discovery for the world’s oil markets. Onerous 
or selectively applied regulation could easily lead oil market participants to conduct 
their business off-exchange in the opaque, voice-brokered markets. This would truly 
represent a shift to ‘‘dark markets’’. 

JOINT ANALYSIS PREPARED BY MAJORITY AND MINORITY STAFFS OF THE SENATE 
PERMANENT SUBCOMMITTEE ON INVESTIGATIONS,  COMMITTEE ON HOMELAND 
SECURITY AND GOVERNMENTAL AFFAIRS OF MICHAEL GREENBERGER’S TESTIMONY 
BEFORE SENATE COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND TRANSPORTATION ON 
JUNE 3, 2008 

June 24, 2008 

Because  many  questions  have  been  directed  to  the  Senate  Permanent  Sub-
committee  on  Investigations  (PSI)  about  the  written  and  oral  testimony  of  Michael 
Greenberger  before  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science  and  Transpor-
tation on June 3, 2008, we have prepared this analysis of the major issues he raised 
involving:  (1)  the  recently  enacted  law  to  close  the  ‘‘Enron  loophole,’’  and  (2)  recent 
legislative  proposals  and  administrative  actions  taken  to  strengthen  U.S.  oversight 
of futures contracts traded from within the United States on a foreign exchange. 

The identified statements are excerpted from Mr. Greenberger’s oral testimony or, 

where a page number is provided, from his prepared statement. 
Issues Related to Closing the Enron Loophole 

1.  STATEMENT:  ‘‘[The  legislation  to  close  the  Enron  loophole]. . .is  the  biggest  joke 

pealed.’’ 

in the world because it was written by the exchange that needs to be regulated.’’ 

STATEMENT (p. 3): ‘‘Virtually all parties now agree the Enron loophole must be re-

RESPONSE:  The  legislation  to  close  the  Enron  loophole  was  written  by  the  U.S. 
Congress,  not  the  Intercontinental  Exchange.  Closing  the  Enron  loophole  has  been 
the  subject  of  repeated  bills  introduced  on  this  subject  since  2002.  In  the  fall  of 
2007, following a PSI report and hearings on excessive speculation and the resulting 
move in Congress toward legislative reforms, the Commodity Futures Trading Com-
mission  (CFTC)  and  the  President’s  Working  Group  (consisting  of  the  Departments 
of Treasury, the Federal Reserve, the Securities and Exchange Commission, and the 
CFTC)  submitted  to  Congress  draft  legislation  to  close  the  Enron  loophole.  That 
draft underwent significant revision during the legislative process, including numer-
ous significant changes proposed by Senators Levin, Feinstein, Snowe, Coleman and 
others.  The  final  language  was  the  product  of  extensive  bipartisan  negotiations  in 
both  Houses  of  Congress  and  a  conference  committee  led  by  the  House  and  Senate 
Agriculture  Committees.  Throughout  the  legislative  process  ICE  expressed  numer-
ous disagreements with many of the provisions in the various drafts of this legisla-
tion.  The  final  legislation  did  not  include  many  of  the  provisions  that  ICE  had 
sought. 

The  compromise  legislation  finally  enacted  into  law  as  part  of  the  Farm  Bill  en-
joyed  strong  bipartisan  support  from  Members  in  both  Houses  and  from  many  en-
ergy, agricultural, consumer, and industrial organizations.  1 We are unaware of any 
consensus  to  alter  this  legislation,  which  represents  a  bipartisan  achievement  after 
years of work. 

2. STATEMENT: ‘‘The End the Enron Loophole, because it was written by the Inter-
continental  Exchange,  handed  to  the  CFTC  and  then  handed  to  Congress,  does  not 
deal with crude oil.’’ 

STATEMENT (p. 4): ‘‘Thus, by CFTC pronouncement, crude oil, gasoline and heating 

oil futures will not be covered by the new legislation.’’ 

1 This  legislation  was  supported  by  the  American  Public  Gas  Association,  American  Public 
Power Association, Consumer Federation of America, Environmental Defense, Industrial Energy 
Consumers  of  America,  Independent  Oil  Marketers  Association  of  New  England,  Mid-Atlantic 
Petroleum Distributor’s Association, National Association of Convenience Stores, National Asso-
ciation of Truck Stop Operators, National Association of Wheat Growers, National Barley Grow-
ers  Association,  National  Farmers  Union,  National  Grange,  National  Rural  Electrical  Coopera-
tive  Association,  New  England  Fuel  Institute,  Pacific  Northwest  Oilheat  Council,  Petroleum 
Marketers  Association  of  America,  Petroleum  Transportation  and  Storage  Association,  Public 
Citizen,  Society  of  Independent  Gasoline  Marketers  of  America,  Steel  Manufacturers  Associa-
tion, and Western Petroleum Marketers Association. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

84 

RESPONSE:  These  statements  are  incorrect  or  may  leave  an  incorrect  impression. 
The  law  enacted  by  Congress  to  close  the  Enron  loophole  regulates  the  electronic 
trading  of  all  types  of  energy  and  metal  commodities  on  Exempt  Commercial  Mar-
kets without exception, including crude oil, gasoline, and heating oil, if the relevant 
contracts  perform  a  significant  price  discovery  function.  The  CFTC  has  not  made 
any statements or decisions to exempt any class of commodities or energy contracts 
from  CFTC  oversight  under  the  new  law.  At  the  same  time,  as  a  practical  matter, 
the  new  law  will  not  affect  current  trading  of  U.S.  crude  oil,  gasoline,  and  heating 
oil  futures  contracts—not  because  of  who  drafted  the  law  or  because  of  any  gaps 
in  the  legislation—but  because  futures  contracts  in  those  commodities  are  not  cur-
rently being traded on U.S. Exempt Commercial Markets. Rather, futures contracts 
in  these  commodities  are  being  traded  on  futures  exchanges  in  the  United  States 
and United Kingdom. Should any of those energy commodities ever be traded on Ex-
empt  Commercial  Markets,  the  new  law  makes  it  clear  that  the  CFTC  will  be  able 
to  exercise  oversight  over  them.  As  a  result  of  the  legislation  to  close  the  Enron 
loophole, traders will no longer have the opportunity to trade crude oil, gasoline, or 
home heating oil on U.S. electronic markets without CFTC oversight. 

3.  STATEMENT (p.  4):  ‘‘. . .  the  Farm  Bill  amendment  requires  the  CFTC  and  the 
public  to  prove  on  a  case-by-case  basis  through  lengthy  administrative  proceedings 
that  an  individual  energy  contract  should  be  regulated  if  the  CFTC  can  prove  that 
contract ‘serve[s] a significant price discovery function’ in order to detect and prevent 
manipulation.’’ 

STATEMENT:  ‘‘[The  legislation  to  close  the  Enron  loophole]  puts  1,000  burdens  on 

the CFTC and the public to prove that there needs to be regulation.’’ 

STATEMENT:  ‘‘[The  CFTC]  has  to  go  through  complicated  administrative  hearings, 
which I can tell you will be challenged vigorously by people who can afford to make 
those  challenges,  and  will  have  to  prove  by  substantial  evidence  that  that  contract 
will be regulated.’’ 

STATEMENT (p.  4):  ‘‘It  will  doubtless  be  followed  by  lengthy  and  costly  judicial 
challenges  during  which  the  CFTC  and  energy  consuming  public  will  be  required 
to show that its difficult burden has not been met.’’ 

RESPONSE:  These  statements  are  incorrect.  The  new  law  does  not  place  any  bur-
den  on  the  public,  does  not  require  extensive  administrative  proceedings  to  deter-
mine  that  a  contract  performs  a  significant  price  discovery  function  and  is  subject 
to CFTC oversight, and does not authorize judicial challenges to CFTC decisions in 
this area. To the contrary, the law explicitly gives the CFTC the ‘‘discretion’’ to de-
termine  which  contracts  perform  significant  price  discovery  functions  and  are  sub-
ject to CFTC oversight. The statute and legislative history make it clear that formal 
administrative  proceedings  are  not  required  and  judicial  challenges  are  not  per-
mitted.  For  example,  during  the  Senate’s  consideration  of  the  legislation,  Senator 
Levin explained: 

The  legislation  also  states  clearly  that  a  CFTC  determination  that  a  contract 
performs a significant price discovery function is a determination that is within 
the Commission’s discretion; this determination is not intended to be subject to 
formal challenge through administrative proceedings.’’ 
The Statement of Managers in the Conference Report states: 
‘‘The  Managers  do  not  intend  that  the  Commission  conduct  an  exhaustive  an-
nual examination of every contract traded on an electronic trading facility pur-
suant to the section 2(h)(3) exemption, but instead to concentrate on those con-
tracts that are most likely to meet the criteria for performing a significant price 
discovery function. 

The law directs the CFTC to determine which contracts are performing significant 
price  discovery  functions  within  180  days  of  promulgating  regulations  setting  forth 
the criteria to be considered when evaluating individual contracts. 

4. STATEMENT: ‘‘The CFTC has said that farm bill amendment [sic] will affect one 

out of thousands of energy contracts.’’ 

STATEMENT (p. 4): ‘‘This contract-by-contract process will take months, if not years, 

to complete and it will then only apply to a single contract.’’ 

RESPONSE:  These  statements  are  incorrect.  The  CFTC  has  not  made  any  state-
ments  or  provided  any  indication  of  the  number  of  commodities  or  contracts  that 
will  likely  be  determined  to  perform  a  significant  price  discovery  function.  The 
CFTC certainly has not indicated that only one contract will be covered. To the con-
trary,  informed  observers  indicate  multiple  contracts  are  likely  to  qualify  for  CFTC 
oversight. 

5. STATEMENT (p. 4): ‘‘Moreover, the Farm Bill’s attempt to end the Enron Loophole 
will  doubtless  lead  to  further  regulatory  arbitrage.  If  the  CFTC  should  be  able  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

85 

prove  that  an  individual  energy  futures  contract  has  contract  has  [sic]  a  ‘significant 
price  discovery  function,’  and  thus  should  be  subject  to  regulation,  traders  will  al-
most certainly simply move their trading to equivalent contracts that remain exempt 
from regulation.’’ 

RESPONSE: Mr. Greenberger appears to be predicting that if the CFTC determines 
that  one  particular  contract  performs  a  significant  price  discovery  function,  then 
traders  will  begin  trading  a  different  contract  that  hasn’t  been  deemed  to  perform 
a  significant  price  discovery  function  and  isn’t  subject  to  CFTC  oversight.  Practical 
obstacles  and  the  design  of  the  new  law,  however,  make  this  type  of  maneuvering 
unlikely. 

First, it is much more difficult for a trader to use a contract that does not perform 
a  price  discovery  function  since,  by  definition,  it  will  have  a  lower  trading  volume 
and  fewer  counterparties.  During  the  PSI  Amaranth  investigation,  numerous  trad-
ers  told  the  Subcommittee  that  the  most  significant  factors  in  determining  which 
market  and  contract  to  use  for  trading  were  price  and  liquidity.  All  of  the  traders 
interviewed  by  the  Subcommittee  stated  that  they  would  trade  the  contract  that 
provided  the  best  price  and  most  liquidity,  regardless  of  whether  it  was  in  a  regu-
lated or unregulated market. Second, if a significant amount of trading did migrate 
from a regulated contract to an unregulated contract simply to avoid regulation, the 
CFTC could readily determine that the second contract also performed a significant 
price  discovery  function  and  regain  its  ability  to  exercise  oversight.  In  fact,  one  of 
the statutory factors for determining whether a contract performs a significant price 
discovery  function  is  whether  that  contract  is  being  used  for  arbitraging  purposes. 
The  new  law  thus  contains  provisions  designed  to  prevent  exactly  the  type  of  arbi-
trage scenario Mr. Greenberger describes. 

6.  STATEMENT:  ‘‘I  would  go  back  to  the  status  quo  ante  before  the  Enron  loophole 

was passed.’’ 

STATEMENT (p.  5):  ‘‘Again,  the  easiest  course  to  end  the  Enron  loophole  was  not 
chosen  as  part  of  the  Farm  Bill.  The  most  effective  closure  would  have  simply  re-
turned  the  Commodity  Exchange  Act  to  the  status  quo  ante  prior  to  the  passage  of 
the Enron loophole.’’ 

STATEMENT (p.  3):  ‘‘The  simplest  way  to  repeal  [the  Enron  loophole]  would  be  to 
add  two  words  to  the  Act’s  definition  of  ‘exempt  commodity’  so  it  reads:  an  exempt 
commodity  does  ‘not  include  an  agriculture  or  energy  commodity;’  and  two  words  to 
7  U.S.C.  § 7(e)  to  make  clear  that  ‘agricultural  and  energy  commodities  must  trade 
on regulated markets.’ ’’ 

RESPONSE:  Mr.  Greenberger  seems  to  be  proposing  a  return  to  the  legal  frame-
work  for  commodity  trading  prior  to  enactment  of  the  Commodity  Futures  Mod-
ernization Act (CFMA) of 2000, and to require energy and metal commodities to be 
traded  in  the  same  way  as  agricultural  commodities,  which  means  they  could  not 
be  traded  on  electronic  exchanges  other  than  a  futures  exchange.  This  approach 
would prohibit energy traders from trading financially settled swap instruments on 
electronic exchanges that are not futures exchanges, even though under the legisla-
tion the trading of significant price discovery contracts on these electronic exchanges 
will  be  regulated  just  like  futures  contracts.  At  the  same  time,  the  proposal  would 
continue  to  permit  those  traders  to  trade  these  swap  instruments  amongst  them-
selves by unregulated non-electronic means, such as through voice brokers, large fi-
nancial institutions that operate as swap ‘‘dealers,’’ and directly between each other 
using telephones and fax machines. 

One  of  the  problems  with  this  approach  is  that  it  would  re-direct  trading  from 
electronic exchanges that promote price transparency and cleared trades, two mech-
anisms  that  increase  market  efficiency  and  stability,  toward  greater  use  of  unregu-
lated,  non-transparent,  and  non-cleared  trading  of  swaps  that  impair  price  trans-
parency, increase systemic risk, and make it harder to detect and prevent manipula-
tion. It is partly because financially settled swaps do not require the physical deliv-
ery  of  a  commodity,  and  partly  because  of  the  historic  inability  of  the  futures  ex-
changes to develop active markets for more specialized types of financial and energy 
swaps,  that  Congress  has  never  required  them  to  be  traded  on  fully  regulated  fu-
tures  exchanges.  To  do  so  now  would  constitute  a  major  change  in  U.S.  commodity 
law,  and  would  go  much  further  than  the  status  quo  ante  prior  to  the  CFMA.  In 
addition, eliminating electronic exchanges open to large traders would dismantle an 
accepted  commodity  market  mechanism—the  significant  portions  of  which  are  now 
regulated—for little apparent regulatory gain. 

7.  STATEMENT: 

‘‘Prior  to  the  [Enron  loophole],  every  futures  contract—oil, 
collateralized  debt  obligations,  credit  default  swaps—had  to  be  traded  pursuant  to 
regulation that had age-old and time-tested controls on speculation.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

86 

(CFMA), 

RESPONSE:  This  statement  is  incorrect.  Prior  to  the  Commodity  Futures  Mod-
ernization  Act 
like 
collateralized debt obligations, credit default swaps, and energy swaps were eligible 
for the hybrid and swaps exemption from the requirement that all futures contracts 
be  traded  on  a  regulated  futures  exchange.  See,  e.g.,  17  C.F.R.  Part  35  (Exemption 
of Swap Agreements). Persons trading swaps under the various preCFMA swaps ex-
emptions were not subject to speculative position limits. 

instruments 

trading 

financial 

large 

traders 

8.  STATEMENT:  ‘‘Overnight,  [prohibiting  the  trading  of  energy  commodities  in  Ex-
empt  Commercial  Markets]  will  bring  down  the  price  of  crude  oil,  I  believe,  by  25 
percent.’’ 

RESPONSE:  According  to  recent  market  data,  there  is  little  to  no  trading  of  crude 
oil  contracts  on  exempt  commercial  markets  in  the  United  States.  Prohibiting  the 
trading  of  energy  commodities  in  a  market  in  which  no  trading  is  currently  taking 
place  is,  thus,  unlikely  to  have  an  effect  on  the  price  of  crude  oil.  Moreover,  al-
though  there  have  never  been  any  Exempt  Commercial  Markets  for  agricultural 
commodities,  many  agricultural  commodities  have  recently  experienced  substantial 
price  spikes.  There  is  no  credible  evidence  that  simply  amending  the  CEA  to  regu-
late energy commodities as if they were agricultural commodities will lead to lower 
energy prices. 
Issues Related to Closing the London Loophole 

9.  STATEMENT:  ‘‘[B]ecause  of  that  Enron  loophole,  which  I  believe  has  not  been 
closed for crude oil, there are no speculation limits in these markets that are unregu-
lated.’’ 

RESPONSE: The Enron loophole has been closed for all energy and metal commod-
ities,  including  crude  oil  traded  on  Exempt  Commercial  Markets  in  the  United 
States. But currently, crude oil is not being traded on those markets. 

Crude  oil  is  instead  being  traded  on  the  NYMEX  exchange  in  New  York,  which 
has speculative position limits, and on the ICE Futures Europe exchange in London, 
which  does  not.  The  ICE  Futures  Europe  exchange  in  London  has  no  speculative 
position limits, because until recently neither the British Financial Services Author-
ity  (FSA)  nor  ICE  Futures  Europe  had  imposed  them  for  U.S.  crude  oil  contracts 
traded on that exchange. 

Since  1982,  Section  4  of  the  Commodity  Exchange  Act  has  authorized  U.S.  per-
sons to trade on foreign exchanges and has prohibited the CFTC from imposing reg-
ulatory  requirements  upon  those  foreign  exchanges.  Recently,  this  CEA  exemption 
has  been  referred  to  as  the  London  loophole,  since  it  allows  U.S.  traders  to  trade 
on  the  ICE  exchange  in  London  without  CFTC  oversight  and  without  speculative 
position limits. On June 16, 2008, in response to concerns expressed about the Lon-
don  loophole,  the  CFTC  announced  that  ICE  Futures  Europe  would  have  to  imple-
ment speculative position limits in order to be able to continue to offer U.S. traders 
the  option  of  trading  its  U.S.  crude  oil  contract  through  U.S.-based  trading  termi-
nals.  The  CFTC  is  also  working  with  the  FSA  on  an  agreement  to  impose  specula-
tive position limits on this contract and to alert the CFTC when any trader has ex-
ceeded those limits. 

10.  STATEMENT:  ‘‘There  is  now  nothing  in  the  law  that  sanctions  foreign  board  of 
trades  in  the  United  States  trading  U.S.  products  being  able  to  escape  regulation. 
. . .  What  is  now  in  my  belief,  illegal,  and  will  soon,  if  somebody  wakes  up,  be  in-
validated by either a private individual being hurt by it or a state attorney general.’’ 
STATEMENT (p.  5):  ‘‘These  staff  no  action  letters  have  been  referred  to  as  Foreign 
Board of Trade exemptions (FBOTs)—a term which as of today is nowhere found in 
the CEA.’’ 

STATEMENT (p.  12):  ‘‘[T]here  is  no  statute  to  date  that  provides  any  exemption  for 
U.S.  trading  on  Foreign  Boards  of  Trade.  The  Commodity  Exchange  Act  says  noth-
ing about Foreign Boards of Trade.’’ 

RESPONSE:  These  statements  are  incorrect.  The  Commodity  Exchange  Act  (CEA) 
explicitly  excludes  trading  on  a  foreign  board  of  trade  from  key  CFTC  regulations. 
Section  4(a)  of  the  CEA  explicitly  exempts  from  the  requirement  that  all  futures 
contracts  be  traded  on  a  CFTC-regulated  futures  exchange  contracts  traded  on  or 
subject  to  the  rules  of  any  board  of  trade  or  exchange  ‘‘located  outside  the  United 
States.’’  Section  4(b)  prohibits  the  CFTC  from  issuing  any  regulation  that  approves 
or ‘‘governs in any way any rule or contract, rule, regulation, or action of any foreign 
board of trade.’’ 

11.  STATEMENT (p.  5):  ‘‘It  has  been  a  fundamental  tenet,  recognized  by  exchanges 
all  over  the  world,  that  if  the  trading  of  futures  contracts  takes  place  within  the 
United  States,  that  trading,  unless  otherwise  exempted  or  excluded  by  the  Act  itself 
or  by  the  CFTC  through  an  exemption  granted  pursuant  to  the  Futures  Trading 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

87 

Practices  Act  of  1992  (otherwise  referred  to  as  section  4(c))  ,is  subject  to  the  regu-
latory  jurisdiction  of  the  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission.  Recognition  of 
that sweeping reach of U.S. jurisdiction is evidenced by the fact that most major for-
eign  futures  exchanges  have  asked  the  CFTC  for  an  exemption  from  the  full  regu-
latory requirements of the Commodity Exchange Act (CEA) to which they might oth-
erwise  be  subject  in  order  to  allow  those  foreign  entities  to  conduct  trading  in  the 
U.S.  on  U.S.-based  terminals  of  foreign  delivered  futures  contracts.  That  exemption, 
premised  on  section  4(c),  has  been  issued  to  many  foreign  exchanges  through  staff 
no action letters, which permit trading on a foreign exchange’s U.S.-based terminals 
without that exchange being subject to U.S. statutory or regulatory requirements.’’ 

RESPONSE: These statements mischaracterize the statutory and legal basis for the 
CFTC’s  determination  to  permit  foreign  exchanges  to  operate  trading  terminals  in 
the  United  States  without  being  subject  to  full  CFTC  regulation  as  a  futures  ex-
change.  The  basis  for  the  CFTC’s  determination  to  grant  a  foreign  board  of  trade 
or exchange permission to operate trading terminals in the U.S. without being sub-
ject  to  the  full  regulatory  requirements  applicable  to  U.S.  futures  exchanges  is  not 
Section  4(c)  of  the  CEA  or  Futures  Trading  Practices  Act,  but  rather  CEA  Section 
4(a).  Section  4(a)  provides  that  all  futures  contracts  traded  in  the  United  States 
must  be  traded  on  a  regulated  exchange  other  than  contracts  traded  on  or  subject 
to  the  rules  of  a  board  of  trade  or  exchange  located  outside  the  United  States.  7 
U.S.C.  § 6(a).  Futures  contracts  traded  from  within  the  United  States  on  a  foreign 
exchange are, thus, excluded by statute from the requirement that futures contracts 
traded in the United States be traded on a futures exchange regulated by the CFTC. 
12. STATEMENT (p. 6): ‘‘This exemption was entirely the creation of CFTC staff and 

it has never been formally approved by the Commission itself.’’ 

RESPONSE: This statement is incorrect. The decision to allow foreign exchanges to 
establish trading terminals in the United States and to permit trading on those ter-
minals  outside  of  CFTC  oversight  was  formally  approved  by  the  CFTC  in  a  Policy 
Statement issued on November 2, 2006. The 2006 Policy Statement was issued after 
a process in which the CFTC sought public comment, received written comment let-
ters,  and  held  a  public  hearing  on  the  issues  raised.  In  the  Policy  Statement,  the 
CFTC wrote: 

‘‘The  Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission  is  issuing  a  Statement  of  Policy 
that  affirms  the  use  of  the  no-action  process  to  permit  foreign  boards  of  trade 
to  provide  direct  access  to  their  electronic  trading  systems  to  U.S.  members  or 
authorized  participants,  and  provides  additional  guidance  and  procedural  en-
hancements.’’ 2 

13. STATEMENT (p. 6): ‘‘The staff FBOT no action letter process never contemplated 
that  an  exchange  owned  by  or  affiliated  with  a  U.S.  entity  would  escape  the  CFTC 
regulation imposed on traditional U.S. exchanges.’’ 

RESPONSE:  This  statement  is  incorrect.  In  its  2006  Policy  Statement,  the  CFTC 
determined  it  would  not  be  appropriate  to  use  any  ‘‘bright-line’’  test  based  on  the 
location  of  an  affiliate  or  related  corporate  entity  to  determine  whether  to  treat  an 
entity as a U.S. or foreign exchange. Instead, the CFTC adopted a flexible approach 
that  considered  the  totality  of  circumstances  for  determining  whether  an  exchange 
was  foreign  or  domestic,  including  whether  the  exchange  was  affiliated  with  a  U.S. 
exchange. This approach was favored by most of the comments received by the Com-
mission on this issue. 

14. STATEMENT (p. 3): ‘‘For purposes of facilitating exempt natural gas futures, ICE 
is deemed a U.S. ‘exempt commercial market’ under the Enron loophole. For purposes 
of  its  facilitating  U.S.  WTI  crude  oil  futures,  the  CFTC,  by  informal  staff  action, 
deems ICE to be a U.K. entity not subject to direct CFTC regulation even though ICE 
maintains  U.S.  headquarters  and  trading  infrastructure,  facilitating,  inter  alia,  at 
30 percent of trades in U.S. WTI futures.’’ 

RESPONSE: The statement gives the inaccurate impression that a single legal enti-
ty  named  ‘‘ICE’’  operates  two  exchanges,  one  in  the  United  States  and  one  in  Lon-
don, and is being treated differently depending upon which exchange is at issue. In 
fact, the legal entities that operate these two exchanges are different. 

The  legal  entity  that  operates  the  electronic  exchange  within  the  United  States 
is  the  Intercontinental  Exchange  (‘‘ICE’’).  ICE  is  a  Delaware  corporation  located  in 
Atlanta, Georgia. ICE pays U.S. taxes, uses U.S. employees, and operates an exempt 

2 Commodity  Futures  Trading  Commission,  Policy  Statement,  Boards  of  Trade  Located  Out-
side  of  the  United  States  and  No-Action  Relief  From  the  Requirement  To  Become  a  Designated 
Contract  Market  or  Derivatives  Transaction  Execution  Facility,  71  Fed.  Reg.  64443  (Nov.  2, 
2006). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

88 

commercial market in the United States that, among other commodities, trades nat-
ural gas contracts. 

ICE  has  several  wholly-owned  subsidiaries  that  operate  regulated  futures  ex-
changes—ICE  Futures  US,  ICE  Futures  Canada,  and  ICE  Futures  Europe.  Each 
subsidiary  has  its  own  management  and  an  independent  board  of  directors.  Each 
exchange  is  overseen  by  the  regulatory  authority  of  the  country  in  which  the  ex-
change  is  physically  located.  The  regulatory  authority  oversees  the  exchange  and 
the subsidiary that operates the exchange, but not the parent corporation, ICE. 

ICE Futures Europe operates an exchange in London and, on it, trades European 
crude oil (Brent crude oil from the North Sea), European heating oil, European nat-
ural  gas,  and  other  European  contracts  as  well  as  a  financially-settled  U.S.  crude 
oil  futures  contract  (based  on  the  price  of  West  Texas  Intermediate  crude  oil  con-
tracts traded in New York), U.S. gasoline, and U.S. home heating oil contracts. ICE 
Futures Europe is registered in the United Kingdom, pays U.K. taxes, has U.K. em-
ployees,  is  treated  as  a  U.K.  corporation,  and  is  regulated  by  the  U.K.  Financial 
Services Authority. 

The  CFTC  has  not  deemed  the  parent  corporation  ICE  to  be  a  U.K.  entity;  it 
treats  ICE  as  a  U.S.  corporation,  which  it  is.  ICE  Futures  Europe,  on  the  other 
hand,  is  a  U.K.  corporation,  not  because  the  CFTC  has  ‘‘deemed  it  to  be’’  a  U.K. 
entity, but by operation of U.K. law. Moreover, under U.K. law, the parent corpora-
tion, ICE, is not permitted to direct the activities of its subsidiary, ICE Futures Eu-
rope, in operating the London exchange. The CFTC thus treats ICE Futures Europe 
as a foreign board of trade, because ICE Futures Europe is, in fact, a foreign board 
of trade. 

15. STATEMENT (p. 3): ‘‘[T]he statute should also be amended to forbid an exchange 
from  being  deemed  an  unregulated  foreign  entity  if  its  trading  affiliate  or  trading 
infrastructure is in the U.S.; or if it trades a U.S. delivered contract within the U.S. 
that significantly affects price discovery.’’ 

RESPONSE:  The  2006  Policy  Statement  issued  by  the  CFTC  discusses  the  various 
criteria  for  determining  when  a  foreign  board  of  trade  should  be  permitted  to  oper-
ate within the United States and not be subject to full CFTC regulation as a domes-
tic  futures  exchange.  The  CFTC  invited  and  considered  public  comments  on  all  of 
the  criteria  urged  by  Mr.  Greenberger.  The  Policy  Statement  states  that  the  Com-
mission  ‘‘decided  not  to  adopt  any  objective  standards  establishing  a  threshold  test 
of U.S. location. Commission staff will continue to assess the legitimacy of any par-
ticular applicant to seek relief as a ‘foreign’ board of trade by considering the total-
ity of factors presented by an applicant. This flexible case-by-case approach will per-
mit staff, during a period of evolving market structure, to consider the unique com-
bination  of  factual  indicators  of  U.S.  presence  that  may  be  presented  by  an  appli-
cant for relief.’’ 

16.  STATEMENT (p.  5):  ‘‘[T]he  Dubai  Mercantile  Exchange,  in  affiliation  with 
NYMEX,  a  U.S.  exchange,  has  also  commenced  trading  the  U.S.  delivered  WTI  con-
tract  on  U.S.  terminals,  but  is,  by  virtue  of  a  CFTC  no  action  letter,  regulated  by 
the Dubai Financial Service Authority.’’ 

RESPONSE:  This  statement  is  incorrect.  The  Dubai  Mercantile  Exchange  (DME) 
has not commenced trading crude oil contracts in the United States, although it has 
announced  its  intention  to  seek  permission  to  establish  DME  trading  terminals  in 
the United States to trade this contract. Second, the DME is not considering trading 
a ‘‘U. S. delivered WTI contract,’’ but rather a financially settled derivative contract 
whose  price  would  be  linked  to  the  settlement  price  of  the  WTI  contract  traded  on 
the  NYMEX.  The  Dubai  WTI-related  contract  would  not  require  the  physical  deliv-
ery  of  any  crude  oil.  Third,  the  trading  of  contracts  on  the  DME  will  be  regulated 
by  the  Dubai  Financial  Services  Authority,  not  by  virtue  of  any  action  or  inaction 
by  the  CFTC,  but  rather  by  the  operation  of  the  law  of  Dubai,  the  jurisdiction  in 
which the DME is located. 

The  issue  is  not  whether  the  DME  will  regulate  trading  on  an  exchange  located 
in its country, but whether the CFTC will be able to exercise oversight of DME con-
tracts  traded  here  in  the  United  States.  The  CFTC  has  yet  to  grant  DME  permis-
sion  to  use  trading  terminals  in  the  United  States  for  the  trading  of  its  WTI  con-
tract  and,  prior  to  doing  so,  may  follow  the  precedent  set  in  the  United  Kingdom 
and require DME to provide daily trading data and apply speculative position limits 
to  those  contracts  comparable  to  the  reporting  and  trading  requirements  applicable 
to WTI-related contracts currently traded in the United States. Legislation has been 
introduced in the Senate, S. 2995 and S. 3129, that would require the CFTC to fol-
low  that  course  of  action  for  every  foreign  exchange  seeking  to  trade  within  the 
United States. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

89 

17. STATEMENT (p. 12): ‘‘S. 2995 . . . opens the door to any foreign exchange oper-
ating  under  an  FBOT  exemption  escaping  U.S.  regulation  for  any  U.S.  delivered 
commodity. . . .’’ 

RESPONSE: This statement is incorrect. S. 2995 was introduced by Senators Levin 
and  Feinstein  in  May.  In  June,  a  new  provision  was  added  to  the  bill  and  it  was 
reintroduced  as  S.  3129,  the  Close  the  London  Loophole  Act  sponsored  by  Senators 
Levin, Feinstein, Durbin, Dorgan, and Bingaman. There is nothing in either S. 2995 
or  S.  3129  that  would  ‘‘open  the  door’’  to  any  foreign  board  of  trade  ‘‘escaping  U.S. 
regulation.’’  To  the  contrary,  both  bills  would  make  it  more  difficult  for  the  CFTC 
to grant a no-action letter to a foreign exchange than under current CFTC practice. 
Both  bills  would  require  the  CFTC,  before  granting  or  continuing  permission  for  a 
foreign  exchange  to  operate  trading  terminals  within  the  United  States,  to  make  a 
specific  finding  that  the  foreign  exchange  has  comparable  transparency  require-
ments  and  speculative  positions  limits  to  those  in  the  United  States.  S.  3129  goes 
further  and  gives  the  CFTC  explicit  authority  to:  (1)  prosecute  U.S.  persons  who 
manipulate  or  attempt  to  manipulate  the  price  of  a  commodity  in  interstate  com-
merce through trading on a foreign exchange; (2) direct U.S. traders to reduce their 
positions  on  a  foreign  exchange  when  those  positions  exceed  the  applicable  position 
limits  or  accountability  levels;  and  (3)  impose  recordkeeping  requirements  on  U.S. 
traders trading on a foreign board of trade or exchange. Both bills would strengthen 
U.S.  oversight  of  foreign  exchanges  operating  trading  terminals  in  the  United 
States. 

18.  STATEMENT (p.  13):  ‘‘S.  2995  does  not  incorporate  all  of  the  conditions  within 

the present FBOT no action letter typically issued by CFTC staff.’’ 

RESPONSE:  S.  2995  and  its  successor  bill  S.  3129  do  not  limit  the  conditions  that 
the CFTC may impose upon a foreign exchange in a no-action letter; both bills sim-
ply  require  that  certain  conditions  be  met  before  a  foreign  exchange  is  allowed  to 
operate trading terminals within the United States. Nothing in either bill would re-
strict  the  conditions  the  CFTC  may  impose  upon  a  foreign  exchange  to  those  speci-
fied in the bill language. 

19. STATEMENT (p. 8): ‘‘The Senate Permanent Investigating Subcommittee has now 
issued two reports, one in June 2006 and one in June 2007, that make a very strong 
(if  not  irrefutable  case)  that  trading  on  ICE  has  been  used  to  manipulate  or  exces-
sively speculate in U.S. delivered crude oil and natural gas contracts. The June 2006 
report  cited  economists  who  then  concluded  that  when  a  barrel  of  crude  was  at  $77 
in  June  2006,  $20  to  $30  dollars  of  that  cost  was  due  to  excessive  speculation  and/ 
or manipulation on unregulated exchanges.’’ 

RESPONSE: The 2006 and 2007 PSI reports focused on the role of excessive specu-
lation in U.S. commodity markets; neither report contained any findings on whether 
traders manipulated crude oil or natural gas prices. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. THOMAS R. CARPER TO 

MICHAEL GREENBERGER 

Question 1. Mr. Cooper stated in his testimony that Americans are paying $1,500 
more per year on gas due to high costs. Do people in some areas in the country feel 
the pain of high gas prices more than others? If so, why? 

Answer.  It  is  my  understanding  that  those  portions  of  the  country  that  do  not 
have reliable and affordable mass transits are feeling the pains of gas prices higher 
than  in  those  jurisdictions  where  American  can  substitute  public  for  personal  auto-
mobile transportations. For example, you hear that rural areas have been hit much 
harder than urban areas that have mass transit infrastructure. 

Question  2.  In  Mr.  Soros’  testimony,  he  stated  that  only  a  recession  is  likely  to 
reduce  consumption  enough  to  bring  down  gas  prices.  This  reminded  me  of  several 
articles  I  have  read  recently  regarding  Americans’  increasing  use  of  transit  and 
makes  me  curious  about  its  impact  on  demand.  Just  this  morning,  it  was  reported 
that  transit  ridership  is  up  by  double  digit  percentages.  Transit  in  the  Wilmington 
area  has  seen  the  6th  largest  jump  of  any  commuter  rail  in  the  nation.  However, 
many  transit  authorities  are  having  trouble  accommodating  the  increased  demand, 
and most communities have little in the way of comprehensive, reliable transit. My 
question is: if reliable transit was available in all or most communities, what would 
the  impact  on  oil  prices  be?  Could  this  help  Americans  reduce  demand  enough  to 
reduce gas prices without a recession? 

Answer.  Although  those  of  us  who  have  testified  that  uncontrolled  and  excessive 
speculation  has  placed  unnecessary  premiums  on  American  energy  consumers,  we 
have  also  emphasized  that  supply  and  demand  fundamentals  play  a  role  in  sky-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

90 

rocketing crude oil prices. If reliable mass transit were available in all or most com-
munities  then  that  would  undoubtedly  ease  supply/demand  concerns  and,  in  turn, 
reduce crude oil prices. As I understand it, Mr. Soros’ testimony concerning a harsh 
recession, was directed toward the deflating of what he sees as a classic speculative 
‘‘bubble.’’  It  is  my  view  that  the  need  for  a  recession  can  be  avoided  by  developing 
alternative  sources  of  energy  and  by  time-tested  regulatory  principles  that  quickly 
deflates the speculative premiums now being paid by American consumers. In sum, 
this  problem  can  be  fixed  short  of  Americans  experiencing  the  kind  of  debilitating 
recession that Mr. Soros described. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

MICHAEL GREENBERGER 

Question  1.  Given  your  history  as  a  former  employee  of  the  CFTC,  how  do  you 
see  the  FERC,  FTC  and  CFTC  working  together  with  this  new  authority?  Should 
there be a working relationship between these agencies? 

Answer. Yes, these agencies should establish and maintain a close real time work-
ing  relationship  in  order  to  maximize  their  potential  for  effectively  overseeing  the 
entirety  of  the  natural  gas  and  crude  oil  markets.  In  the  natural  gas  market,  for 
example,  FERC  had  substantial  experience  overseeing  the  physical  supply  and 
CFTC had the expertise to understand the futures markets in that commodity. The 
combination of the Energy Policy Act of 2005 and the Commodity Exchange Act has 
allowed both agencies to work together in order to monitor the relationship between 
the  futures  and  physical  natural  gas  markets.  By  virtue  of  the  Energy  Policy  Act 
of 2005, FERC now has jurisdiction over the natural gas futures market to prevent 
the  distortion  of  the  physical  markets  by  the  futures  markets.  Because  of  the  2005 
legislation, the jurisdiction of the two agencies substantially overlaps on the futures 
side.  While  some  have  viewed  this  as  unnecessary,  the  two  agencies  working  to-
gether—placing  a  premium  on  protecting  natural  gas  consumers  rather  than  each 
agencies’  individual  interests—has  maximized  the  potential  for  effectively  over-
seeing the natural gas market as whole. 

Under  the  Energy  Independence  and  Security  Act  of  2007,  Congress  included  a 
provision  expanding  the  power  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  to  combat  price 
manipulation with respect to crude oil futures markets in the same way it expanded 
FERC jurisdiction into the natural gas futures markets in 2005. If the FTC and the 
CFTC  coordinate  to  drain  excessive  speculation  and  other  unlawful  activities  from 
the  crude  oil  market  as  a  whole,  they  would  allow  market  fundamentals,  rather 
than excessive speculation, to dictate the crude oil price. Again, the first step, how-
ever,  is  a  coordinated  investigation  into  opaque  futures  markets  to  determine 
whether  excessive  speculation  or  other  malpractices  exist.  A  real  time  cooperative 
and  coordinated  effort  in  examining  the  physical  and  futures  crude  oil  markets  is 
imperative  to  determine  if  dysfunction  exist  and  then  to  remedy  them  if  the  inves-
tigation determines that the markets are unhinged from supply/demand factors. 

Question 1a. Do you believe that the budgets for these agencies are commensurate 

to the outlined critical task of policing our energy markets? 

Answer.  I  am  favor  of  increasing  all  three  agencies’  budgets  (CFTC,  FERC,  and 
the  FTC)  to  meet  their  statutory  responsibilities  to  police  these  energy  markets. 
However,  I  also  believe  that  in  this  time  of  extreme  crisis,  these  agencies  have  the 
authority  and  the  ability  to  organize  themselves  effectively  to  meet  the  objectives 
Congress  has  imposed.  In  my  opinion,  relatively  small  interagency  or  intra-agency 
task forces with competent and experienced leadership can satisfy all regulatory re-
sponsibilities imposed on these agencies with later supplemental funding serving as 
undergirding for investigative efforts that should begin immediately. In sum, I sup-
port  reasonable  increases  in  each  of  these  agencies’  budgets.  I  am  optimistic  that 
each  of  these  agencies  is  capable  of  reaching  congressional  benchmarks  promptly 
with effective leadership and organization. As a former CFTC regulator, I have seen 
what  small  well  led  investigative  teams  can  do.  All  three  agencies  collectively  and 
individually  should  begin  these  efforts  immediately  with  Congress  ultimately  pro-
viding  additional  resources  to  see  these  investigations  to  their  conclusions.  More-
over,  given  the  number  of  inter-Executive  Branch  task  forces  that  have  been  con-
vened,  additional  personnel  should  be  assigned  by  the  Executive  Branch  to  these 
three agencies on a temporary basis while these investigations begin. 

Question 2. Could you help explain why there is a reverse correlation on this chart 
between the rising WTI settlement price and the decreased volume and open inter-
est market share of trading on ICE? 

Answer.  The  chart  does  not  provide  enough  information  to  determine  ICE’s  WTI 
futures  trading  volume  relative  to  the  market’s  total  volume.  As  I  understand  it, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

91 

ICE  trades  WTI  futures  contracts  both  on  under  its  ‘‘ICE  Futures  Europe’’  banner, 
as  well  as  on  ICE  OTC.  Does  the  chart  reflect  only  ICE  Futures  Europe  or  all  ICE 
WTI  trading?  Without  more  information  regarding  the  volume  of  trading  in  these 
other  markets,  I  cannot  fully  assess  the  importance  of  the  reverse  correlation  be-
tween the settlement price and ICE’s trading volume and market share. 

In  any  event,  even  if  the  chart  reflects  all  ICE  trading,  whether  on  ‘‘Futures  Eu-
rope’’  and  ICE  OTC,  it  reflects  about  a  7  percent  downturn  in  ICE’s  share  of  the 
market,  leaving  ICE  at  26  percent  of  the  WTI  futures  market.  That  percentage 
would  still  in  excess  of  the  trading  outside  the  direct  supervision  of  the  CFTC  to 
lead  to  a  run  up  in  crude  oil  prices  that  bear  no  relationship  to  market  fundamen-
tals.  Of  course,  this  is  aggravated  by  the  fact  that  risk  laid  off  by  the  energy  index 
funds  keeps  mounting  and  those  positions  on  NYMEX  are  not  subject  to  that  ex-
changes  speculation  limits.  We  have  seen  in  recent  weeks,  major  announcements 
from  China  about  their  plan  to  eliminate  oil  subsidies  and  the  Saudis’  promise  to 
increase  substantially  daily  output,  yet  the  price  of  oil  has  continued  to  rise.  This 
strongly  suggests  that  the  price  of  oil  has  become  unhinged  from  the  fundamentals 
of  supply  and  demand  and  is  being  driven  by  some  other  market  element.  Again, 
the  only  way  in  which  the  true  cause  of  the  crude  oil  spike  can  be  determined  is 
for  a  full  and  careful  examination  of  these  markets  by  U.S.  regulators  looking  to 
all  trading  taking  place  on  U.S.  trading  facilities  of  the  U.S.  delivered  West  Texas 
Intermediate  futures  contract.  That  kind  of  investigation  would  settle  once  and  for 
all  what  is  behind  the  spike  that  seems  to  be  unresponsive  to  increased  supplies. 
Question 3. Do you believe Mr. Master’ underlying assumptions are correct about 
the market place? Are index speculators artificially driving the price of oil up to lev-
els beyond supply and demand? Do you agree with Mr. Masters’ prescriptions to the 
systems failure? 

Answer.  Mr.  Masters  has  convincingly  demonstrated  that  large  financial  institu-
tions  are  ‘‘hedging’’  their  off  exchange  futures  transactions  on  U.S.  regulated  com-
modities  futures  exchanges,  are  being  deemed  by  NYMEX  (a  regulated  exchange) 
and  the  CFTC,  as  ‘‘commercial  interests,’’  rather  than  as  the  speculators  subject  to 
NYMEX  speculation  limits.  By  treating  large  financial  institutions  in  this  cir-
cumstance  in  the  same  manner  as  traditional  physical  hedgers,1 even  fully  regu-
lated U.S. exchanges are not applying traditional and time tested speculation limits 
to  the  transactions  engaged  in  by  what  are  commonly  thought  of  as  speculative  in-
terests.  In  sum,  Mr.  Masters  analysis  further  explains  additional  and  powerful  fac-
tors that may very well be separating the WTI crude oil markets from economic fun-
damentals  and  his  evidence  needs  to  be  fully  evaluated  and,  if  corroborated  by  the 
U.S.  government,  responded  to  with  application  of  all  of  the  emergency  powers  af-
forded  the  CFTC  under  Section  8a  (9)  of  the  Commodity  Exchange  Act,  including 
temporary adjustments of margins and speculation limits by that agency and, if nec-
essary, contract moratoria. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

GERRY RAMM 

Question.  Two  weeks  ago  before  the  Homeland  Security  and  Government  Affairs 
Committee,  Mr.  Michael  Masters,  Managing  Member  of  Master  Capital  Manage-
ment  indicated  that  commodity  index  trading  has  risen  from  $13  billion  at  the  end 
of  2003  to  $260  billion  as  of  March  2008  and  indicated  that  institutional  investors 
are  contributing  to  the  rise  in  prices.  Mr.  Masters  then  proceeded  to  outline  three 
actions  that  could  reverse  this  trend.  These  included:  (1)  Restricting  pension  funds 
from  using  commodities  futures  markets;  (2)  Provide  transparency  in  the  over-the- 
counter  markets;  and  (3)  Delineate  the  classification  of  position  in  the  commercial 
category of reports to indicate the position of banks as well as the physical hedgers. 
Do  you  believe  Mr.  Masters’  underlying  assumptions  are  correct  about  the  market 
place?  Are  index  speculators  artificially  driving  the  price  of  oil  up  to  levels  beyond 
supply  and  demand?  Do  you  agree  with  Mr.  Masters  prescriptions  to  the  systems 
failure? 

Answer. Yes. Mr. Masters’ testimony outlines the need to reform futures markets 
by  reducing  the  impact  of  institutional  investment  on  commodity  markets.  Com-
modity  futures  exchanges  were  predominately  created  for  oil  producers  and  con-

1 Gene  Epstein,  Commodities:  Who’s  Behind  The  Boom?,  Barron’s  32  (March  31,  2008)  (  ‘‘The 
speculators,  now  so  bullish,  are  mainly  the  index  funds.  . . .  By  using  the  [swaps  dealers]  as 
a  conduit,  the  index  funds  get  an  exemption  from  position  limits  that  are  normally  imposed  on 
any  other  speculator,  including  the  $1  in  every  $10  of  index-fund  money  that  does  not  go 
through the swaps dealers.’’) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

92 

sumers  to  offset  price  risk  by  entering  into  a  futures  contract  for  future  delivery. 
Over  the  years,  PMAA  members  have  seen  a  disconnect  between  commodity  prices 
and  supply  and  demand  fundamentals.  For  instance,  Colonial  Pipeline  had  150,000 
barrels  of  surplus  heating  oil  available  for  auction  on  May  7.  On  that  same  day 
heating oil futures on the NYMEX settled at another record-high with its June con-
tract  closed  with  a  9.3ct  gain  at  $3.38/gal  with  New  England  temperatures  aver-
aging  in  the  high  70s.  PMAA  have  lost  faith  in  the  ability  to  hedge  for  the  benefit 
of their customers. 

Over the last few years, pension funds and endowment funds, etc. use commodity 
markets as a way to diversify their portfolios and as a hedge against inflation. Cur-
rently,  the  institutional  investment  ‘‘buy  and  hold’’  strategy  has  caused  an  inflated 
crude oil price because index speculators do not trade based on the underlying sup-
ply and demand fundamentals of the individual physical commodities. When institu-
tional investors buy an initial futures contract, that demand drives up the price. As 
the contract approaches the delivery month, institutional investors roll the expiring 
contract  into  the  next  delivery  month  while  never  taking  possession  of  the  physical 
commodity.  This  ‘‘buy  and  hold’’  strategy  distorts  the  futures  markets  price  dis-
covery  function.  For  instance,  a  buy  order  from  a  heating  fuel  dealer  locking  in  a 
price for future delivery will have the exact same price impact as a buy order from 
an institutional investor. 

I  agree  with  Mr.  Masters  prescriptions  for  a  commodity  futures  systems  failure. 
Institutional  investors  are  not  traditional  speculators  who  profit  when  prices  go  up 
or down. Institutional investor’s ‘‘buy and hold’’ strategy only profit when prices con-
tinue  to  rise  which  can  have  serious  consequences.  Because  the  speculation  bubble 
might soon burst, pension funds and endowment funds will likely suffer the greatest 
losses because they are notoriously slow to react to quickly changing market condi-
tions.  When  the  market  corrects,  hedge  funds  will  quickly  reduce  holdings  and  cut 
their losses. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

LEE ANN WATSON 

Question 1. Ms. Watson, following our hearing regarding the FTC Reauthorization 
last  month,  I  was  deeply  concerned  about  the  lack  of  urgency  from  the  FTC  about 
implementing  Title  8,  Subtitle  B  of  the  Energy  Independence  and  Security  Act.  At 
a  time  when  the  rise  in  energy  prices  has  effectively  wiped  out  the  economic  stim-
ulus  checks,  we  need  to  move  expeditiously  with  this  new  authority  to  ensure  that 
these  markets  are  not  being  manipulated.  Senators  Cantwell,  Smith,  Dorgan,  and 
Inouye  sent  a  letter  to  the  FTC  asking  that  they  move  forward  with  a  rulemaking 
by  the  end  of  the  year.  For  many  consumers,  truckers,  and  businesses  the  end  of 
the year is simply not good enough. Are there additional steps that the FTC, CFTC 
or  FERC  could  take  right  now  to  ensure  that  our  markets  are  not  being  subject  to 
manipulation? 

Answer.  FERC  staff  is  working  diligently  to  ensure  that  the  electricity  and  nat-
ural  gas  markets  subject  to  FERC’s  jurisdiction  are  well-functioning,  including  in-
vestigating  potential  violations  of  the  anti-manipulation  authority  granted  by  Con-
gress  in  the  Energy  Policy  Act  of  2005  (EPAct  2005)  and  implemented  by  FERC  in 
18  C.F.R.  Part  1c.  For  example,  since  the  passage  of  EPAct  2005,  FERC  used  its 
enforcement authority in two market manipulation cases when it issued show cause 
orders  that  made  preliminary  findings  of  market  manipulation  and  proposed  civil 
penalties  totaling  $458  million  in  two  investigations  involving  traders’  unlawful  ac-
tions in natural gas markets. 

With respect to oil and petroleum, FERC’s jurisdiction is limited. FERC has juris-
diction  only  over  ratemaking  of  oil  pipeline  transportation  in  interstate  commerce 
under the authority of the Interstate Commerce Act and the Department of Energy 
Organization  Act  of  1977,  42  U.S.C.  § 7101  et  seq.  FERC  has  no  jurisdiction  over, 
and therefore no authority to investigate, the prices charged for oil, gasoline, diesel, 
or heating oil, or the markets where those and other oil and petroleum products are 
traded. 

I  am  not  knowledgeable  about,  and  therefore  cannot  speak  to,  the  steps  the  FTC 
and  CFTC  may  be  taking  to  ensure  the  markets  subject  to  their  jurisdiction  are 
well-functioning. 

Question  1a.  What  does  FERC’s  experience  with  the  additional  power  from  the 
2005  Energy  Bill  educate  us  about  moving  forward  with  the  FTC’s  new  authority? 
Answer.  I  cannot  speak  to  the  FTC’s  new  authority,  but  FERC’s  experience  with 
the additional authority provided in the 2005 Energy Bill has been very good. FERC 
was  able  to  implement  its  new  authority  under  the  anti-manipulation  provisions 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

93 

quickly  and  smoothly,  due  in  large  part,  to  the  fact  that  Congress  directed  FERC 
to exercise its new authority in a manner consistent with section 10(b) of the Securi-
ties Exchange Act, as is detailed in my written testimony that I submitted on June 
3.  Further,  the  2005  Energy  Bill  not  only  provided  FERC  with  new  anti-manipula-
tion authority, but also provided FERC with enhanced penalty authority. FERC has 
not hesitated to use its new authority to police market manipulation by any entity, 
as exemplified in FERC’s proceeding against Amaranth. The civil penalty authority 
granted  by  Congress  in  EPAct  2005  enhanced  FERC’s  ability  to  vigorously  enforce 
the wholesale electricity and natural gas markets that it oversees, as demonstrated 
by  multitude  of  settlements  FERC  has  entered  into  with  electric  and  natural  gas 
market participants. 

Question 1b. Do you believe that there is an opportunity for inter-agency work on 

this issue and would that require additional statutory language? 

Answer.  On  April  16,  2008,  FERC  staff  met  with  representatives  of  the  FTC  to 
discuss  FERC’s  experience  implementing  the  anti-manipulation  power  granted  by 
Congress  in  EPAct  2005.  In  that  meeting,  and  in  subsequent  communications, 
FERC  representatives  answered  questions  FTC  staff  had  about  Order  No.  670,  the 
FERC  Order  promulgating  the  prohibition  of  market  manipulation  codified  in  18 
C.F.R. Part lc. 

FERC staff has and continues to provide any and all assistance requested by the 
FTC.  I  do  not  believe  there  is  any  need  for  additional  statutory  language  in  this 
regard. 

Question 2. Two weeks ago before the Homeland Security and Government Affairs 
Committee,  Mr.  Michael  Masters,  Managing  Member  of  Master  Capital  Manage-
ment  indicated  that  commodity  index  trading  has  risen  from  $13  billion  at  the  end 
of  2003  to  $260  billion  as  of  March  2008  and  indicated  that  institutional  investors 
are  contributing  to  the  rise  in  prices.  Mr.  Masters  then  proceeded  to  outline  three 
actions  that  could  reverse  this  trend.  These  included:  (1)  Restricting  pension  funds 
from  using  commodities  futures  markets;  (2)  Provide  transparency  in  the  over-the- 
counter  markets;  and  (3)  Delineate  the  classification  of  position  in  the  commercial 
category of reports to indicate the position of banks as well as the physical hedgers. 
Do  you  believe  Mr.  Masters’  underlying  assumption  are  correct  about  the  market 
place?  Are  index  speculators  artificially  driving  the  price  of  oil  up  to  levels  beyond 
supply and demand? 

Answer.  FERC  does  not  regulate  these  activities  and  these  questions  are  beyond 

the scope of my personal knowledge. Accordingly, I have no comment. 

Question 2a. Do you agree with Mr. Masters’ prescriptions to the systems failure? 
Answer.  FERC  does  not  regulate  these  activities  and  these  questions  are  beyond 

the scope of my personal knowledge. Accordingly, I have no comment. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. THOMAS R. CARPER TO 

DR. MARK COOPER 

Question 1. You suggest in your testimony that the tax code be designed to distin-
guish  between  long-term  productive  investment  and  short-term  speculative  invest-
ment.  Can  you  explain  this  proposal,  exactly  now  it  might  work,  and  the  impact  it 
would have on commodities prices? 

Answer.  Short-term  capital  gains  have  been  taxed  in  the  past.  The  principle  is 
simply  that  a  capital  gain  on  an  asset  held  for  less  than  a  specified  period  of  time 
(e.g., 2 years) is subject to a higher capital gains tax rate. I proposed a tax rate that 
is 33 to 50 percent higher. This proposal is intended to address the long-term prob-
lem of the under investment in long-term assets in our economy. It will relieve pres-
sures  on  the  commodity  markets  by  slowing  the  inflow  funds  into  these  markets. 
I  recommended  other  reforms  in  prudential  regulation  of  commodity  markets  such 
as,  position  limits,  speculation  limits,  capital  requirement,  closing  of  loopholes  and 
exemptions (Enron, Foreign Boards of Trade, and Swaps) that would burst the spec-
ulative  bubble  in  oil.  At  the  hearing  I  suggested  that  the  speculative  bubble  had 
added $40 per barrel to the price of oil. Today, (July 12, 2008), the bubble has grown 
as the price has increased. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

94 

Question 2. You suggest in your testimony that Americans are paying $1,500 more 
per  year  on  gas  due  to  high  costs.  Do  people  in  some  areas  in  the  country  feel  the 
pain of high gas prices more than others? If so, why? 

Answer. Yes. While the national average is about $1,500 per household, those liv-
ing  in  rural  areas  spend  substantially  more  on  gasoline,  compared  to  urban  con-
sumers, because they must drive longer distances to accomplish daily activities. The 
23 million households living outside urban areas have suffered an average increase 
of  about  $1,875;  the  95  million  households  living  in  urban  areas  have  suffered  an 
average increase of about $1,400. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:42 Apr 22, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\80428.TXT JACKIE

